Cause of death in an emergency department
Factor XIII deficiency and intracranial hemorrhages in infancy.
Ultrasonic integrated backscatter two-dimensional imaging: evaluation of M-mode guided acquisition and immediate analysis in 55 consecutive patients.
Left and right ventricular flows by Doppler echocardiography: serial measurements in patients with aortic regurgitation during exercise, cold pressor stimulation, and vasodilation.
Flow patterns in dilated cardiomyopathy: a pulsed-wave and color flow Doppler study.
Influence of Doppler sample volume location on the assessment of changes in mitral inflow velocity profiles.
Prevalence of aortic regurgitation by color flow Doppler in relation to aortic root size.
Two-dimensional echocardiographic features of double outlet left ventricle.
Evolution of the continuity equation in the Doppler echocardiographic assessment of the severity of valvular aortic stenosis.
The determination of aortic valve area by the Gorlin formula: what the cardiac sonographer should know.
The evaluation of the abdominal aorta: a "how-to" for cardiac sonographers.
Multivariate analysis in the prediction of death in hospital after acute myocardial infarction.
Ischaemic left ventricular failure: evidence of sustained benefit after 18 months' treatment with xamoterol.
Transoesophageal echocardiography improves the diagnostic value of cardiac ultrasound in patients with carcinoid heart disease.
Echocardiographic diagnosis of a ruptured aneurysm of the sinus of Valsalva: operation without catheterisation in seven patients.
Geographical clustering of risk factors and lifestyle for coronary heart disease in the Scottish Heart Health Study.
Replacement of an aortic valve cusp after neonatal endocarditis.
Hyponatraemia secondary to an inappropriately high release of antidiuretic hormone in cardiac tamponade.
Cardiac catheterisation with 5 French catheters.
Discrepancies in the measurement of isovolumic relaxation time: a study comparing M mode and Doppler echocardiography.
Analysis of side-effects of medium- and low-dose cyclosporin maintenance therapy in psoriasis.
Threat of unemployment and cardiovascular risk factors: longitudinal study of quality of sleep and serum cholesterol concentrations in men threatened with redundancy.
Efficacy of potassium and magnesium in essential hypertension: a double-blind, placebo controlled, crossover study
Outcome of renal replacement treatment in patients with diabetes mellitus.
Anterior lesser curve seromyotomy and posterior truncal vagotomy versus truncal vagotomy and pyloroplasty in the treatment of chronic duodenal ulcer.
Survey of the use of thrombolysis for acute limb ischaemia in the UK and Ireland.
Resympathectomy of the upper extremity.
Venous stasis and vein lumen changes during surgery
Myocarditis or acute myocardial infarction associated with interleukin-2 therapy for cancer.
Multi-Hospital Eastern Atlantic Restenosis Trial: design, recruitment, and feasibility. M-HEART Investigators.
Fractured and retained guide-wire fragment during coronary angioplasty--unforeseen late sequelae.
Klinefelter's syndrome with anomalous origin of left main coronary artery
Entrapment of a folded-over introducer sheath in the iliofemoral artery: an unusual complication of PTCA guiding catheter exchange
Retrograde recanalization of an occluded posterior tibial artery by using a posterior tibial cutdown: two case reports.
Simplified method for estimating true aortic valve mean gradient from simultaneous left ventricular and peripheral arterial pressure recordings.
Experience with the use of coronary autoperfusion catheter during complicated angioplasty.
Does percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty accelerate atherosclerotic lesions?
Myocarditis simulating acute transmural myocardial infarction.
Use of a guiding catheter for contralateral femoral artery angioplasty.
Percutaneous valvuloplasty in a patient with mitral stenosis following surgical annuloplasty.
Salvage from cardiogenic shock by atherectomy after failed emergency coronary artery angioplasty.
Left ventricular rupture complicating percutaneous mitral commissurotomy: salvage using percutaneous cardiopulmonary bypass support.
Left main percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty with the autoperfusion catheter in an animal model.
A rapid, effective technique for retrograde crossing of valvular aortic stenosis using standard coronary catheters
Acquired Lutembacher syndrome or mitral stenosis and acquired atrial septal defect after transseptal mitral valvuloplasty.
Nitrous oxide does not exacerbate pulmonary hypertension or ventricular dysfunction in patients with mitral valvular disease
Transoesophageal pacing for perioperative control of neonatal paroxysmal supraventricular tachycardia.
Epidural anaesthesia for labour and caesarean section in a parturient with a single ventricle and transposition of the great arteries.
Regulation of fibrillar collagen types I and III and basement membrane type IV collagen gene expression in pressure overloaded rat myocardium.
Increased ischemic injury but decreased hypoxic injury in hypertrophied rat hearts.
Species-dependent effects of adenosine on heart rate and atrioventricular nodal conduction. Mechanism and physiological implications.
Sepsis-related cardiogenic shock.
Use of a computerized closed-loop sodium nitroprusside titration system for antihypertensive treatment after open heart surgery.
Hemodynamic and metabolic effects of dobutamine in 18 patients after open heart surgery.
Role of prostaglandin E1 in reducing pulmonary vascular resistance in an experimental model of acute lung injury.
Plasma epinephrine levels in resuscitation with cardiopulmonary bypass.
Effect of hemodilution on capillary and arteriolovenous shunt flow in organs after cardiac arrest in dogs.
Noninvasive determination of pulmonary artery wedge pressure: comparative analysis of pulsed Doppler echocardiography and right heart catheterization.
Intrapericardial extralobar pulmonary sequestration in a neonate.
Traumatic rupture of aorta. Diagnosis by Doppler echocardiography.
Transient mitral regurgitation due to mitral valve prolapse accompanied by systolic anterior motion of the mitral valve.
Orthostatic hypotension following right ventricular myocardial infarction corrected with mineralocorticoid therapy.
Florid pulmonary veno-occlusive disease.
Pathologic involvement of the left ventricle in chronic cor pulmonale.
Esophageal contribution to chest pain in patients with coronary artery disease.
Ventilatory and diffusion abnormalities in potential heart transplant recipients.
Differential therapy with calcium antagonists in pulmonary hypertension secondary to COPD. Hemodynamic effects of nifedipine, diltiazem, and verapamil.
Severe aortic regurgitation as a late complication of temporal arteritis.
Lack of cutaneous hyperemia in response to insulin-induced hypoglycemia in IDDM.
Effects of fish oil supplements in NIDDM subjects. Controlled study.
Oral contraceptives in women with diabetes.
Effect of cyclosporin on generalized Shwartzman reaction in diabetic rats.
Role of leukotriene B4 in granulocyte infiltration into the postischemic feline intestine.
Caliber-persistent artery of the stomach (Dieulafoy's vascular malformation).
Push-enteroscopy for diagnosis of patients with gastrointestinal bleeding of obscure origin.
Endothelium-derived relaxing factors. A perspective from in vivo data.
Time course of hemodynamic responses to sodium in elderly hypertensive patients.
Two-way factorial study of alcohol and salt restriction in treated hypertensive men.
Diurnal cardiovascular patterns in spontaneously hypertensive and Wistar-Kyoto rats.
A kallikrein-like enzyme in blood vessels of one-kidney, one clip hypertensive rats.
Comparison of converting enzyme inhibitor and calcium channel blocker in hypertensive glomerular injury.
Interleukin-2 does not attenuate hypertension in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
Effects of differential touch on nervous system arousal of patients recovering from cardiac disease.
Torsade de pointes: a critical care nurse's dilemma.
Role of angiotensin-converting enzyme inhibitors in congestive heart failure.
Mechanical cardiopulmonary support for refractory cardiogenic shock.
Evaluating oxygen delivery and oxygen utilization with mixed venous oxygen saturation monitoring: a case study approach.
The incidence of deep vein thrombosis after cementless and cemented knee replacement.
Reduction of post-traumatic swelling and compartment pressure by impulse compression of the foot.
Ligation of the superficial femoral vein in prevention of pulmonary embolism: an old fashion procedure?
The relationship of intraluminal shunting to technical results after carotid endarterectomy.
Long term follow-up of descending thoracic aorto-iliac/femoral bypass.
Current results of elective aortic reconstruction for aneurysmal and occlusive disease.
Combined epidural and general anesthesia in aortic surgery.
Synchronous reconstruction for combined aortoiliac and femoropopliteal occlusive lesions. The role of proximal bypass.
Femoral noninfected anastomotic aneurysms. A report of 56 cases.
The management of aneurysms and arterio-venous fistulae of the popliteal artery arising from war trauma. Emphasis on sigmoid operative approach.
Prosthetic above-knee femoropopliteal bypass for intermittent claudication.
Unusual haemostasis for an unusual tumour. Catastrophic bleeding from a tactile neurofibroma affecting the thoracic vertebrae. Case report.
Spontaneous rupture of an aortic aneurysm into the left renal vein. A diagnostic challenge.
Plastic bullet arterial embolization following gunshot injury to the heart. Case report and review of the literature.
Mechanical circulatory support as a bridge to transplantation: current status of total artificial heart in 1989 and determinants of survival.
Clinical outcome of emergency repeat coronary artery bypass surgery.
Primary repair for complete atrioventricular canal: recommendation for early primary repair.
Perioperative myocardial injury in patients undergoing aortic valve replacement.
The De Vega tricuspid annuloplasty. Perioperative mortality and long term follow-up.
Cardiac echinococcosis: the diagnostic value of computed tomography scanning.
Right coronary artery injury during tricuspid valve annuloplasty.
Enhanced utilization of exogenous glucose improves cardiac function in hypoxic rabbit ventricle without increasing total glycolytic flux.
Multiple breakpoint method for measuring effect of antibiotics on endocarditis strains of streptococci.
Improved morphologic characterization of atrial septal aneurysm by transesophageal echocardiography: relation to cerebrovascular events.
Transesophageal Doppler color flow mapping assessment of atrial septal defect.
Outlook after acute myocardial infarction in the very elderly compared with that in patients aged 65 to 75 years
Changes in left ventricular diastolic performance after aortic balloon valvuloplasty: acute and late effects
Coronary angioplasty in patients with severe left ventricular dysfunction.
Coronary angioplasty after coronary bypass surgery: initial results and late outcome in 422 patients.
Natural history of hypertrophic cardiomyopathy in the elderly.
Prognostic importance of the serum magnesium concentration in patients with congestive heart failure.
Cardiac rhythm disturbances early after orthotopic heart transplantation: prevalence and clinical importance of the observed abnormalities.
A new single catheter technique for simultaneous measurement of action potential duration and refractory period in vivo.
The automatic implantable cardioverter-defibrillator in young patients.
Accuracy of prospective two-dimensional/Doppler echocardiography in the assessment of reparative surgery.
Comparative roles of intraoperative epicardial and early postoperative transthoracic echocardiography in the assessment of surgical repair of congenital heart defects
The daylong pattern of the antianginal effect of long-term three times daily administered isosorbide dinitrate
Myocardial amiodarone and desethylamiodarone concentrations in patients undergoing cardiac transplantation.
Effects of benazepril and metoprolol OROS alone and in combination on myocardial ischemia in patients with chronic stable angina
Does intracoronary infusion of Fluosol-DA 20% prevent left ventricular diastolic dysfunction during coronary balloon angioplasty?
Early and late effects of captopril treatment after large myocardial infarction in rats.
Heart rate variability before and after myocardial infarction in conscious dogs at high and low risk of sudden death.
Echocardiographic definition of the left ventricular centroid. II. Determination of the optimal centroid during systole in normal and infarcted hearts.
Dietary preference for sweet foods in patients with dementia
Neuropsychological outcome of survivors of out-of-hospital cardiac arrest.
Traumatic rupture of the thoracic aorta presenting as transient paraplegia.
Posttachycardia T-wave changes.
The normal mediastinum in blunt traumatic rupture of the thoracic aorta and brachiocephalic arteries.
Oscillometric finger blood pressure versus brachial auscultative blood pressure recording.
Blood pressure reactivity predicts myocardial infarction among treated hypertensive patients.
Estimating the benefits of cholesterol lowering: are risk factors for coronary heart disease multiplicative?
The leukocyte count: a predictor of hypertension.
Plasma fibrinogen and coronary risk factors: the Scottish Heart Health Study.
The effects of generation and gender on the joint distributions of lipid and apolipoprotein phenotypes in the population at large.
Risk ratios and risk differences in estimating the effect of risk factors for cardiovascular disease in the elderly.
Therapy of renal cell carcinoma with interleukin-2 and lymphokine-activated killer cells: phase II experience with a hybrid bolus and continuous infusion interleukin-2 regimen.
Interleukin-2 therapy in patients with metastatic malignant melanoma: a phase II study.
Initial CT findings in 753 patients with severe head injury. A report from the NIH Traumatic Coma Data Bank.
Spinal cord arteriovenous malformation with an associated lymphatic anomaly. Case report.
Significance of fill-in after thallium-201 reinjection following delayed imaging: comparison with regional wall motion and angiographic findings
Assessing clinical significance of apnea exceeding fifteen seconds with event recording.
Treatment of Kawasaki syndrome: a comparison of two dosage regimens of intravenously administered immune globulin.
Renovascular beta adrenergic hypersensitivity and hyperinsulinemia in rats with dietary-induced obesity.
Effects of long-term coenzyme Q10 and captopril treatment on survival and functional capacity in rats with experimentally induced heart infarction.
Conservative therapy for adnexal torsion. A case report.
How ancient is temporal arteritis?
Triiodothyronine treatment for Raynaud's phenomenon: a controlled trial.
The heterogeneity of anticentromere antibodies in immunoblotting analysis.
Splinter hemorrhages as a possible clinical manifestation of cholesterol crystal embolization.
Pulmonary-renal syndrome with "triad" involvement due to small vessel vasculitis.
Acute central nervous system symptoms caused by ibuprofen in connective tissue disease.
Presentation of breast carcinoma as Volkmann's contracture due to skeletal muscle metastases.
Hydroxyethyl starch pretreatment in bacteremic sheep.
Traumatic rupture of the aorta--critical decisions for trauma surgeons.
Extraperitoneal endarterectomy for iliofemoral occlusive disease.
Clinical results of axillobifemoral bypass using externally supported polytetrafluoroethylene
Duplex scanning of normal or minimally diseased carotid arteries: correlation with arteriography and clinical outcome.
An effective treatment protocol for intraarterial drug injection.
Propagation of deep venous thrombosis identified by duplex ultrasonography.
Clinical spectrum of symptomatic external iliac fibromuscular dysplasia.
Initial clinical evaluation of carotid artery laser endarterectomy.
Changes in quality of care for five diseases measured by implicit review, 1981 to 1986
Does age affect outcomes of out-of-hospital cardiopulmonary resuscitation?
Caffeine and ventricular arrhythmias. An electrophysiological approach.
Symptomatic pericardial effusion in lung cancer patients: the role of fluid cytology.
Extracorporeal membrane oxygenation for the circulatory support of children after repair of congenital heart disease.
Accelerated transmural gradients of energy compound metabolism resulting from left ventricular hypertrophy.
The influence of extracorporeal circulation on erythrocytes and flow properties of blood.
Prostacyclin and prostaglandin E2 mediate reduction of increased mean arterial pressure during cardiopulmonary bypass by aspiration of shed pulmonary venous blood.
Myocardial temperature during cardiac operations: influence on right ventricular function.
Intraoperative coronary artery endarterectomy with excimer laser.
Risk of myocardial infarction and death during treatment with low dose aspirin and intravenous heparin in men with unstable coronary artery disease. The RISC Group
Perforin-mediated myocardial damage in acute myocarditis.
Coffee, caffeine, and cardiovascular disease in men
The diagnosis and prognosis of autosomal dominant polycystic kidney disease.
The renin-angiotensin-aldosterone system and autosomal dominant polycystic kidney disease
Predicting the appropriate use of carotid endarterectomy, upper gastrointestinal endoscopy, and coronary angiography
Regression of coronary artery disease as a result of intensive lipid-lowering therapy in men with high levels of apolipoprotein B
Chinese-white differences in the distribution of occlusive cerebrovascular disease.
Low-dose aspirin does not influence the clinical course of women with mild pregnancy-induced hypertension.
Giant-cell arteritis of the uterus with associated temporal arteritis: a case report.
Ascites not due to congestive heart failure in a fetus with lupus-induced heart block.
Use of magnetic resonance imaging in the diagnosis of cortical blindness in pregnancy.
Infant survival following delayed postmortem cesarean delivery.
Dental extraction for patients on oral anticoagulant therapy.
Initial evaluation of heart murmurs: are laboratory tests necessary?
Phenobarbital and cerebral blood flow during hypertension in the newborn beagle.
Outcome and predictors of outcome in pediatric submersion victims receiving prehospital care in King County, Washington
Chest pain in teenagers. When is it significant?
Histologic investigation of vascular malformations of the face after transarterial embolization with ethibloc and other agents.
Surgical augmentation of skin blood flow and viability in a pig musculocutaneous flap model.
Critical ischemia times and survival patterns of experimental pig flaps.
The cutaneous manifestations in children with familial Mediterranean fever (recurrent hereditary polyserositis). A six-year study.
Clinical, autonomic and therapeutic observations in two siblings with postural hypotension and sympathetic failure due to an inability to synthesize noradrenaline from dopamine because of a deficiency of dopamine beta hydroxylase.
Prognostic factors in acute renal failure following aortic aneurysm surgery.
Natural history and cardiac manifestations of homozygous familial hypercholesterolaemia.
A predominantly adrenaline-secreting phaeochromocytoma.
Endocarditis in the 80s in a general hospital in Auckland, New Zealand.
Clinical diagnosis of tamponade in Malawi.
Studies on the pathogenesis of hypertension in Cushing's disease and acromegaly.
Lower extremity venography with iohexol: results and complications.
Segmented turboFLASH: method for breath-hold MR imaging of the liver with flexible contrast.
Mitral stenosis: evaluation with MR imaging after percutaneous balloon valvuloplasty.
Vena caval flow: assessment with cine MR velocity mapping.
Evolution of deep venous thrombosis: a prospective evaluation with US.
Renal artery stenosis in patients with aortic dissection: increased prevalence
Fate of patients undergoing transluminal angioplasty for lower-limb ischemia.
Percutaneous transluminal angioplasty of crural arteries.
Therapeutic embolization: enhanced radiolabeled monitoring.
Angioplasty from the contralateral approach: use of a guiding catheter and coaxial angioplasty balloons.
Irrigation device for neuroangiographic procedures.
Synergistic effects of psyllium in the dietary treatment of hypercholesterolemia.
Medicinal leeches: once again at the forefront of medicine.
Relationship between duration of spinal cord ischemia and postoperative neurologic deficits in animals.
A multifactorial analysis of mortality and morbidity in perforated peptic ulcer disease.
Immediate preoperative phlebotomy with autologous blood donation for aortic replacement.
Results of vein graft reconstruction of the lower extremity in diabetic and nondiabetic patients.
Response of spinal cord blood flow and motor and sensory evoked potentials to aortic ligation.
Experimental isobaric subarachnoid hemorrhage: regional mitochondrial function during the acute and late phase.
Effect of diltiazem and thromboxane A2 synthetase inhibitor (OKY-046) on vessels following experimental subarachnoid hemorrhage.
Intractable complex partial seizures associated with occult temporal lobe encephalocele and meningoangiomatosis: a case report.
Value of magnetic resonance imaging in spontaneous extradural spinal hematoma due to vascular malformation: case report.
Spinal extradural cavernous hemangioma.
Combined orthopedic and vascular injury in the lower extremities: indications for amputation.
Heparin-induced thrombocytopenia in patients who undergo open heart surgery.
Results of infrainguinal bypass for limb salvage in patients with end-stage renal disease.
Lower extremity percutaneous transluminal angioplasty: multifactorial analysis of morbidity and mortality.
Naloxone and spinal fluid drainage as adjuncts in the surgical treatment of thoracoabdominal and thoracic aneurysms.
Stroke and its modification in Parkinson's disease.
Hemodynamics in internal carotid artery occlusion examined by positron emission tomography.
Age-related spontaneous intracerebral hematoma in a German community.
Leukoaraiosis, intracerebral hemorrhage, and arterial hypertension.
Risk factors for white matter changes detected by magnetic resonance imaging in the elderly.
Pharmacologic irreversible narrowing in chronic cerebrovasospasm in rabbits is associated with functional damage.
Cerebral venous thrombosis due to heparin-induced thrombocytopenia.
Two cases of spontaneous internal carotid artery occlusion due to giant intracranial carotid artery aneurysm.
Prostaglandins, the kidney, and hypertension
Stress and hypertension
Therapeutic cardiac catheterization in children
Time delays in the diagnosis and treatment of acute myocardial infarction: a tale of eight cities. Report from the Pre-hospital Study Group and the Cincinnati Heart Project.
Assay of serum cardiac myosin heavy chain fragments in patients with acute myocardial infarction: determination of infarct size and long-term follow-up.
Reduction in infarct size by the phospholipase inhibitor quinacrine in dogs with coronary artery occlusion.
Intracoronary adenosine administration during reperfusion following 3 hours of ischemia: effects on infarct size, ventricular function, and regional myocardial blood flow.
DMPO and reperfusion injury: arrhythmia, heart function, electron spin resonance, and nuclear magnetic resonance studies in isolated working guinea pig hearts.
Clinical significance of plasminogen activator inhibitor activity in patients with exercise-induced ischemia.
Comparison of coronary angiography and early oral dipyridamole thallium-201 scintigraphy in patients receiving thrombolytic therapy for acute myocardial infarction.
Similar time course of ST depression during and after exercise in patients with coronary artery disease and syndrome X.
Prolongation of ventricular refractoriness by class Ia antiarrhythmic drugs in the prevention of ventricular tachycardia induction.
Residual atrial septal perforation after percutaneous transvenous mitral commissurotomy with Inoue balloon catheter.
Results of repeat percutaneous balloon valvuloplasty for pulmonary valvar restenosis.
Noninvasive discrimination of right atrial ectopic tachycardia from sinus tachycardia in "dilated cardiomyopathy".
Left ventricular end-systolic stress-volume index ratio in aortic and mitral regurgitation with normal ejection fraction.
Maximal oxygen uptake in severe aortic regurgitation: a different view of left ventricular function.
Contribution of transesophageal echocardiography to patient diagnosis and treatment: a prospective analysis.
Left ventricular mass regression after aortic valve replacement measured by ultrafast computed tomography.
Hypertensive heart disease: relationship of silent ischemia to coronary artery disease and left ventricular hypertrophy.
Parental history is an independent risk factor for coronary artery disease: the Framingham Study.
Frequency of low-grade residual coronary stenosis after thrombolysis during acute myocardial infarction.
Effect of verapamil on mortality and major events after acute myocardial infarction (the Danish Verapamil Infarction Trial II--DAVIT II)
Impact of field-transmitted electrocardiography on time to in-hospital thrombolytic therapy in acute myocardial infarction.
Sensitivity of a set of myocardial infarction screening criteria in patients with anatomically documented single and multiple infarcts.
Two-year outcome after angiographically documented myocardial reperfusion for acute coronary occlusion. Thrombolysis and Angioplasty Study Group.
Functional significance of myocardial perfusion defects induced by dipyridamole using thallium-201 single-photon emission computed tomography and two-dimensional echocardiography.
Left ventricular dilatation and pulmonary thallium uptake after single-photon emission computer tomography using thallium-201 during adenosine-induced coronary hyperemia.
Effects of bepridil and diltiazem on ventricular repolarization in angina pectoris.
Effects of intravenous verapamil on left ventricular relaxation and filling in stable angina pectoris.
Analysis of programmed stimulation methods in the evaluation of ventricular arrhythmias in patients 20 years old and younger.
Long-term follow-up in patients with incessant ventricular tachycardia.
Effects of metoprolol on rest and exercise cardiac function and plasma catecholamines in chronic congestive heart failure secondary to ischemic or idiopathic cardiomyopathy.
Renal effects of angiotensin-converting enzyme inhibition in congestive heart failure.
Mechanisms in heart failure and the role of angiotensin-converting enzyme inhibition.
Potential role of the tissue renin-angiotensin system in the pathophysiology of congestive heart failure.
Neuroendocrine activity in congestive heart failure.
Effects of enalapril and neuroendocrine activation on prognosis in severe congestive heart failure (follow-up of the CONSENSUS trial). CONSENSUS Trial Study Group.
Pharmacology of angiotensin-converting enzyme inhibitors as a guide to their use in congestive heart failure.
Clinical and hemodynamic assessment of the hepatojugular reflux.
Anatomic correlations of the long-axis views in biplane transesophageal echocardiography.
Transient left ventricular filling abnormalities (diastolic stunning) after acute myocardial infarction.
Role of beta-adrenergic blockers after percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty.
Functional status after coronary artery bypass grafting and percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty.
Patient-related variables and restenosis after percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty--a report from the M-HEART Group.
Results of percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty of high-risk angulated stenoses.
Quantitative angiographic comparison of the immediate success of coronary angioplasty, coronary atherectomy and endoluminal stenting.
Early postoperative balloon coronary angioplasty for failed coronary artery bypass grafting.
Role of alcohol in recurrences of atrial fibrillation in persons less than 65 years of age.
Comparison of the antihypertensive efficiency of nitrendipine, metoprolol, mepindolol and enalapril using ambulatory 24-hour blood pressure monitoring.
Usefulness of verapamil for congestive heart failure associated with abnormal left ventricular diastolic filling and normal left ventricular systolic performance.
Changes in circulating norepinephrine with hemofiltration in advanced congestive heart failure.
Detection and location of myocardial infarction using technetium-99m sestamibi imaging at rest.
Detection and assessment of unstable angina using myocardial perfusion imaging: comparison between technetium-99m sestamibi SPECT and 12-lead electrocardiogram.
Planar imaging techniques used with technetium-99m sestamibi to evaluate chronic myocardial ischemia.
Experimental studies of the physiologic properties of technetium-99m isonitriles.
Myocardial perfusion imaging with technetium-99m sestamibi SPECT in the evaluation of coronary artery disease.
Clinical experience with technetium-99m teboroxime, a neutral, lipophilic myocardial perfusion imaging agent.
Simultaneous measurement of myocardial perfusion and ventricular function during exercise from a single injection of technetium-99m sestamibi in coronary artery disease.
Comparison of SPECT using technetium-99m agents and thallium-201 and PET for the assessment of myocardial perfusion and viability.
Technetium-99m sestamibi myocardial imaging: same-day rest-stress studies and dipyridamole.
Use of technetium-99m sestamibi to determine the size of the myocardial area perfused by a coronary artery.
Technetium-99m sestamibi in chronic coronary artery disease: the European experience.
Percutaneous excimer laser coronary angioplasty.
Results of percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty in patients greater than or equal to 65 years of age (from the 1985 to 1986 National Heart, Lung, and Blood Institute's Coronary Angioplasty Registry).
Timing and mechanism of in-hospital and late death after primary coronary angioplasty during acute myocardial infarction.
Circadian rhythm of heart rate variability after acute myocardial infarction and its influence on the prognostic value of heart rate variability.
Doppler assessment of left ventricular filling pattern in silent ischemia in patients with Prinzmetal's angina.
Aortic calcified plaques and cardiovascular disease (the Framingham Study).
Comparison of direct and indirect measures of systemic arterial pressure during weightlifting in coronary artery disease.
Response of angiographically normal and atherosclerotic left anterior descending coronary arteries to acetylcholine.
Clinical and electrophysiologic characteristics of patients with antidromic circus movement tachycardia in the Wolff-Parkinson-White syndrome.
Electrocardiographic signal-averaging during atrial pacing and effect of cycle length on the terminal QRS in patients with and without inducible ventricular tachycardia.
Comparison of intravenous amrinone and dobutamine in congestive heart failure due to idiopathic dilated cardiomyopathy.
Comparison of frequency of late potentials in idiopathic dilated cardiomyopathy and ischemic cardiomyopathy with advanced congestive heart failure and their usefulness in predicting sudden death.
Value of carvedilol in congestive heart failure secondary to coronary artery disease.
Improvement in early diastolic filling dynamics after aortic valve replacement.
Relevance of intrinsic sympathomimetic activity for beta blockers.
Efficacy of acebutolol after acute myocardial infarction (the APSI trial). The APSI Investigators.
Secondary prevention of acute myocardial infarction with beta-blocking agents and calcium antagonists.
Characteristics of participants at baseline in the Treatment of Mild Hypertension Study (TOMHS).
Arterial protection: a neglected but crucial therapeutic goal.
Mechanical factors in large artery disease and antihypertensive drugs.
Documentation of the effective length of action of antihypertensive treatment.
Acebutolol effects on lipid profile [published erratum appears in Am J Cardiol 1990 Dec 1;66(19):A8]
Advantages of beta blockers versus antiarrhythmic agents and calcium antagonists in secondary prevention after myocardial infarction.
Atherosclerotic cardiovascular disease and sudden deaths among young adults in Wayne County.
Heart weights of white men 20 to 39 years of age. An analysis of 218 autopsy cases.
Cardiac conducting tissue. A simplified technique for examination of the SA and AV nodes.
Sudden death due to right ventricular cardiomyopathy.
Hepatic giant cavernous hemangioma with microangiopathic hemolytic anemia and consumption coagulopathy.
Overview: renal physiology and pathophysiology of aging.
Systolic hypertension in the elderly: reasons not to treat.
Dialysis considerations in the elderly patient.
Prevention of renal disease and conservation of renal function.
Calcium channel blockers versus angiotensin-converting enzyme inhibitors: renal effects.
Diabetes mellitus and hypertension.
Cardiac contractility and conduction: a comparison of antihypertensives.
Hypertension: racial differences.
Diet, smoking, and alcohol: influence on coronary heart disease risk.
Further mapping of an ataxia-telangiectasia locus to the chromosome 11q23 region.
Treatment of Wegener's granulomatosis with intermittent high-dose intravenous cyclophosphamide
Digitalis-like activity in human plasma: relation to blood pressure and sodium balance.
Cardiorespiratory effects of endoscopic esophageal variceal sclerotherapy.
The natural history of thrombocytopenia associated with preeclampsia.
Pregnancy-induced hypertension and acute fatty liver of pregnancy: atypical presentations.
Effects of hypertension on pregnancy monitoring and results.
Hypoxic acidemia, hyperviscosity, and maternal hypertension do not affect the umbilical arterial velocity waveform in fetal sheep.
Fetal and maternal response to intravenous infusion of a thromboxane synthetase inhibitor.
Oral contraceptives, lipoproteins, and atherosclerosis.
Oral contraceptives and myocardial infarction.
Crohn's disease and retinal vascular disease.
Immunohistochemical study of fibronectin in experimental myocardial infarction.
Accelerated arteriosclerosis in heart transplant recipients is associated with a T-lymphocyte-mediated endothelialitis.
Panic disorder and cardiovascular/cerebrovascular problems: results from a community survey.
Does isoflurane lead to a higher incidence of myocardial infarction and perioperative death than enflurane in coronary artery surgery? A clinical study of 1178 patients
Hemodynamic effects of diltiazem during vasoconstrictor pulmonary hypertension in sheep.
Changes in cerebral blood flow velocity after release of intraoperative tourniquets in humans: a transcranial Doppler study.
Cardioprotective effects of carnitine in extensive aortocoronary bypass grafting: a double-blind, randomized, placebo-controlled clinical trial.
The "natural history" of segmental wall motion abnormalities in patients undergoing noncardiac surgery. S.P.I. Research Group.
Nitrous oxide does not alter infarct volume in rats undergoing reversible middle cerebral artery occlusion.
Endogenous vasopressin supports blood pressure and prevents severe hypotension during epidural anesthesia in conscious dogs.
Experimental and clinical percutaneous angioscopy experience with dynamic angioplasty.
Optimizing heparin utilization in angiographic flush solutions.
Late chronic hemolysis after valve replacement for aortic stenosis. Relation to residual hypertrophy and impaired left ventricular function.
Hindbrain ischemia produced by bilateral vertebral artery occlusion and moderate hypotension in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
Effect of high-dose furosemide in refractory congestive heart failure.
Comparison of standard one-minute treadmill exercise and strandness test (absolute walking distance) in relation to site of lesion, walking distance, and diastolic blood flow velocity (Doppler curves).
Coronary artery dissection--a case report.
A forme fruste of Marfan's syndrome: case history.
Underestimation of treatment effect in crossover trials.
Hemodynamic effects of nebivolol at rest and on exertion in patients with heart failure.
Effects of diltiazem on the functional recovery of the myocardium at organ and cellular level during prolonged hypothermic ischemic cardiac arrest.
The effect of local temperature versus sympathetic tone on digital perfusion in Raynaud's phenomenon.
Successful direct PTCA on LAD after first episode of acute myocardial infarction: does it improve cardiac function?
Chronic arterial occlusion with PGE1-resistant skin lesions treated by glycosaminoglycan compound--case reports.
Arterial revascularization by laser angioplasty: first Italian experiences.
Intraoperative coronary excimer laser angioplasty: preliminary clinical experience.
Intravascular ultrasound: a new potential modality for angioplasty guidance.
Intravascular laser therapy of acute myocardial infarction.
An evaluation of cocaine-induced chest pain
Improved survival and reduced myocardial necrosis with cardiopulmonary bypass reperfusion in a canine model of coronary occlusion and cardiac arrest.
Transcranial Doppler determination of cerebral perfusion in patients undergoing CPR: methodology and preliminary findings.
Doppler assessment of pulmonary hypertension induced by hypoxic breathing in subjects susceptible to high altitude pulmonary edema.
Timing of corticosteroid treatment. Effect of lung lymph dynamics in air injury in awake sheep.
Clinical course of anti-neutrophil cytoplasmic autoantibody-associated glomerulonephritis and systemic vasculitis. The Glomerular Disease Collaborative Network
Exercise thallium-201 scintigraphy in the diagnosis and prognosis of coronary artery disease.
A case of unilateral posterior ischemic optic neuropathy after radical neck dissection.
Branch retinal vein occlusion: the pathogenetic role of blood viscosity.
Plasma prolactin and clinical outcome in preterm infants.
The iris in Williams syndrome.
Congenital diaphragmatic hernia: impact of prostanoids in the perioperative period.
Changing arteriosclerotic disease patterns and management strategies in lower-limb-threatening ischemia.
Selective evaluation and management of coronary artery disease in patients undergoing repair of abdominal aortic aneurysms. A 16-year experience.
Experience with cardiopulmonary bypass and deep hypothermic circulatory arrest in the management of retroperitoneal tumors with large vena caval thrombi.
Relief of tracheal compression by aortopexy.
Intraoperative ultrasonic imaging of the ascending aorta in ischemic heart disease.
Prevention of paraplegia during aortic operations.
Combined internal mammary artery graft for coronary artery revascularization.
Cor triatriatum: clinical presentation and surgical results in 12 patients.
Long-term amiodarone administration protects against global myocardial ischemia.
Subaortic obstruction: intraoperative echocardiography as an adjunct to operation.
Use of the variable-length intraluminal sutureless graft.
Swan-Ganz catheter-induced massive hemoptysis and pulmonary artery false aneurysm.
Cystic medionecrosis of the coronary arteries and fatal coronary vasospasm.
Liver transplantation with atrioatrial anastomosis for Budd-Chiari syndrome.
Polytetrafluoroethylene graft for spontaneous coronary dissection: 7-year follow-up.
Improved cannulation method for extracorporeal membrane oxygenation.
The association of blood pressure levels and change in renal function in hypertensive and nonhypertensive subjects.
Morbidity, mortality, and quality of life for patients treated with levothyroxine
Financial impact of a rapid CK-MB-specific immunoassay on the diagnosis of myocardial infarction.
Long-term function of persons with atherosclerotic bilateral below-knee amputation living in the inner city.
Popliteal vascular trauma. A community experience.
Utility of computed tomography for surveillance of small abdominal aortic aneurysms. Preliminary report.
Treatment of traumatic rupture of the thoracic aorta. A 15-year experience.
Angioscopy for intraoperative management of thromboembolectomy.
Failure of surgery to improve outcome in hypertensive putaminal hemorrhage. A prospective randomized trial.
Bretylium tosylate versus lidocaine in experimental cardiac arrest
Atrial fibrillation with cardiac tamponade as the initial manifestation of malignant pericarditis
Critical care transportation medicine: new concepts in pretransport stabilization of the critically ill patient.
Ventricular arrhythmias in hypertensive left ventricular hypertrophy. Relationship to coronary artery disease, left ventricular dysfunction, and myocardial fibrosis.
Effects of n-3 fatty acids in essential hypertension.
Effect of captopril injection in patients with moderate to severe hypertension.
Amiloride blocks the onset of ACTH-induced hypertension in the sheep.
Randomized trials in the study of antihypertensive drugs.
From the parallel group design to the crossover design, and from the group approach to the individual approach.
Effect of captopril on renal function in hypertensive dogs with unilateral renal artery stenosis, studied with radionuclide dynamic scintigraphy.
Nonpeptide angiotensin II receptor antagonists.
Humoral factors determining the blood pressure response to converting enzyme inhibition and calcium channel blockade.
Effects of felodipine on urinary albumin excretion and metabolic control in hypertensive non-insulin-dependent diabetics.
Platelet norepinephrine and epinephrine concentration in patients with pheochromocytoma.
Normalization of increased sodium sensitivity by maintenance hemodialysis.
Alarm reaction and serum K+ in hypertensive patients.
Studies of salt intake in hypertension. What can epidemiology teach us?
Calcium and blood pressure. An epidemiologic perspective.
Blood pressure response to dietary calcium intervention in humans.
Sodium-calcium interactions and salt-sensitive hypertension.
Putative mechanism of blood pressure reduction induced by increases in dietary calcium intake.
Calcium regulating hormones in essential hypertension. Importance of gender.
Calcium, parathyroid hormone, and vitamin D in the "prehypertensive" Dahl salt-sensitive rat.
Calciotropic hormones in human and experimental hypertension.
Dietary Ca2+ prevents NaCl-sensitive hypertension in spontaneously hypertensive rats by a sympatholytic mechanism.
Vascular and calcemic effects of plasma of spontaneously hypertensive rats.
Epithelial abnormalities in intestine and kidney of the spontaneously hypertensive rat.
Possible mechanisms of abnormal norepinephrine sensitivity and reactivity of resistance vessels and the development of hypertension in spontaneously hypertensive rats. A hypothesis.
Contribution of calmodulin and protein kinase C to renin release in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
Increase of calmodulin activator in hypertension. Modulation by dietary sodium and calcium.
Responses of cytosolic free calcium to ADP in platelets of spontaneously hypertensive rats.
Calcium and contractile responses to phorbol esters and the calcium channel agonist, Bay K 8644, in arteries from hypertensive rats.
Echocardiographic measurement of left ventricular mass and volume in normotensive and hypertensive rats. Necropsy validation.
Age-related changes in membrane fluidity of erythrocytes in essential hypertension.
Post-transplant hypertension.
Cardiac arrhythmias from a malpositioned Greenfield filter in a traumatic quadriplegic.
Does blood rheology revert to normal after myocardial infarction?
Prospective evaluation of a protocol for induction of sustained ventricular tachycardia in patients referred to a tertiary centre.
Placebo controlled trial of xamoterol versus digoxin in chronic atrial fibrillation.
Use of computed tomographic scanning and aortography in the diagnosis of acute dissection of the thoracic aorta.
Doppler echocardiographic evaluation of pulmonary artery flow after modified Fontan operation: importance of atrial contraction.
Primary balloon dilatation of coarctation of the aorta in neonates.
Transoesophageal echocardiography in the longitudinal axis: correlation between anatomy and images and its clinical implications.
Rash after treatment with anistreplase.
The effect of abdominal surgery on the serum concentration of the tumour-associated antigen CA 125.
Haemostatic changes during continuous oestradiol-progestogen treatment of postmenopausal women.
Haemorheological changes in patients with retinal vein occlusion after isovolaemic haemodilution.
Homocystinuria presenting as central retinal artery occlusion and longstanding thromboembolic disease.
Lobular pattern of choriocapillaris in pre-eclampsia with aldosteronism.
Pulse oximetry: a new non-invasive assessment of peripheral arterial occlusive disease.
Through-knee amputation in high-risk patients with vascular disease: indications, complications and rehabilitation.
Recent changes in the treatment of aortoiliac occlusive disease by the Oxford Regional Vascular Service.
Conservative management of asymptomatic popliteal aneurysm.
Acute limb ischaemia: the place of intravenous streptokinase.
Early detection and treatment of hyperlipidemia: physician practices in Canada.
Thromboembolism. A complication of weekly chemotherapy in the treatment of non-Hodgkin's lymphoma.
Catheterization of coronary artery bypass graft from the descending aorta.
Coronary angioplasty of anomalous coronary arteries: notes on technical aspects.
Angioplasty of occluded coronary arteries: use of thin shaft balloon over-the-wire system without pre-dilatation.
Probe angioplasty of total coronary occlusion using the Probing Catheter technique.
Influence of catheter technology and adjuvant medication on acute complications in percutaneous coronary angioplasty.
Regression of infundibular pulmonary stenosis after successful balloon pulmonary valvuloplasty in adults.
Diagnosis of left atrial thrombi in mitral valve disease by coronary arteriography.
Balloon rupture due to lesion morphology during coronary angioplasty.
Death at cardiac catheterization: coronary artery embolization of calcium debris from Ionescu-Shiley bioprosthesis.
Severe mitral insufficiency post-balloon valvuloplasty: the late changes found in a disrupted mitral valve.
Physical examination and echo Doppler study in the assessment of femoral arterial complications following cardiac catheterization.
Inflation pressure requirements during coronary angioplasty.
Percutaneous popliteal approach for angioplasty of superficial femoral artery occlusions.
Correction of subclavian artery stenosis by percutaneous angioplasty.
Treatment of ventricular tachycardia induced cardiogenic shock by percoronary chemical ablation.
Usefulness of digital angiography in the assessment of left ventricular ejection fraction.
Hyperkalaemia during rapid blood transfusion and hypovolaemic cardiac arrest in children.
Side effects of nalbuphine while reversing opioid-induced respiratory depression: report of four cases.
The prophylactic use of octreotide in a patient with ovarian carcinoid and valvular heart disease.
Nonuniform regional deformation of the pericardium during the cardiac cycle in dogs.
Biphasic effects of doxorubicin on the calcium release channel from sarcoplasmic reticulum of cardiac muscle.
Enhanced alpha 1-adrenergic responsiveness in cardiomyopathic hamster cardiac myocytes. Relation to the expression of pertussis toxin-sensitive G protein and alpha 1-adrenergic receptors.
Evidence for decreased coronary flow reserve in viable postischemic myocardium.
Reperfusion and readmission of oxygen. Pathophysiological relevance of oxygen-derived free radicals to arrhythmogenesis.
Time course of cellular enzyme release in dog heart injury.
Effects of adenosine on human coronary arterial circulation
Sex differences in control of cutaneous blood flow.
Mortality after 10 1/2 years for hypertensive participants in the Multiple Risk Factor Intervention Trial
Ten-year follow-up of survival and myocardial infarction in the randomized Coronary Artery Surgery Study
Ten-year follow-up of quality of life in patients randomized to receive medical therapy or coronary artery bypass graft surgery. The Coronary Artery Surgery Study (CASS)
Blood pressure level, trend, and variability in Dunedin children. An 8-year study of a single birth cohort
Baffle fenestration with subsequent transcatheter closure. Modification of the Fontan operation for patients at increased risk
Late potentials and inducible ventricular tachycardia in surgically repaired congenital heart disease.
Iliofemoral arterial complications of balloon angioplasty for systemic obstructions in infants and children
Prognostic value of radionuclide angiography in medically treated patients with coronary artery disease. A comparison with clinical and catheterization variables.
Prognostic value of electrophysiology testing in asymptomatic patients with Wolff-Parkinson-White pattern [published erratum appears in Circulation 1991 Mar;83(3):1124]
Hormones regulating cardiovascular function in patients with severe congestive heart failure and their relation to mortality. CONSENSUS Trial Study Group.
Excretion of thromboxane A2 and prostacyclin metabolites before and after exercise testing in patients with and without signs of ischemic heart disease.
Thromboxane receptor blockade prevents pulmonary hypertension induced by heparin-protamine reactions in awake sheep
Effect of long-term exercise on regional myocardial function and coronary collateral development after gradual coronary artery occlusion in pigs.
Effect of tachycardia on regional function and transmural myocardial perfusion during graded coronary pressure reduction in conscious dogs
Optimizing the exercise test for pharmacological investigations
Left ventricular ejection fraction may not be useful as an end point of thrombolytic therapy comparative trials.
Splenic septic emboli in endocarditis.
Coronary artery pattern and outcome of arterial switch operation for transposition of the great arteries.
Midterm surgical results of arterial switch operation for transposition of the great arteries with intact septum.
Morphological findings contributing to a failed Fontan procedure. Twelve-year experience.
Early diagnosis and surgical intervention of acute aortic dissection by transesophageal color flow mapping.
Clinical evaluation of single versus multiple mammary artery bypass.
Use of single internal mammary artery grafts in older patients.
Early and late results after isolated coronary artery bypass surgery in 159 patients aged 80 years and older.
Dissection of the aorta and dissecting aortic aneurysms. Improving early and long-term surgical results.
Surgical repair of postinfarction ventricular septal defect.
Relative risks of left ventricular aneurysmectomy in patients with akinetic scars versus true dyskinetic aneurysms.
Latissimus dorsi cardiomyoplasty in the treatment of patients with dilated cardiomyopathy.
Progressive coronary luminal narrowing after cardiac transplantation.
Five-year experience with triple-drug immunosuppressive therapy in cardiac transplantation.
Late complications in pediatric cardiac transplant recipients.
The changing clinical spectrum of thromboangiitis obliterans (Buerger's disease).
High-risk reparative surgery. A neglected alternative to heart transplantation.
Bradyarrhythmia after heart transplantation. Incidence, time course, and outcome.
Factors affecting survival in total artificial heart recipients before transplantation.
Deferoxamine fails to improve postischemic cardiac function in hypertrophied hearts.
Right ventricular function and metabolism.
Is adenosine 5'-triphosphate derangement or free-radical-mediated injury the major cause of ventricular dysfunction during reperfusion? Role of adenine nucleoside transport in myocardial reperfusion injury.
Prolonged cardiac preservation. Evaluation of the University of Wisconsin preservation solution by comparison with the St. Thomas' Hospital cardioplegic solutions in the rat.
Efficacy of recombinant-derived human superoxide dismutase on porcine left ventricular contractility after normothermic global myocardial ischemia and hypothermic cardioplegic arrest.
Effects of low perfusate Ca2+ concentration on newborn myocardial function after ischemia.
Comparison of medical and surgical therapy for uncomplicated descending aortic dissection.
Reappraisal of the mechanism for cerebrospinal fluid hypertension during aortic surgery.
Diffuse proliferative lupus nephritis: long-term observations in patients treated with ancrod.
Disappearance of renin-induced proteinuria by an ACE-inhibitor: a case report.
Amniotic and thromboembolism.
Total knee arthroplasty in diabetes mellitus.
Trochanteric fractures. Mobility, complications, and mortality in 607 cases treated with the sliding-screw technique.
Mechanical measures in the prophylaxis of postoperative thromboembolism in total knee arthroplasty.
The antihypertensive efficacy of hydrochlorothiazide is not prostacyclin dependent.
Quality of life among hypertensive patients with a diuretic background who are taking atenolol and enalapril.
Effect of indecainide in patients with left ventricular dysfunction.
Increased erythrocyte sodium-lithium countertransport activity in essential hypertension is due to an increased affinity for extracellular sodium.
Depression and recovery of right ventricular function after cardiopulmonary bypass.
Bronchial hyperreactivity in patients with mitral valve disease.
Respiratory muscle strength in congestive heart failure.
The effects of phenylephrine on right ventricular performance in patients with pulmonary hypertension
Single lung transplantation for primary pulmonary hypertension.
Hyperresponsiveness of the extrathoracic airway in patients with captopril-induced cough
Cardiopulmonary assessment in beta-thalassemia major.
The entrainment of low frequency breathing periodicity.
Abnormal hemodynamic response to Valsalva maneuver in patients with atrial septal defect evaluated by Doppler echocardiography.
Hemodynamic status in critically ill patients with and without acute heart disease.
The impact of right ventricular infarction on the prevalence of ventricular arrhythmias during acute inferior myocardial infarction.
Diagnosis of tracheal injury in mechanically ventilated premature infants by flexible bronchoscopy. A pilot study.
Mechanism of intermittent preexcitation in the Wolff-Parkinson-White syndrome. The concept of electronically mediated conduction across an inexcitable gap.
Axillosubclavian vein thrombosis produced by retrosternal thyroid.
Labetalol and MRI as initial medical and diagnostic modalities in a marfanoid patient with expanding ascending aortic aneurysm.
Electrocardiographic J waves after resuscitation from cardiac arrest.
Septic pulmonary emboli. A rare cause of bilateral pneumothorax in drug abusers.
A randomized trial comparing direct current therapy and bipolar diathermy in the outpatient treatment of third-degree hemorrhoids.
Retroperitoneal air after routine hemorrhoidectomy. Report of a case.
Short-term effect of hepatic arterial versus portal venous reperfusion on energy levels of liver tissue.
Cardiac disease in the alcoholic patient.
Insulin and hypertension. Relationship to obesity and glucose intolerance in Pima Indians.
Omeprazole in the management of intractable esophageal ulceration following injection sclerotherapy.
Fulminant hepatitis after lisinopril administration.
The role of endoscopic injection sclerotherapy in the management of bleeding peristomal varices.
Arterial blood oxygen desaturation in infants and children during upper gastrointestinal endoscopy.
Atrial fibrillation in the elderly: management update.
Hepatic vascular disease and portal hypertension in polycythemia vera and agnogenic myeloid metaplasia: a clinicopathological study of 145 patients examined at autopsy.
Characteristics of biliary lipid metabolism after liver transplantation.
Close correlation of intra-abdominal fat accumulation to hypertension in obese women.
Early 24-hour blood pressure elevation in normotensive subjects with parental hypertension
Calcitropic hormones, platelet calcium, and blood pressure in essential hypertension.
Effects of angiotensin converting enzyme inhibitors and of hydralazine on endothelial function in hypertensive rats
Enalapril and renal injury in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
Effects of salt, race, and hypertension on reactivity to stressors.
Pressor systems in hypertension and congestive heart failure. Role of vasopressin [clinical conference]
Pivotal role of early and sustained infarct vessel patency in patients with acute myocardial infarction.
Clinical controversies surrounding thrombolytic therapy in acute myocardial infarction.
Role of angioplasty in myocardial infarction management strategies: a review.
Effects of heparin versus saline solution on intermittent infusion device irrigation.
Effects of supplemental oxygen administration in an infant with pulmonary artery hypertension.
Effects of anxiety on family members of patients with cardiac disease learning cardiopulmonary resuscitation.
Effect of activity on supraventricular tachyarrhythmias after coronary artery bypass surgery.
Left ventricular asynchrony in patients with pulmonary hypertension.
Effect of ischemia reperfusion or hypoxia reoxygenation on lung vascular permeability and resistance.
Muscle oxidative capacity and work performance after training under local leg ischemia.
Hypertension after operative correction of club-foot deformity.
Total knee arthroplasty in obese patients.
Recent advance in treatment of Stanford type A aortic dissection.
Surgical treatment of aneurysm or dissection involving the ascending aorta and aortic arch, utilizing circulatory arrest and retrograde cerebral perfusion.
Efficacy of transesophageal echocardiography as a perioperative monitor in patients undergoing cardiovascular surgery. Analysis of 149 consecutive studies.
The effect of enoximone and dobutamine on hemodynamic performance after open heart surgery. A clinical comparison.
Valvular and coronary surgery in renal transplant patients.
Successful surgical treatment of subaortic stenosis caused by an accessory mitral valve.
An unusual late complication following surgical repair of tetralogy of Fallot.
Acute dissection of the internal mammary artery: a fatal complication of coronary artery bypass grafting.
Intraoperative assessment of cerebral ischemia during carotid surgery.
Reappraisal of surgical treatment of traumatic transection of the thoracic aorta.
Inflammatory abdominal aortic aneurysms.
Thrombectomy for late graft limb occlusion: our experience in 182 consecutive cases.
Assessment of major venous anomalies by computerized tomography.
Aneurysmal dilatation in saphenous vein bypass grafts.
Primary varicose veins: topographic and hemodynamic correlations.
Management of deep venous thrombosis in the pregnant female.
Alterations in aldosterone secretion and metabolism in low renin hypertension.
Endothelin family in human plasma and cerebrospinal fluid.
Tongue ischemia from a soft-drink can: report of case.
Progression of native coronary artery disease at 10 years: insights from a randomized study of medical versus surgical therapy for angina.
Coronary Artery Surgery Study (CASS): comparability of 10 year survival in randomized and randomizable patients.
Coronary lesion morphology in acute myocardial infarction: demonstration of early remodeling after streptokinase treatment
Results of primary angioplasty for acute myocardial infarction in patients with multivessel coronary artery disease.
Multivessel coronary angioplasty from 1980 to 1989: procedural results and long-term outcome
Plasma homocyst(e)ine levels in men with premature coronary artery disease.
Prolonged anginal perceptual threshold in diabetes: effects on exercise capacity and myocardial ischemia.
Clinical and hemodynamic correlates of sympathetic nerve activity in normal humans and patients with heart failure: evidence from direct microneurographic recordings.
Serial Doppler echocardiographic follow-up of left ventricular diastolic function in cardiac amyloidosis.
Simultaneous transesophageal atrial pacing and transesophageal two-dimensional echocardiography: a new method of stress echocardiography
Dynamic positron tomographic imaging with nitrogen-13 glutamate in patients with coronary artery disease: comparison with nitrogen-13 ammonia and fluorine-18 fluorodeoxyglucose imaging.
Effects of nitroprusside on transmitral flow velocity patterns in extreme heart failure: a combined hemodynamic and Doppler echocardiographic study of varying loading conditions.
Determinants of the ventricular rate during atrial fibrillation.
Supraventricular tachycardia due to Wolff-Parkinson-White syndrome in children: early disappearance and late recurrence
Ventricular arrhythmias after correction of ventricular septal defects: importance of surgical approach.
Efficacy of propafenone in preventing ventricular tachycardia: inverse correlation with rate-related prolongation of conduction time
Magnitude and time course of beta-adrenergic antagonism during oral amiodarone therapy.
Surgical treatment of endomyocardial fibrosis: a new approach.
Effect of intravenous streptokinase on the relation between initial ST-predicted size and final QRS-estimated size of acute myocardial infarcts.
Intraoperative assessment of regional myocardial perfusion using quantitative myocardial contrast echocardiography: an experimental evaluation.
Pharmacokinetics of indium-111-labeled antimyosin monoclonal antibody in murine experimental viral myocarditis.
Prostaglandin modulation of early afterdepolarizations and ventricular tachyarrhythmias induced by cesium chloride combined with efferent cardiac sympathetic stimulation in dogs.
Effects of calcium channel blockers on coronary vasoconstriction induced by endothelin-1 in closed chest pigs.
Direct visualization of ruptured chordae tendineae by transesophageal two-dimensional echocardiography.
Transesophageal echocardiography to detect atrial clots in candidates for percutaneous transseptal mitral balloon valvuloplasty.
Relation between beta-adrenergic blocker use, various correlates of left ventricular function and the chance of developing congestive heart failure. The Multicenter Diltiazem Post-Infarction Research Group.
Detection of restenosis after successful coronary angioplasty: improved clinical decision making with use of a logistic model combining procedural and follow-up variables.
Results of coronary surgery after failed elective coronary angioplasty in patients with prior coronary surgery
Serial left ventricular performance evaluated by cardiac catheterization before, immediately after and at 6 months after balloon aortic valvuloplasty.
Abnormal cardiac sensitivity in patients with chest pain and normal coronary arteries.
Single photon emission computed tomography with thallium-201 during adenosine-induced coronary hyperemia: correlation with coronary arteriography, exercise thallium imaging and two-dimensional echocardiography
Termination of acute atrial fibrillation in the Wolff-Parkinson-White syndrome by procainamide and propafenone: importance of atrial fibrillatory cycle length.
Plaque morphology and pathologic changes in arteries from patients dying after coronary balloon angioplasty
Coronary morphology after percutaneous directional coronary atherectomy in humans: autopsy analysis of three patients.
Intracardiac shunting in children with ventricular septal defect: evaluation with Doppler color flow mapping
Results of the arterial switch operation in patients with transposition of the great arteries and abnormalities of the mitral valve or left ventricular outflow tract.
Is banding of the pulmonary trunk obsolete for infants with tricuspid atresia and double inlet ventricle with a discordant ventriculoarterial connection? Role of aortic arch obstruction and subaortic stenosis
Long-term follow-up of patients after transcatheter direct current ablation of the atrioventricular junction.
Dissociation of changes in cardiovascular mass and performance with angiotensin-converting enzyme inhibitors in Wistar-Kyoto and spontaneously hypertensive rats.
Circulating heart-reactive antibodies in patients with myocarditis or cardiomyopathy [corrected and republished with original paging, article originally printed in J Am Coll Cardiol 1990 Oct;16(4):839-46]
Diagnostic value of a new myocardial perfusion agent, teboroxime (SO 30,217), utilizing a rapid planar imaging protocol: preliminary results [corrected and republished with original paging, article originally printed in J Am Coll Cardiol 1990 Oct;16(4):855-61]
Plasma dehydroepiandrosterone and dehydroepiandrosterone sulfate in patients undergoing diagnostic coronary angiography [corrected and republished with original paging, article originally printed in J Am Coll Cardiol 1990 Oct;16(4):862-70]
Acute hemorrhagic edema of infancy (AHEI)--a variant of Henoch-Schonlein purpura or a distinct clinical entity?
Cholesterol screening in 5,719 self-referred elderly subjects.
Hypertension and acculturation in elderly Mexican Americans: results from 1982-84 Hispanic HANES.
Chylous ascites should suggest constrictive pericarditis even in a patient with cirrhosis.
Ultrasound-Doppler diagnosis of Budd-Chiari syndrome.
Portal venous gas in a patient with Crohn's disease.
Pneumococcal anticapsular antibodies in patients with chronic cardiovascular and obstructive lung disease in The Netherlands.
Neisseria mucosa endocarditis.
Substance P, acetylcholinesterase, and beta-endorphin levels in the plasma and pericardial fluid of patients with and without angina pectoris.
Deposits of crystalline material containing silicon in surgically excised human valves.
Exacerbation of acute platelet thrombus formation in stenosed dog coronary arteries with smoke from a non-tobacco-burning cigarette.
Cardiac pathology in 470 consecutive forensic autopsies.
Causes of death in hospitalized intravenous drug abusers.
Resistance to ischaemia of small afferent nerve fibres in diabetes mellitus.
Cardiac transplantation in female Emery-Dreifuss muscular dystrophy.
Electrocardiographic ambulatory monitoring with a real-time analysis system.
High- versus standard-dose megestrol acetate in women with advanced breast cancer: a phase III trial of the Piedmont Oncology Association.
Epirubicin cardiotoxicity: a study of 135 patients with advanced breast cancer.
Angiographic demonstration of acute phase of intracranial arterial spasm following aneurysm rupture. Case report.
Subarachnoid hemorrhage caused by a fungal aneurysm of the vertebral artery as a complication of intracranial aneurysm clipping. Case report.
Quantification of the reversibility of stress-induced thallium-201 myocardial perfusion defects: a multicenter trial using bull's-eye polar maps and standard normal limits
Myocardial uptake of indium-111-labeled antimyosin in acute subendocardial infarction: clinical, histochemical, and autoradiographic correlation of myocardial necrosis.
Impact of the availability of a prior electrocardiogram on the triage of the patient with acute chest pain
Management of asymptomatic chronic aortic regurgitation with left ventricular dysfunction: a decision analysis
Expert testimony based on decision analysis: a malpractice case report.
Reflections on the U.S. Preventive Services Task Force recommendations for screening for hypertension and hypercholesterolemia.
Prevention of cardiovascular disease: risks and benefits of aspirin.
The costs of prevention.
Acute aortic valvular incompetence following blunt thoracic deceleration injury: case report.
Surgical treatment of renal artery stenosis after failed percutaneous transluminal angioplasty.
Perioperative methotrexate, vinblastine, doxorubicin and cisplatin (M-VAC) for poor risk transitional cell carcinoma of the bladder: an Eastern Cooperative Oncology Group pilot study.
Arteriographically determined occlusive disease within the hypogastric-cavernous bed in impotent patients following blunt perineal and pelvic trauma.
Pheochromocytoma in the pediatric age group: the prostate--an unusual location.
Embolization of a giant renal arterial aneurysm.
Massive hemorrhage from an arterioureteral fistula associated with chronic renal transplant failure.
Prostacyclin-to-thromboxane A2 ratio in arteriogenic impotence.
Renal autotransplantation in children: a successful treatment for renovascular hypertension.
A giant renal artery aneurysm diagnosed post partum.
Doppler color-flow images from a stenosed arterial model: interpretation of flow patterns.
Everted cervical vein for carotid patch angioplasty.
Inflammatory abdominal aortic aneurysm masquerading as occlusion of the inferior vena cava.
Free protein S deficiency in a family with venous thrombosis.
Indications for distal arterial reconstruction in the presence of palpable pedal pulses.
Femur fracture with limb shortening causing occlusion of a polytetrafluoroethylene femoral popliteal graft.
Intraabdominal hemorrhage as a result of segmental mediolytic arteritis of an omental artery: case report.
Intraoperative peripheral Nd:YAG laser-assisted thermal balloon angioplasty: short-term and intermediate-term follow-up.
Disseminated histoplasmosis with embolic endovascular complications: a case report.
Indirect revascularization of the lower extremity by means of microvascular free-muscle flap--a preliminary report.
Unusual aspects of aortovenous fistulas associated with ruptured abdominal aortic aneurysms.
Popliteal artery occlusion caused by cystic adventitial disease: successful treatment by urokinase followed by nonresectional cystotomy.
Deep vein obstruction and leg swelling caused by femoral ganglion.
The diagnosis and management of aortic dissection.
Adult open heart surgery in New York State. An analysis of risk factors and hospital mortality rates
Glomerular hyperfiltration indicates early target organ damage in essential hypertension
Practicalities of lipids: ICU patient, autoimmune disease, and vascular disease.
Nephron function in the early phase of ischemic renal failure. Significance of erythrocyte trapping.
Role of enhanced glomerular synthesis of thromboxane A2 in progressive kidney disease.
Mild ischemia predisposes the S3 segment to gentamicin toxicity.
Options for surgical repair in hearts with univentricular atrioventricular connection and subaortic stenosis.
Repair of transposition of the great arteries with intact ventricular septum and left ventricular outflow tract obstruction.
The effects of dopamine on myocardial functional recovery after reversible ischemic injury.
Studies of controlled reperfusion after ischemia. XVIII. Reperfusion conditions: attenuation of the regional ischemic effect by temporary total vented bypass before controlled reperfusion.
Simulated left ventricular aneurysm and aneurysm repair in swine.
Intraoperative transesophageal color-coded Doppler echocardiography for evaluation of residual regurgitation after mitral valve repair.
Aortic replacement with composite grafts created with a sutureless intraluminal ringed prosthesis.
Coagulation factor abnormalities as possible thrombotic risk factors after Fontan operations.
Angioedema from angiotensin converting enzyme inhibitors: a cause of upper airway obstruction.
The health belief model: predicting compliance and dropout in cardiac rehabilitation.
The effect of low-dose warfarin on the risk of stroke in patients with nonrheumatic atrial fibrillation. The Boston Area Anticoagulation Trial for Atrial Fibrillation Investigators
Deficiencies of coagulation-inhibiting and fibrinolytic proteins in outpatients with deep-vein thrombosis
The agent of bacillary angiomatosis. An approach to the identification of uncultured pathogens
Clinical and pathological features of bacillary peliosis hepatis in association with human immunodeficiency virus infection
Regional myocardial metabolism of high-energy phosphates during isometric exercise in patients with coronary artery disease
Long-term outcome after surgical repair of isolated atrial septal defect. Follow-up at 27 to 32 years
Thickness of carotid artery atherosclerotic plaque and ischemic risk.
The frequency-dependent behavior of cerebral autoregulation.
Acute changes in the dynamics of the cerebrospinal fluid system during experimental subarachnoid hemorrhage.
Vagal schwannoma associated with syncopal attacks and postural hypotension: a case report.
Occult vascular malformations of the optic chiasm: magnetic resonance imaging diagnosis and surgical laser resection.
Serial ultrasonographic evaluation of neonatal vein of Galen malformations to assess the efficacy of interventional neuroradiological procedures.
Infectious intracranial aneurysms: comparison of groups with and without endocarditis.
Distribution of angiographic vasospasm after subarachnoid hemorrhage: implications for diagnosis by transcranial Doppler ultrasonography.
Hypertension as a risk factor for epilepsy after aneurysmal subarachnoid hemorrhage and surgery.
Pharmacological reversibility of experimental cerebral vasospasm.
Intradural spinal cord tumor presenting as a subarachnoid hemorrhage: magnetic resonance imaging diagnosis.
Cavernous hemangioma of the spinal cord: report of 2 unusual cases.
Whither electronic fetal monitoring?
Vitreous changes and macular edema in central retinal vein occlusion.
Experience with photocoagulation in Behcet's disease.
Acquired retinal arteriovenous communications in occlusive disease of the carotid artery.
The prevalence of cardiac valvular pathosis in patients with systemic lupus erythematosus.
Nitrendipine-induced gingival hyperplasia. First case report.
Transbronchial biopsies in children after heart-lung transplantation.
Dexamethasone effects on the hospital course of infants with bronchopulmonary dysplasia who are dependent on artificial ventilation.
Peripheral vascular disorders. Assessment and intervention.
Arrhythmias in patients with CHF. Should they be treated?
Potentially lethal ventricular arrhythmias. Minimizing the danger.
Mitral valve prolapse. When is it serious?
A 47-kDa human nuclear protein recognized by antikinetochore autoimmune sera is homologous with the protein encoded by RCC1, a gene implicated in onset of chromosome condensation.
Direct monitoring of capillary perfusion following normovolemic hemodilution in an experimental skin-flap model.
Factors determining success and energy requirements for cardioversion of atrial fibrillation.
In vitro colony culture and chromosomal studies in hepatic and portal vein thrombosis--possible evidence of an occult myeloproliferative state.
The management of atypical non-cardiac chest pain.
Brucella endocarditis: the role of combined medical and surgical treatment.
Endocarditis due to ampicillin-resistant nontyphoid Salmonella: cure with a third-generation cephalosporin.
Listerial myocarditis in cardiac transplantation.
Primary prevention of coronary artery disease through a family-oriented cardiac risk factor clinic.
Postural hypotension: pressor effect of octreotide not mediated by norepinephrine.
Arteriovenous malformation of the tongue.
Neurologic abnormalities in a patient with human ehrlichiosis.
Left ventricular pseudoaneurysm complicating mitral valve replacement in a 4-year-old child with acute bacterial endocarditis.
Deleterious effects of testicular venous occlusion in young rats.
An overview of intimal hyperplasia.
Hepatic resection for advanced hepatocellular carcinoma with removal of portal vein tumor thrombi.
Sequential gradient pneumatic compression enhances venous ulcer healing: a randomized trial.
Portal vein resection with a new antithrombogenic catheter.
Gastric outlet obstruction caused by traumatic pseudoaneurysm of superior mesenteric artery.
High ethanol consumption as risk factor for intracerebral hemorrhage in young and middle-aged people.
Stroke in systemic lupus erythematosus [published erratum appears in Stroke 1991 Mar;22(3):417]
Regression of intracardiac thrombus after embolic stroke.
Surgical experience with cerebral amyloid angiopathy.
Ultrasonic evaluation of early carotid atherosclerosis.
Moderate hypothermia after cardiac arrest of 17 minutes in dogs. Effect on cerebral and cardiac outcome.
Effect of ischemia induced by middle cerebral artery occlusion on superoxide dismutase activity in rat brain.
Rebleeding from intracranial dissecting aneurysm in the vertebral artery.
Protein phosphorylation during ischemia.
Progress report of the Stroke Prevention in Atrial Fibrillation Study.
Modification of stroke susceptibility by genotype-dependent maternal influences.
Neurogenic control of the cerebral circulation during global ischemia.
Coarctation of the aorta.
Venous ulcers: pathophysiology and medical therapy.
Silent myocardial ischemia: dilemma or blessing?
Persistent uptake of indium-111-antimyosin monoclonal antibody in patients with myocardial infarction.
Coronary perfusion catheter: its effectiveness in an experimental model of acute coronary occlusion.
Dose-dependent reduction of myocardial infarct size with the perfluorochemical Fluosol-DA.
Left ventricular asynchrony: an indicator of regional myocardial dysfunction.
Detection and quantitation of ischemic left ventricular dysfunction using a new video intensity technique for regional wall motion evaluation.
Silent myocardial ischemia and infarction in diabetics with peripheral vascular disease: assessment by dipyridamole thallium-201 scintigraphy.
Angiography, angioscopy, and ultrasound imaging before and after percutaneous balloon angioplasty.
Coronary angioplasty in symptomatic patients after bypass surgery.
Clinical significance of simple heart rate-adjusted ST segment depression in supine leg exercise in the diagnosis of coronary artery disease.
ACE inhibition improves vagal reactivity in patients with heart failure.
Are ioxaglate and iopamidol equally safe and well tolerated in cardiac angiography? A randomized, double-blind clinical study.
Transesophageal echocardiography in the awake elderly patient: its role in the clinical decision-making process.
Noninvasive assessment of cardiac output in children using impedance cardiography.
Cardiac fluoroscopy for the diagnosis of coronary artery disease: a meta analytic review.
Is obesity-related hypertension less of a cardiovascular risk? The Framingham Study.
Experimental contrast-associated nephropathy and its clinical implications.
A hematologist's view of contrast media, clotting in angiography syringes and thrombosis during coronary angiography.
Clinical cardiovascular magnetic resonance imaging.
Clinical nuclear magnetic resonance spectroscopy: insight into metabolism.
Positron emission tomography and interventional cardiology.
Role of magnetic resonance contrast agents in cardiac imaging.
Beta blockers and the primary prevention of nonfatal myocardial infarction in patients with high blood pressure.
Epidemiologic studies demonstrating increased morning incidence of sudden cardiac death.
Timing and triggers of transient myocardial ischemia.
Application of time series analysis to circadian rhythms: effect of beta-adrenergic blockade upon heart rate and transient myocardial ischemia.
Transient myocardial ischemia and its relation to determinants of myocardial oxygen demand.
Mental stress as an acute trigger of ischemic left ventricular dysfunction and blood pressure elevation in coronary artery disease.
Triggers of transient myocardial ischemia: circadian variation and relation to plaque rupture and coronary thrombosis in stable coronary artery disease.
Cause of thrombosis in human atherosclerotic arteries.
Rupture of coronary vasa vasorum as a trigger of acute myocardial infarction.
Angiographic assessment of the culprit coronary artery lesion before acute myocardial infarction.
Potential usefulness of combined thromboxane A2 and serotonin receptor blockade for preventing the conversion from chronic to acute coronary artery disease syndromes.
Propranolol and the morning increase in sudden cardiac death: (the beta-blocker heart attack trial experience).
Beta-blocker duration of action and implications for therapy.
Effect of beta-adrenergic blocking agents on the circadian occurrence of ischemic cardiovascular events.
Reduction of mortality, sudden death and non-fatal reinfarction with beta-adrenergic blockers in survivors of acute myocardial infarction: a new hypothesis regarding the cardioprotective action of beta-adrenergic blockade.
Subgroups of patients with atypical circadian patterns of symptom onset in acute myocardial infarction.
Exercise test predictors of ambulatory silent ischemia during daily life in stable angina pectoris.
Effects of theophylline, atenolol and their combination on myocardial ischemia in stable angina pectoris.
Transient left ventricular cavitary dilation during dipyridamole-thallium imaging as an indicator of severe coronary artery disease.
Effects of two types of fish oil supplements on serum lipids and plasma phospholipid fatty acids in coronary artery disease.
Predictive value of lipoprotein (a) and other serum lipoproteins in the angiographic diagnosis of coronary artery disease.
Voltage criteria of left ventricular hypertrophy in sudden and nonsudden coronary artery disease mortality: the Italian section of the Seven Countries Study.
Videodensitometry versus digital calipers for quantitative coronary angiography.
Frequency of myocardial indium-111 antimyosin uptake after uncomplicated coronary artery bypass grafting.
Time course and prognostic significance of serial signal-averaged electrocardiograms after a first acute myocardial infarction.
Prognostic value of predischarge low-level exercise thallium testing after thrombolytic treatment of acute myocardial infarction.
Prognosis of acute myocardial infarction complicated by primary ventricular fibrillation. Principal Investigators of the SPRINT Study.
Usefulness of labetalol in chronic atrial fibrillation.
Long-term effect of mexiletine on left ventricular function and relation to suppression of ventricular arrhythmia.
Effectiveness of the once-daily calcium antagonist, lacidipine, in controlling 24-hour ambulatory blood pressure.
Atenolol therapy for exercise-induced hypertension after aortic coarctation repair.
Risk of cardiovascular mortality in alcohol drinkers, ex-drinkers and nondrinkers.
Subnormal parasympathetic activity after cardiac transplantation.
Erythrocyte fatty acids, plasma lipids, and cardiovascular disease in rural China.
Effects of fish-oil ingestion on cardiovascular risk factors in hyperlipidemic subjects in Israel: a randomized, double-blind crossover study.
Disproportionate septal hypertrophy associated with erythroblastosis fetalis.
Hepatic portal venous gas: an unusual presentation of Crohn's disease.
Autosomal dominant polycystic kidney disease--more than a renal disease.
Body fluid spaces and blood pressure in hemodialysis patients during amelioration of anemia with erythropoietin.
Tubulointerstitial changes in systemic vasculitic disorders: a quantitative study of 18 biopsy cases.
The future of nephrology.
Sudden death in young competitive athletes: clinicopathologic correlations in 22 cases.
Beta 2-microglobulin predicts survival in primary systemic amyloidosis.
Developing improved observational methods for evaluating therapeutic effectiveness.
Effects of calcium channel blockade on calcium homeostasis in mild to moderate essential hypertension.
An assault on old friends: thiazide diuretics under siege.
A simplified technique for the production of heart failure in the dog by rapid ventricular pacing.
Molecular biology in cardiology: recent developments and opportunities for clinical applications.
Prevalence and determinants of estrogen replacement therapy in elderly women.
Ultrasonographic diagnosis of a large placental intervillous thrombosis associated with elevated maternal serum alpha-fetoprotein level.
Hyperadrenergic orthostatic intolerance as a result of postpartum blood loss.
Ultrasonographic assessment of placental abnormalities.
Clustering of atherogenic behaviors in coffee drinkers.
The association between Type A behavior and change in coronary risk factors among young adults.
The Framingham Disability Study: relationship of various coronary heart disease manifestations to disability in older persons living in the community.
Hypertension prevalence and the status of awareness, treatment, and control in the Hispanic Health and Nutrition Examination Survey (HHANES), 1982-84
A note on the measurement of hypertension in HHANES
Long-term impact of smoking cessation on the incidence of coronary heart disease.
Physical activity, opportunity for reinfection, and sibling history of heart disease as risk factors for Chagas' cardiopathy.
Fish oil supplementation in patients with stable claudication.
An outpatient anticoagulation protocol managed by a vascular nurse-clinician.
Comparison of blood flow assessment between laser Doppler velocimetry and the hydrogen gas clearance method in ischemic intestine in dogs.
Admissions to the intensive care unit after complications of anaesthetic techniques over 10 years. 2. The second 5 years
Severe hypotension due to intramyometrial injection of prostaglandin E2
Adverse haemodynamic effects of high-dose aprotinin in a paediatric cardiac surgical patient.
Autonomic dysfunction and Guillain-Barre syndrome. The use of esmolol in its management.
No finding of increased myocardial ischemia during or after carotid endarterectomy under anesthesia with nitrous oxide.
Thoracic epidural anesthesia improves global and regional left ventricular function during stress-induced myocardial ischemia in patients with coronary artery disease.
Pulmonary hypertension after heparin-protamine: roles of left-sided infusion, histamine, and platelet-activating factor.
Electroencephalographic changes during brief cardiac arrest in humans.
Effects of thoracic epidural anesthesia on coronary arteries and arterioles in patients with coronary artery disease.
Effects of ketamine on the cardiac papillary muscle of normal hamsters and those with cardiomyopathy.
Differential protective effects of halothane and isoflurane against hypoxic and reoxygenation injury in the isolated guinea pig heart.
Hemodynamic determinants of subdiaphragmatic venous return during closed-chest CPR in a canine cardiac arrest model.
Survival rates from out-of-hospital cardiac arrest: recommendations for uniform definitions and data to report.
Prehospital cardiac arrest: the impact of witnessed collapse and bystander CPR in a metropolitan EMS system with short response times.
Successful CPR in a severely hypothermic patient using continuous thoracostomy lavage.
Early detection of acute myocardial infarction in patients presenting with chest pain and nondiagnostic ECGs: serial CK-MB sampling in the emergency department [published erratum appears in Ann Emerg Med 1991 Apr;20(4):420]
Transtelephonic defibrillation.
Distinguishable types of dyspnea in patients with shortness of breath.
Dissecting aneurysm of the pulmonary artery with pulmonary hypertension.
Ponderal index as a predictor of postoperative complications.
Lower extremity revascularization via the lateral plantar artery.
Normal angiograms and carotid pathology.
Carotid endarterectomy for elderly patients: predicting complications
Serum and tissue magnesium concentrations in patients with heart failure and serious ventricular arrhythmias.
High blood cholesterol in elderly men and the excess risk for coronary heart disease.
Cardiovascular effects of the somatostatin analog octreotide in acromegaly.
Selection of patients with acute myocardial infarction for thrombolytic therapy
Effect of intravenous streptokinase on early mortality in patients with suspected acute myocardial infarction. A meta-analysis by anatomic location of infarction [published erratum appears in Ann Intern Med 1991 Mar 15;114(6):522]
Electroencephalography laboratory diagnosis of prolonged QT interval.
Intraoperative blood pressure. What patterns identify patients at risk for postoperative complications?
Surgical management of pheochromocytoma with the use of metyrosine.
Does carotid restenosis predict an increased risk of late symptoms, stroke, or death?
Repair of supravalvar aortic stenosis: cardiovascular morphometric and hemodynamic results.
Prognostic determinants in extracorporeal membrane oxygenation for respiratory failure in newborns.
Correction of truncus arteriosus with truncal valvar stenosis or insufficiency using two homografts.
Influence of prosthetic design on durability of the Liotta porcine valve in the mitral position.
Clinical performance of St. Jude and Medtronic-Hall prostheses: a randomized comparative study.
Clinical experience with the Medtronic-Hall valve prosthesis.
Aortic dissection with the entrance tear in transverse aorta: analysis of 12 autopsy patients.
Unusual opening of coronary sinus in atrioventricular septal defects.
Myocardial preservation using lidocaine blood cardioplegia.
Timing of operation for aortic regurgitation: relation to postoperative contractile state.
Prolonged extracorporeal life support of pediatric and adolescent cardiac transplant patients.
Pulmonary resection combined with cardiac operations.
Tension pneumopericardium as a complication of single-lung transplantation.
Catastrophic thrombosis of porcine aortic bioprostheses.
Combined repair of transposed great arteries and total anomalous pulmonary venous connection.
Circumflex artery ventricular fistula and pseudoaneurysm after mitral reoperation.
New technique for the arterial switch operation in difficult situations.
Postinfarction ventricular septal defect repair: retrospective thoughts and historical perspectives.
Treatment of postoperative infection of ascending aorta and transverse aortic arch, including use of viable omentum and muscle flaps.
Role of perfusion pressure and flow in major organ dysfunction after cardiopulmonary bypass.
Ultrasonic debridement during mitral valve reconstruction for calcified mitral stenosis.
Repair of flail anterior leaflets of tricuspid and mitral valves by cusp remodeling.
Thoracic spinal fractures and aortic rupture: a significant and fatal association.
Cardioplegia-induced damage to ischemic immature myocardium is independent of oxygen availability.
Five-year results of coronary bypass grafting for patients older than 70 years: role of internal mammary artery.
Morphological and histopathological aspects of aneurysms after patch aortoplasty for coarctation.
Medical management of acute traumatic rupture of the aorta.
Surgical epicardial ablation of left ventricular pathway using sling exposure
Management of aortobronchial fistula with graft replacement and omentopexy.
Aortobronchial fistula after an aortic operation.
Management of mycotic rupture of the ascending aorta after heart-lung transplantation.
Malignant thymoma presenting as intracardiac tumor and superior vena caval obstruction.
Easy dissection of hard and thickened pericardium on constrictive pericarditis.
The relationship between sex hormones and high-density lipoprotein cholesterol levels in healthy adult men.
Epidemiologic features of asymptomatic cerebral infarction in patients with nonvalvular atrial fibrillation.
Medical comorbidity of major depressive disorder in a primary medical practice.
Acute autonomic neuropathy. Two cases and a clinical review.
Thyrotoxicosis induced by topical iodine application.
Lovastatin. Warfarin interaction.
Evaluation of methods for detecting venous reflux. Perspectives in venous insufficiency.
The post-occlusive hyperemic response in patients with systemic sclerosis.
Diffusing capacity of the lung and nifedipine in systemic sclerosis.
IgG and IgA antibodies to the collagen-like region of C1q in rheumatoid vasculitis.
Prediction of pregnancy-induced hypertensive disorders by angiotensin II sensitivity and supine pressor test.
Development of antibodies to thrombin and factor V with recurrent bleeding in a patient exposed to topical bovine thrombin.
Atenolol in essential hypertension during pregnancy
Prevalence of symptoms of Raynaud's phenomenon in general practice.
Resuscitation of patients with cardiac arrest by ambulance staff with extended training in West Yorkshire
Current status of antitachycardia devices.
Pathophysiological insights into the cardiomyopathy of Chagas' disease.
Catheterization laboratory events and hospital outcome with direct angioplasty for acute myocardial infarction
An analysis of randomized trials evaluating the effect of cholesterol reduction on total mortality and coronary heart disease incidence.
Intermittent claudication, heart disease risk factors, and mortality. The Whitehall Study
Sotalol versus quinidine for the maintenance of sinus rhythm after direct current conversion of atrial fibrillation
A controlled clinical trial to assess the effect of a calcium channel blocker on the progression of coronary atherosclerosis
A prospective, randomized, double-blind, crossover study to compare the efficacy and safety of chronic nifedipine therapy with that of isosorbide dinitrate and their combination in the treatment of chronic congestive heart failure
Inotropic effects of angiotensin II on human cardiac muscle in vitro.
Functional chiral asymmetry in descending thoracic aorta
Abnormal blood pressure response during exercise in hypertrophic cardiomyopathy.
Beta-adrenergic receptors in lymphocyte subsets after exercise. Alterations in normal individuals and patients with congestive heart failure.
Airway hyperresponsiveness in patients with microvascular angina. Evidence for a diffuse disorder of smooth muscle responsiveness.
Prostacyclin and acetylcholine as screening agents for acute pulmonary vasodilator responsiveness in primary pulmonary hypertension.
Effect of epinephrine and lidocaine therapy on outcome after cardiac arrest due to ventricular fibrillation.
Differentiation of ventricular tachyarrhythmias.
Adaptation to ischemia during percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty. Clinical, hemodynamic, and metabolic features
Intracoronary urokinase for intracoronary thrombus accumulation complicating percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty in acute ischemic syndromes.
Coronary atherosclerosis is associated with left ventricular dysfunction and dilatation in aortic stenosis.
Left ventricular regional wall stress in dilated cardiomyopathy.
Body surface mapping of high-frequency components in the terminal portion during QRS complex for the prediction of ventricular tachycardia in patients with previous myocardial infarction.
Long-term results of catheter ablation of idiopathic right ventricular tachycardia
Area-at-risk determination by technetium-99m-hexakis-2-methoxyisobutyl isonitrile in experimental reperfused myocardial infarction
Effects of brief coronary occlusion and reperfusion on porcine coronary artery reactivity.
Significance of discordant ST alternans in ventricular fibrillation.
Restenosis after balloon angioplasty. A practical proliferative model in porcine coronary arteries.
Fibrinopeptide A is released into the coronary circulation after coronary spasm.
Increased endothelin in experimental heart failure.
Neurologic complications in chronic renal failure: a retrospective study.
Role of cytochrome P-450 in reperfusion injury of the rabbit lung.
Noncoordinate regulation of alpha-1 adrenoreceptor coupling and reexpression of alpha skeletal actin in myocardial infarction-induced left ventricular failure in rats.
Transforming growth factor-beta activity in sheep lung lymph during the development of pulmonary hypertension.
A mutation in the gene for type III procollagen (COL3A1) in a family with aortic aneurysms.
Pathogenesis of hyperadrenergic orthostatic hypotension. Evidence of disordered venous innervation exclusively in the lower limbs.
Mapping of a functional autoimmune epitope on the beta 1-adrenergic receptor in patients with idiopathic dilated cardiomyopathy.
Adverse mortality experience of a southwestern American Indian community: overall death rates and underlying causes of death in Pima Indians.
Is baldness a risk factor for coronary artery disease? A review of the literature.
Protective effect of a novel calcium blocker, S-312-d, on ischemic acute renal failure in rat.
Both d-cis- and l-cis-diltiazem have anti-ischemic action in the isolated, perfused working rat heart.
Interruption of critical aortoiliac collateral circulation during nonvascular operations: a cause of acute limb-threatening ischemia.
Atheroemboli to the lower urinary tract: a marker of atherosclerotic vascular disease--a case report.
One hundred percent oxygen reverses muscle hypoxia in a rat hindlimb model of acute arterial occlusion.
End-stage renal disease--is infrainguinal limb revascularization justified?
Transaortic endarterectomy of renal visceral artery lesions in association with infrarenal aortic surgery.
Combined aortic and visceral arterial reconstruction: risks and results.
Carotid-subclavian bypass--a decade of experience.
The role of carotid screening before coronary artery bypass.
Carotid endarterectomy: a ten-year analysis of outcome and cost of treatment.
The value of pulmonary artery and central venous monitoring in patients undergoing abdominal aortic reconstructive surgery: a comparative study of two selected, randomized groups.
Regression of coronary atherosclerosis during treatment of familial hypercholesterolemia with combined drug regimens.
Beneficial effects of colestipol-niacin on coronary atherosclerosis. A 4-year follow-up.
Relationship of atherosclerosis in young men to serum lipoprotein cholesterol concentrations and smoking. A preliminary report from the Pathobiological Determinants of Atherosclerosis in Youth (PDAY) Research Group
The case against childhood cholesterol screening
A single cholesterol measurement underestimates the risk of coronary heart disease. An empirical example from the Lipid Research Clinics Mortality Follow-up Study.
Cholesterol and coronary heart disease. Future directions.
Experimental retinal branch vein occlusion in miniature pigs induces local tissue hypoxia and vasoproliferative microangiopathy.
Scatter photocoagulation restores tissue hypoxia in experimental vasoproliferative microangiopathy in miniature pigs.
Emergent signs of cancer. Recognizing them early in the office or ER.
Hormone replacement therapy. How to select the best preparation and regimen.
Embolization with particles in thoracic intramedullary arteriovenous malformations: long-term angiographic and clinical results.
Renal artery stenosis: evaluation with color Doppler flow imaging.
Penetrating aortic ulcers: diagnosis with MR imaging.
Inferior vena caval filter thrombi: evaluation with intravascular US.
Iliac artery stenosis and occlusion: preliminary results of treatment with Gianturco expandable metallic stents.
The role of preoperative radionuclide ventriculography in defining outcome after revascularization of the extremity.
Carotid endarterectomy for chronic retinal ischemia.
Regional ischemia in cerebral venous hypertension due to embolic occlusion of the superior sagittal sinus in the rat.
Third ventricle cavernous angioma: report of two cases.
Medical management of congestive heart failure.
A case of lisinopril-induced lithium toxicity
Usefulness of antithrombotic therapy in resting angina pectoris or non-Q-wave myocardial infarction in preventing death and myocardial infarction (a pilot study from the Antithrombotic Therapy in Acute Coronary Syndromes Study Group).
Angiographic progression to total coronary occlusion in hyperlipidemic patients after acute myocardial infarction. POSCH Group.
Ability of calcium-entry blockade by felodipine to disclose different pathogenetic mechanisms behind hyperventilation-induced myocardial ischemia in men.
Long-term prognosis of myocardial ischemia detected by Holter monitoring in peripheral vascular disease.
Usefulness of tomographic thallium-201 imaging for detection of restenosis after percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty.
Coronary artery disease in the octogenarian: angiographic spectrum and suitability for revascularization.
Prevalence and correlates of increased lung/heart ratio of thallium-201 during dipyridamole stress imaging for suspected coronary artery disease.
Sudden death behind the wheel from natural disease in drivers of four-wheeled motorized vehicles.
Changes in plasma free fatty acids and glycerols during prolonged exercise in trained and hypertensive persons taking propranolol and pindolol.
Effects of renin inhibition in systemic hypertension.
Importance of hemodynamic response to therapy in predicting survival with ejection fraction less than or equal to 20% secondary to ischemic or nonischemic dilated cardiomyopathy.
Use of auscultation to follow patients with mitral systolic clicks and murmurs.
Angiocentric lymphoma with histologic features of neoplastic angioendotheliomatosis presenting with predominant respiratory and hematologic manifestations. Report of a case and review of the literature
Sudden death from acute cocaine intoxication in Virginia in 1988.
Cardiogenic hepatorenal syndrome.
Circumferential quantitative analysis of planar 201T1 myocardial scintigraphy in the diagnosis of coronary artery disease.
B-mode imaging and histomorphometric evaluation of carotid atherosclerosis.
Doppler diagnostics, indications, and control of surgical treatment in patients with carotid pathology.
Significance of U wave polarity in patients with a prior inferior myocardial infarction.
Patency rate of implantable devices during long-term intraarterial chemotherapy.
Bronchiolar morphology after systemic arterial interruption.
Steroid anabolic drugs and arterial complications in an athlete--a case history.
Platelet aggregation is not necessary for occurrence of Raynaud's phenomenon: a clinical history and laboratory results.
Large arteries involvement in scleroderma--a case report.
Evaluation of ketotifen in corticosteroid-dependent idiopathic anaphylaxis.
Estrogen replacement and coronary artery disease. Effect on survival in postmenopausal women.
Impact of a public cholesterol screening program.
Venous hemodynamics in a chronic venous valvular insufficiency model.
Cardiac risk in vascular surgery. The oral dipyridamole-thallium stress test.
The natural history of intimal flaps in a canine model.
Biplane transesophageal echocardiography: technique, image orientation, and preliminary experience in 131 patients.
Transesophageal echocardiography in the diagnosis of ostial left coronary artery stenosis.
Transesophageal echocardiography during percutaneous balloon mitral valvuloplasty.
Surgical resection of cor triatriatum in a 74-year-old man. Review of echocardiographic findings with emphasis on Doppler and transesophageal echocardiography.
Transesophageal echocardiography in the diagnosis of left atrial appendage aneurysm.
Severe tricuspid regurgitation after mitral valve repair: diagnosis by intraoperative transesophageal echocardiography.
Evidence of hibernating myocardium by a new transesophageal echocardiographic technique.
Streptococcal endocarditis temporally related to transesophageal echocardiography.
Prevalence of coronary heart disease in Scotland: Scottish Heart Health Study
Transient myocardial ischaemia after acute myocardial infarction.
Relation between intraventricular pressure and volume in diastole.
Operative findings after percutaneous pulmonary balloon dilatation of the right ventricular outflow tract in tetralogy of Fallot.
Tetralogy of Fallot with anomalous pulmonary venous connections: a rare but clinically important association.
Diagnostic echocardiographic features of the sinus venosus defect.
Coarctation of the aorta and post-stenotic aneurysm formation.
Supravalvar aortic stenosis: a complication of aortic valve surgery.
Restoration of sinus rhythm during two consecutive pregnancies in a woman with congenital complete heart block.
Eustachian valve endocarditis.
Balloon dilatation of the mitral valve by a single bifoil (2 x 19 mm) or trefoil (3 x 15 mm) catheter.
Familial paroxysmal kinesigenic ataxia and continuous myokymia.
Interleukin-2-induced lung permeability is mediated by leukotriene B4.
Baroreflex control of renal sympathetic nerve activity is potentiated at early phase of two-kidney, one-clip Goldblatt hypertension in conscious rabbits.
Regional changes in creatine kinase and myocyte size in hypertensive and nonhypertensive cardiac hypertrophy.
Remodeling of the rat right and left ventricles in experimental hypertension.
Chronic calcium channel blockade prevents the progression of myocardial contractile and electrical dysfunction in the cardiomyopathic Syrian hamster.
Enhanced chemiluminescence as a measure of oxygen-derived free radical generation during ischemia and reperfusion.
Collagen phenotypes during development and regression of myocardial hypertrophy in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
Regeneration of myocardial phosphocreatine in pigs despite continued moderate ischemia.
The fat embolism syndrome. A review.
Femoral artery cannulation for monitoring in critically ill children: prospective study.
Platelet-activating factor: evidence against a role in hypoxic pulmonary vasoconstriction.
Cardiac involvement in AIDS.
Use of pulmonary artery catheters in patients with acute myocardial infarction. Analysis of experience in 5,841 patients in the SPRINT Registry. SPRINT Study Group
Diagnostic value of maximal exercise tidal volume.
Systemic hypertension in sleep apnea syndrome. Relationship with sleep architecture and breathing abnormalities.
Optimal interpretation of the supine exercise electrocardiogram in patients with right bundle branch block.
Clinical antecedents to in-hospital cardiopulmonary arrest.
Pulmonary vascular steal in chronic thromboembolic pulmonary hypertension.
Acute myocardial infarction resulting from the migration of a Greenfield filter.
Management of Brucella endocarditis with aortic root abscess.
Influence of obesity, impaired glucose tolerance, and NIDDM on LDL structure and composition. Possible link between hyperinsulinemia and atherosclerosis.
Recognition of hypertension and abnormal blood pressure burden with ambulatory blood pressure recordings in type I diabetes mellitus.
Nephropathy in model combining genetic hypertension with experimental diabetes. Enalapril versus hydralazine and metoprolol therapy.
Should family doctors screen asymptomatic children for high blood pressure?
Brief angiotensin converting enzyme inhibitor treatment in young spontaneously hypertensive rats reduces blood pressure long-term
"White coat" versus "sustained" borderline hypertension in Tecumseh, Michigan
Psychosomatic factors in borderline hypertensive subjects and offspring of hypertensive parents.
Thromboxane A2 and development of genetic hypertension in the Lyon rat strain.
Renal secretion and hepatic clearance of human multiple renin forms.
Role of endothelium in the response to endothelin in hypertension.
Fish oil amplifies the effect of propranolol in mild essential hypertension.
Silent cerebrovascular disease in the elderly. Correlation with ambulatory pressure.
Effect of age on the efficacy of blood pressure treatment strategies.
Insulin resistance and blood pressure in young black men.
Similar frequencies of renin gene restriction fragment length polymorphisms in hypertensive and normotensive subjects.
The surprising kidney-fluid mechanism for pressure control--its infinite gain!
Segmental vascular resistance in postobstructive pulmonary vasculopathy.
Vascular flow capacity of hindlimb skeletal muscles in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
Human dose-response relationship for decompression and endogenous bubble formation.
Experimental cardiac tamponade: correlation of pressure, flow velocity, and echocardiographic changes.
Production of thrombi on intact endothelium by use of antiheparin agents in vivo.
Temporal arteritis presenting as a submandibular swelling.
Rigid spine syndrome with respiratory failure.
Clues to the electrocardiographic diagnosis of subtle Wolff-Parkinson-White syndrome in children.
Hypoplastic transverse arch and coarctation in neonates. Surgical reconstruction of the aortic arch: a study of sixty-six patients.
A comparison of coarctation resection and subclavian flap angioplasty using ultrasonographically monitored postocclusive reactive hyperemia
Studies of myocardial protection in the immature heart. I. Enhanced tolerance of immature versus adult myocardium to global ischemia with reference to metabolic differences.
Studies of myocardial protection in the immature heart. II. Evidence for importance of amino acid metabolism in tolerance to ischemia.
Warm induction blood cardioplegia in the infant. A technique to avoid rapid cooling myocardial contracture.
Long-term cardiopulmonary bypass by peripheral cannulation in a model of total heart failure. The decompression of the left heart through a percutaneous helical spring positioned within the lumen of the tricuspid and pulmonary artery valves.
Efficacy and safety of low- and high-dose sotalol versus propranolol in the prevention of supraventricular tachyarrhythmias early after coronary artery bypass operations.
Echocardiographic evaluation of patients with clinically suspected arterial emboli.
Association of perioperative myocardial ischemia with cardiac morbidity and mortality in men undergoing noncardiac surgery. The Study of Perioperative Ischemia Research Group
Conjugal temporal arteritis.
Lovastatin decreases coenzyme Q levels in humans.
Evaluation of metastatic cardiac calcification in a model of chronic primary hyperparathyroidism.
Cardiac calcific deposits in patients with primary hyperparathyroidism: preliminary results of a prospective echocardiographic study.
Screening 1140 fifth graders for hypercholesterolemia: family history inadequate to predict results
The relation of serum cholesterol to risk of coronary heart disease: implications for the elderly.
Penetration of the pericardium by a gastric ulcer--survival after pericardiocentesis.
Development and prospective application of quantitative 2-day stress-rest Tc-99m methoxy isobutyl isonitrile SPECT for the diagnosis of coronary artery disease.
Clinical characteristics and coronary angiographic findings of patients with unstable angina, acute myocardial infarction, and survivors of sudden ischemic death occurring during and after sport.
Effects of exercise on myocardial catecholamine content and ischemic injury in dogs with gradual coronary occlusion.
The estimation of post-test probability of coronary disease following exercise testing using the sequential application of two Bayesian methods.
Follow-up results of balloon angioplasty of native coarctation in neonates and infants.
Immediate and follow-up results of balloon angioplasty of postoperative recoarctation in infants and children.
Clinical evaluation of high-frequency (ultrasonic) mechanical debridement in the surgical treatment of calcific aortic stenosis.
Clinical and electrophysiological characteristics of ventricular tachycardia in children with normal hearts.
The long-term prognosis of patients with out-of-hospital cardiac arrest but no inducible ventricular tachycardia.
The role of beta-blockade therapy for ventricular tachycardia induced with isoproterenol: a prospective analysis.
Rapid control of refractory atrial tachyarrhythmias with high-dose oral amiodarone.
Double-peaking circadian variation in the occurrence of sustained supraventricular tachyarrhythmias.
The incidence of myocarditis in endomyocardial biopsy samples from patients with congestive heart failure.
Effect of delayed captopril therapy on left ventricular mass and myonecrosis during acute coxsackievirus murine myocarditis.
Effects of xamoterol on inotropic and lusitropic properties of the human myocardium and on adenylate cyclase activity.
Pericardial effusion in primary hypothyroidism.
New calcium antagonists: relevance of vasoselectivity.
Peripheral arterial occlusive disease of the extremities in the United States: hospitalization and mortality.
Epidemiologic aspects of heart failure.
Can heart failure be prevented, delayed, or reversed?
Regional blood flow supply and demand in heart failure.
Compensation and overcompensation in congestive heart failure.
Medical management of chronic heart failure: inotropic, vasodilator, or inodilator drugs?
Physiology and pharmacology of cardiovascular catecholamine receptors: implications for treatment of chronic heart failure.
How to select a drug for the long-term treatment of chronic heart failure.
The placebo effect in heart failure.
Efficacy of ibopamine in the treatment of heart failure.
Cardioprotective effects of amlodipine on ischemia and reperfusion in two experimental models.
Role of echocardiography in acute myocardial infarction.
Progress in cardioprotection: the role of calcium antagonists.
Protecting the vasculature: an eye toward the future.
Bone mineral density in spontaneous hypertension: differential effects of dietary calcium and sodium.
Possible triggering of paroxysmal atrial fibrillation in normal hearts by psychological stressors: a report of two cases.
Incidence of perioperative myocardial ischemia detected by different electrocardiographic systems
Effect of halothane and isoflurane on postischemic "stunned" myocardium in the dog.
Intravenous nicardipine: an effective new agent for the treatment of severe hypertension.
Calcium antagonists in the management of patients with aneurysmal subarachnoid hemorrhage: a review.
Cardiovascular effects of nicardipine.
Postoperative hypertension: a prospective, placebo-controlled, randomized, double-blind trial, with intravenous nicardipine hydrochloride.
Anterior segment ischemia: a complication of retinal detachment repair in a patient with sickle cell trait.
Central retinal artery obstruction in herpes zoster ophthalmicus and cerebral vasculopathy.
Kawasaki disease: echocardiographic features in 91 cases presenting in the United Kingdom.
Severe hypertension after liver transplantation in alpha 1 antitrypsin deficiency.
Central nervous system vasculitis after chickenpox--cause or coincidence?
Patient profiling: individualization of hypertension therapy.
Acute pulmonary oedema following administration of ornithine-8-vasopressin.
Comparison of pulse oximeters: accuracy at low arterial pressure in volunteers.
Non-invasive monitoring of finger arterial pressure in patients with Raynaud's phenomenon: effects of exposure to cold.
Preanaesthetic medication with clonidine.
Sinus arrest induced by trivial nasal stimulation during alfentanil-nitrous oxide anaesthesia.
Anaesthetic hazards of aortocaval fistula.
Conjunctival involvement in pemphigus vulgaris: a clinical, histopathological and immunofluorescence study.
Treatment of severe acne with isotretinoin in patients with inflammatory bowel disease.
The population mean predicts the number of deviant individuals
Combined alpha/beta-blockade versus beta 1-selective blockade in essential hypertension in black and white patients.
Elevated plasma noradrenaline concentrations in patients with low-output cardiac failure: dependence on increased noradrenaline secretion rates.
Pineal hyperactivity in spontaneously hypertensive rats: muscarinic regulation of indole metabolism.
Evidence for abnormal Na+/H+ antiport activity detected by phosphorus nuclear magnetic resonance spectroscopy in exercising skeletal muscle of patients with essential hypertension.
Stimulation of active renin release in normal and hypertensive pregnancy.
Vascular hypertrophy, renin and blood pressure in the young spontaneously hypertensive rat.
Symptomatic pericardial effusion in breast cancer patients: the role of fluid cytology.
Central retinal vein obstruction and axial length.
Delayed detection of coarctation in infancy: implications for timing of newborn follow-up.
Response to diet and cholestyramine in a patient with sitosterolemia.
Femorofemoral bypass: a profile of graft failure.
Deep femoral to anterior tibial bypass after failed femoropopliteal reconstructions.
Angiodysplasia: characterization, diagnosis, and advances in treatment.
Apical hypertrophic cardiomyopathy in a non-Oriental man.
Pheochromocytoma and acute myocardial infarction.
Cerebrospinal fluid endothelin-1 and endothelin-3 levels in normal and neurosurgical patients: a clinical study and literature review.
Multiple arterial fenestrations, multiple aneurysms, and an arteriovenous malformation in a patient with subarachnoid hemorrhage.
Changes in myocardial ischemic threshold during daily activities.
Determinants and significance of diltiazem plasma concentrations after acute myocardial infarction. The Multicenter Diltiazem Postinfarction Trial Research Group.
Prehospital thrombolysis in acute myocardial infarction.
Acute myocardial infarction and chest pain syndromes after cocaine use.
Comparison of thallium-201 and technetium-99m hexakis 2-methoxyisobutyl isonitrile single-photon emission computed tomography for estimating the extent of myocardial ischemia and infarction in coronary artery disease.
Recanalization of chronic total coronary arterial occlusions by percutaneous excimer-laser and laser-assisted angioplasty.
Temporal relation between left ventricular dysfunction and chest pain in coronary artery disease during activities of daily living.
Recanalization of chronic, totally occluded coronary arteries by new angioplasty systems.
Arterial vasodilator effects of the dihydropyridine calcium antagonist amlodipine alone and in combination with verapamil in systemic hypertension.
Left ventricular filling impairment in asymptomatic chronic alcoholics.
Physiologic peripheral pulmonic stenosis in infancy.
Coronary arteries in truncus arteriosus.
Spectrum of hemodynamic changes in cardiac tamponade.
Transesophageal echocardiography in critically ill patients.
Major depression, panic disorder, and mitral valve prolapse in patients who complain of chest pain.
Cigarette smoking, adiposity, non-insulin-dependent diabetes, and coronary heart disease in Japanese-American men.
Aspirin in the primary prevention of angina pectoris in a randomized trial of United States physicians.
Admission and mid-stay MedisGroups scores as predictors of death within 30 days of hospital admission.
Arterial abnormalities of the hand in athletes.
Edgar J Poth lecture. Pathogenesis, diagnosis, and treatment of thrombosis.
The "all-autogenous" tissue policy for infrainguinal reconstruction questioned.
In vitro and in vivo evaluation of intraluminal ultrasound in normal and atherosclerotic arteries.
Current status of duplex Doppler ultrasound in the examination of the abdominal vasculature.
Stunned myocardium during extracorporeal membrane oxygenation.
Life-threatening complications during anaesthesia in a patient with a ventriculo-atrial shunt and pulmonary hypertension [published erratum appears in Anaesthesia 1991 Mar;46(3):241]
Embolism during caesarean section.
Isolated lung transplantation for pulmonary fibrosis.
Circulating plasma platelet activating factor in persistent pulmonary hypertension of the newborn.
Alpha 1-antichymotrypsin as a possible biochemical marker for Alzheimer-type dementia.
An analysis of outcome following percutaneous transluminal coronary artery angioplasty. An autopsy series.
Overestimation of myocardial infarct size by histologic measurement in a model of occlusion followed by reperfusion.
Pulmonary capillaritis and glomerulonephritis in an antineutrophil cytoplasmic antibody-positive patient with prior granulomatous aortitis.
Disseminated Conidiobolus infection with endocarditis in a cocaine abuser.
Cumulative AIDS incidence and altered mortality from bacterial infections.
The real impact of mechanical bridge strategy in patients with severe acute infarction.
Complement activation and use of a cell saver in cardiopulmonary bypass.
Differential light scattering cuvettes for the measurement of thromboemboli in high shear blood flow systems.
Effects of retrovenous myocardial drug delivery after coronary artery occlusion in sheep.
Cardiac arrest after hypertonic citrate anticoagulation for chronic hemodialysis.
Design mediated thrombus reduction in the Utah-100 total artificial heart.
Estimation of Reynolds stresses within the Penn State left ventricular assist device.
Low-dose heparinization can be used with DEAE-cellulose hemodialysis membranes.
In vivo rheologic effects of lipid apheresis techniques: comparison of dextran sulfate LDL adsorption and heparin induced LDL precipitation.
(A)typical symptoms during single needle dialysis.
Events following implantation of an intraluminal ringed prosthesis in the ascending, transverse, and descending thoracic aorta.
In vitro and in vivo testing of a new valved intravascular catheter design.
In vitro and in vivo evaluation of a right ventricular assist device.
Pulmonary artery counterpulsation with a skeletal muscle power source.
Novacor left ventricular assist filling and ejection in the presence of device complications.
Limitation of myocardial infarct size by a right ventricular assist device.
A novel mechanical cardiac assist device for reversing left ventricular failure.
Change in sympathetic activity before, during, and after dialysis-induced hypotension.
ECMO assisted angioplasty for cardiomyopathy patients with unstable angina.
Bioenergetic recovery processes of injured myocardium.
Additional salutary hemodynamic effects of the combined use of the paraaortic counterpulsation device and intraaortic balloon pump versus a paraaortic counterpulsation device alone.
A composite driving system for LVAS and IABP: practical and effective driving and weaning.
Hemodynamic effects of a new right ventricular assist device.
Light scattering detection of microemboli in an extracorporeal LVAD bovine model.
Comparison of right ventricular and biventricular circulatory support in a porcine model of right heart failure.
Thromboembolytic complications during circulatory assistance with a centrifugal pump in patients with valvular prostheses.
Hemodynamic influence of LVAD on right ventricular failure.
Left ventricular versus left atrial cannulation for the Thoratec ventricular assist device.
Early and late tamponade with the Novacor left ventricular assist system.
Prognosis of hospital survivors after salvage from cardiopulmonary bypass with centrifugal cardiac assist.
Experience with the Sarns centrifugal pump as a ventricular assist device.
Hemopump ventricular support for patients undergoing high risk coronary angioplasty.
Improved survival after Hemopump insertion in patients experiencing postcardiotomy cardiogenic shock during cardiopulmonary bypass.
Hemopump support for the failing heart.
Clinical experience with the Nimbus pump.
A blood-liquid interface for prolonged extracorporeal oxygenation with excellent antithrombogenicity.
Increase of intraplatelet free calcium ion during extracorporeal circulation with a hollow fiber oxygenator: arterial filter and dynamics of platelet thrombosis on oxygenator and filter in a pig model.
LVAS pump performance following initiation of left ventricular assistance.
Clinical use of the Berlin Biventricular Assist Device as a bridge to transplantation.
Multi-institutional evaluation of the Tokyo University Ventricular Assist System.
Thrombus in a natural left ventricle during left ventricular assist: another thromboembolic risk factor.
Effect of a leukocyte-platelet removal filter on ischemia induced reperfusion injury.
The dynamics of platelet thrombus formation rate, thrombus retention time, and rate of embolization on a control and heparin bonded polyurethane angio-catheter.
Recombinant human erythropoietin does not increase clotting in vascular accesses.
Socioeconomic conditions in childhood and ischaemic heart disease during middle age
Pancreatic ischaemia in experimental acute pancreatitis: mechanism, significance and therapy.
Surgical presentation of Kawasaki disease (mucocutaneous lymph node syndrome).
Buerger's colour.
Plasma therapy for severe hemolytic-uremic syndrome in children in Atlantic Canada.
Cardiovascular response of a continuous variable rate alfentanil infusion for abdominal aortic surgery.
Post-cannulation radial artery aneurysm--a rare complication.
Crico-tracheal disruption and common carotid artery occlusion: a case of blunt trauma.
The effect of intravenous fixed-dose heparin during total hip arthroplasty on the incidence of deep-vein thrombosis. A randomized, double-blind trial in patients operated on with epidural anesthesia and controlled hypotension.
Increased rat cardiac angiotensin converting enzyme activity and mRNA expression in pressure overload left ventricular hypertrophy. Effects on coronary resistance, contractility, and relaxation.
Clinical association of autoantibodies to fibrillarin with diffuse scleroderma and disseminated telangiectasia.
Coronary angioplasty in young adults: initial results and late outcome.
Decreased operative risk of surgical treatment of mitral regurgitation with or without coronary artery disease.
Apical segmental dysfunction in hypertrophic cardiomyopathy: subgroup with unique clinical features.
Contrast echocardiographic mapping of collateralized myocardium in humans before and after coronary angioplasty
Ventricular stroke work loss: validation of a method of quantifying the severity of aortic stenosis and derivation of an orifice formula
Reduced atrial contribution to left ventricular filling in patients with severe tricuspid regurgitation after tricuspid valvulectomy: a Doppler echocardiographic study.
Origin and significance of diastolic Doppler flow signals in the left ventricular outflow tract.
Noninvasive detection of patients with ischemic and nonischemic heart disease prone to ventricular fibrillation.
Restenosis after directional coronary atherectomy: differences between primary atheromatous and restenosis lesions and influence of subintimal tissue resection.
Reduction in incidence of inducible ventricular tachycardia after myocardial infarction by treatment with streptokinase during infarct evolution.
Effect of antiarrhythmic therapy on mortality in survivors of myocardial infarction with asymptomatic complex ventricular arrhythmias: Basel Antiarrhythmic Study of Infarct Survival (BASIS)
Effects of nicardipine, a calcium antagonist, on myocardial salvage and high energy phosphate stores in reperfused myocardial injury.
Hemodynamic efficacy of rapid saline infusion and dobutamine versus saline infusion alone in a model of cardiac rupture.
Alterations in endocardial vascular resistance after reperfusion in a low flow, high demand model of ischemia: effects of dipyridamole and WEB-2086, a platelet-activating factor antagonist.
Effects of dipyridamole and aminophylline on hemodynamics, regional myocardial blood flow and thallium-201 washout in the setting of a critical coronary stenosis.
Early readmission of elderly patients with congestive heart failure.
Sudden death associated with undiagnosed Graves' disease.
The electrocardiogram in chronic obstructive pulmonary disease.
Are blood pressure levels increasing in Denmark?
Coronary artery disease in Chinese males without hypercholesterolaemia
Ischaemic heart disease among men in Norway during the period 1966-1985: two counties with different mortality time trends.
Elevation of skeletal muscle isoform of serum creatine kinase in heterozygous familial hypercholesterolaemia.
Nisoldipine--effects on the renin-angiotensin-aldosterone system and catecholamines. Studies in normotensive and hypertensive subjects.
Components of delay time in suspected acute myocardial infarction with particular emphasis on patient delay.
Retroperitoneal fibrosis after surgery for aortic aneurysm in a patient with periarteritis nodosa: successful treatment with corticosteroids.
Reliability of death certificate diagnoses.
Prevalence of Raynaud phenomenon in the adult population of South Carolina.
An inconsistent relationship between insulin and blood pressure in three Pacific island populations.
Alcohol consumption and blood pressure: a comparison of native Japanese to American men.
Orthostatic hypotension in human immunodeficiency virus infection may be the result of generalized autonomic nervous system dysfunction.
Restricted dose and duration of corticosteroid treatment in patients with polymyalgia rheumatica and temporal arteritis.
Severe cerebral and systemic necrotizing vasculitis developing during pregnancy in a case of systemic lupus erythematosus.
A lethal complication of papaverine-induced priapism.
Nimodipine after resuscitation from out-of-hospital ventricular fibrillation. A placebo-controlled, double-blind, randomized trial.
Deficiency of calcitonin gene-related peptide in Raynaud's phenomenon.
Angiographic follow-up after placement of a self-expanding coronary-artery stent
An epidemiologic study of abuse of analgesic drugs. Effects of phenacetin and salicylate on mortality and cardiovascular morbidity (1968 to 1987)
The effects of epidural anesthesia on the Doppler velocimetry of umbilical and uterine arteries in normal and hypertensive patients during active term labor.
Reduced frequency of hypertensive disorders in placenta previa
The risk for systemic vascular diseases and mortality in patients with central retinal vein occlusion.
Evaluation of argon laser surgery in children under 13 years of age.
Detection of vascular complications in renal allografts with color Doppler flow imaging.
Translumbar arch aortography: a retrospective controlled study of usefulness, technique, and safety.
Valve and great vessel stenosis: assessment with MR jet velocity mapping.
Pharmacomechanical thrombolysis and angioplasty in the management of clotted hemodialysis grafts: early and late clinical results.
Effects of long-term verapamil therapy on serum lipids and other metabolic parameters.
Anti-atherosclerotic and vasculoprotective actions of calcium antagonists.
Secondary prevention with verapamil after myocardial infarction. The Danish Study Group on Verapamil in Myocardial Infarction.
Relation between lipids and atherosclerosis: epidemiologic evidence and clinical implications.
Low-dose aspirin. II. Relationship of angiotensin II pressor responses, circulating eicosanoids, and pregnancy outcome.
Maternal and uteroplacental hemodynamic effects of chronic captopril in the hypertensive, term-pregnant rat.
Oral contraception in disease states.
Effects of hydralazine and prostaglandin E1 on regional myocardial function in the ischemic canine heart.
Steal-prone coronary anatomy and myocardial ischemia associated with four primary anesthetic agents in humans.
An increase in plasma cholesterol independent of thyroid function during long-term amiodarone therapy. A dose-dependent relationship.
Outcome of prophylactic therapy for idiopathic anaphylaxis.
IgD immune complex vasculitis in a patient with hyperimmunoglobulinemia D and periodic fever.
The effects of tumor necrosis factor on intestinal structure and metabolism.
Evidence for tumor necrosis factor-induced pulmonary microvascular injury after intestinal ischemia-reperfusion injury.
Treatment of patients with aortic dissection presenting with peripheral vascular complications.
Involvement of thromboxane and neutrophils in multiple-system organ edema with interleukin-2.
Cardiac rehabilitation after coronary artery bypass grafting: effects on exercise performance and risk factors.
A frameshift mutation leading to type 1 antithrombin deficiency and thrombosis.
Streptococcal antibody cross-reactivity with HLA-DR4+VE B-lymphocytes. Basis of the DR4 associated genetic predisposition to rheumatic fever and rheumatic heart disease? [published erratum appears in Br J Rheumatol 1991 Jun;30(3):222]
Ultrasound demonstration of a superior mesenteric artery aneurysm in a patient with Ehlers-Danlos syndrome.
Cardiac myosin-induced myocarditis. Heart autoantibodies are not involved in the induction of the disease.
Occlusion of an "accessory" distal anterior cerebral artery during treatment of anterior communicating artery aneurysms. Report of two cases.
Risks factors for cerebral infarction in good-grade patients after aneurysmal subarachnoid hemorrhage and surgery: a prospective study.
Reduced platelet aggregability and thromboxane release after rebleeding in patients with subarachnoid hemorrhage.
Long-term effects of nimodipine on cerebral infarcts and outcome after aneurysmal subarachnoid hemorrhage and surgery.
The effect of alcohol in isolated blunt splenic trauma.
Conservative management of aortic lacerations due to blunt trauma.
Carotid-esophageal fistula following a penetrating neck injury: case report.
Intra-aortic balloon pump for combined myocardial contusion and thoracic aortic rupture.
Thiazide diuretics and the risk of hip fracture. Results from the Framingham Study.
Circadian variations in myocardial ischemia. Implications for management.
The renin-angiotensin system and renal function in kidney transplantation.
Angiotensin I-forming angiotensinogenases in extrarenal vasculature and in the kidney.
Role of angiotensin in the renal vasoconstriction observed during the development of genetic hypertension.
Influences of angiotensin on renal function in renal vascular hypertension.
Sustained increased cerebral blood flow with prophylactic hypertensive hypervolemic hemodilution ("triple-H" therapy) after subarachnoid hemorrhage.
Entrapment neuropathy of the median nerve at the level of the ligament of Struthers.
Surgical resection of intrinsic brain stem lesions: an overview.
Carotid-cavernous sinus fistula associated with a primitive trigeminal artery.
A detachable balloon procedure for a traumatic internal carotid-internal jugular fistula: report of a case
Diagnosis and management of familial dyslipoproteinemia in children and adolescents.
Stridor: intracranial pathology causing postextubation vocal cord paralysis.
Relationship between duration of spinal cord ischemia and postoperative neurologic deficits in animals.
Relationship among level of distraction, evoked potentials, spinal cord ischemia and integrity, and clinical status in animals.
Greenfield filter as primary therapy for deep venous thrombosis and/or pulmonary embolism in patients with cancer.
Therapy of diseased stroke-prone spontaneously hypertensive rats with nimodipine.
Efficacy of nimodipine in cerebral ischemia or hemorrhage.
Thromboxane biosynthesis in cardiovascular diseases.
Effect of Bay U 3405, a new thromboxane antagonist, on collagen-induced thromboembolism in rabbits.
Effects of the novel thromboxane antagonist Bay U 3405 on experimental coronary artery disease.
Relevance of focal cerebral ischemia models. Experience with fibrinolytic agents.
Aspirin reduces the growth of medial and neointimal thickenings in balloon-injured rat carotid arteries.
Effects of dietary calcium on nimodipine-sensitive calcium channel function in stroke-prone spontaneously hypertensive rats.
Effect of naproxen and sulindac on blood pressure response to atenolol.
Toxic carbamazepine concentrations following cardiothoracic surgery and myocardial infarction.
HIV-associated myocarditis. Pathology and immunopathology.
High-dose epinephrine improves outcome from pediatric cardiac arrest.
Evaluation and management of supraventricular tachycardia in children.
Systemic atropine administration during cardiac arrest does not cause fixed and dilated pupils.
Echocardiographic left ventricular mass and electrolyte intake predict arterial hypertension.
National Education Programs Working Group report on the management of patients with hypertension and high blood cholesterol.
Noninvasive detection of occlusive disease of the carotid siphon and middle cerebral artery.
Cutaneous vasculitis associated with pheochromocytoma.
Complete heart block and severe aortic incompetence in relapsing polychondritis: clinicopathologic findings.
Ventricular tachycardia in two patients with AIDS receiving ganciclovir (DHPG).
New angiotensin converting enzyme inhibitors. Their role in the management of hypertension.
Renal protective effects of angiotensin converting enzyme inhibitors.
Use of quinapril in the elderly patient.
Quinapril in chronic heart failure.
Elevated insulin, norepinephrine, and neuropeptide Y in hypertension.
Immunohistochemical study of vascular lesions in severe hypertension induced by DOCA and salt administration to spontaneously hypertensive rats.
Dietary calcium, vascular reactivity, and genetic hypertension in the Lyon rat strain.
Sodium sensitive and sodium retaining hypertension.
Hemodynamic and endocrine effects of mental stress in untreated borderline hypertension.
The role of protein kinase C and calcium in the regulation of norepinephrine release from the vascular adrenergic neurons in hypertension.
Vascular renin and hypertension. Uptake versus synthesis.
Role of basic fibroblast growth factor in vascular lesion formation.
Myocardial capillary permeability after regional ischemia and reperfusion in the in vivo canine heart. Effect of superoxide dismutase.
Adenine nucleotide changes in kidney, liver, and small intestine during different forms of ischemic injury.
Restoration by insulin of impaired prostaglandin E1/I2 receptor activity of platelets in acute ischemic heart disease.
Mechanism of early ischemic contractile failure. Inexcitability, metabolite accumulation, or vascular collapse?
Significance of the number of stimuli to initiate ouabain-induced arrhythmias in the intact heart.
[Ca2+]i transients in the cardiomyopathic hamster heart.
Effect of preconditioning ischemia on reperfusion arrhythmias after coronary artery occlusion and reperfusion in the rat.
Passive smoking and heart disease. Epidemiology, physiology, and biochemistry.
Multicenter patency trial of intravenous anistreplase compared with streptokinase in acute myocardial infarction. The TEAM-2 Study Investigators.
Nd:YAG laser with sapphire tip combined with balloon angioplasty in peripheral arterial occlusions. Long-term results
Clinical experience with the Palmaz-Schatz coronary stent. Initial results of a multicenter study.
Detection of patients at risk for paroxysmal atrial fibrillation during sinus rhythm by P wave-triggered signal-averaged electrocardiogram.
Doppler echocardiographic assessment of the St. Jude Medical prosthetic valve in the aortic position using the continuity equation.
In vivo technetium-99m S12 antibody imaging of platelet alpha-granules in rabbit endothelial neointimal proliferation after angioplasty.
Reduction of myocardial reperfusion injury by intravenous adenosine administered during the early reperfusion period.
Influence of hypoxia on adrenergic modulation of triggered activity in isolated adult canine myocytes.
Identification of viable myocardium in patients with chronic coronary artery disease and left ventricular dysfunction. Comparison of thallium scintigraphy with reinjection and PET imaging with 18F-fluorodeoxyglucose
Analysis of baroreflex control of heart rate in conscious dogs with pacing-induced heart failure.
Reentrant ventricular arrhythmias in the late myocardial infarction period: mechanism by which a short-long-short cardiac sequence facilitates the induction of reentry.
In vitro and in vivo effects within the coronary sinus of nonarcing and arcing shocks using a new system of low-energy DC ablation.
Ischemic heart disease and platelet aggregation. The Caerphilly Collaborative Heart Disease Study.
Myocardial infarction in Mexican-Americans and non-Hispanic whites. The San Antonio Heart Study.
Diltiazem increases late-onset congestive heart failure in postinfarction patients with early reduction in ejection fraction. The Adverse Experience Committee; and the Multicenter Diltiazem Postinfarction Research Group
Transesophageal Doppler echocardiography evaluation of coronary blood flow velocity in baseline conditions and during dipyridamole-induced coronary vasodilation
Diagnosis of noninfective cardiac mass lesions by two-dimensional echocardiography. Comparison of the transthoracic and transesophageal approaches.
Regurgitant jet size by transesophageal compared with transthoracic Doppler color flow imaging.
Elevated pulmonary artery pressure. An independent predictor of mortality.
Renal vein thrombosis. Initial manifestation of Goodpasture's syndrome.
Magnetic resonance imaging--the evaluation of choice in residual shunt after congenital heart disease surgery?
Nonsurgical treatment of Histoplasma endocarditis involving a bioprosthetic valve.
Angiotensin-converting enzyme inhibitors and cough. Prevalence in an outpatient medical clinic population.
Safety and efficacy of thrombolytic therapy for superior vena cava syndrome
Complications of general anesthesia for Nd:YAG laser resection of endobronchial tumors.
Cellular immunodeficiency in protein-losing enteropathy. Predominant reduction of CD3+ and CD4+ lymphocytes.
Diabetic cardiomyopathy.
Hypertension and diabetes in blacks.
Risk factors for gestational diabetes in black population.
Diabetic retinopathy in blacks.
Metabolic and health complications of obesity.
Pulmonary hypertension complicating portal hypertension: prevalence and relation to splanchnic hemodynamics.
Calcium channel blockers in geriatric hypertension.
Congestive heart failure: a current overview.
Training increases muscle blood flow in rats with peripheral arterial insufficiency.
Effect of synchronous increase in intrathoracic pressure on cardiac performance during acute endotoxemia.
Paradoxical embolism: an underestimated entity. A plea for comprehensive work-up.
The association of carotid artery stenosis with carotid sinus hypersensitivity. Transitory cerebral ischaemic attack provoked by carotid sinus reflex
Large diameter expanded polytetrafluoroethylene grafts for infrarenal aortic aneurysm surgery.
Splenorenal arterial shunt in the treatment of renovascular hypertension. Approach by a lumbar-retroperitoneal incision.
Pseudoaneurysm: diagnosis with color Doppler ultrasound.
Clinical results of femoropopliteal bypass using externally supported (EXS) Dacron grafts: with a comparison of above- and below-knee anastomosis.
Superficial femoral artery as inflow for bypass to the proximal popliteal artery.
Crural artery bypass with adjunctive arteriovenous fistula. A modification in distal anastomosis.
Venous dysfunction of late pregnancy persists after delivery.
A rare case of renovascular hypertension due to iatrogenic thoracoabdominal aortic dissection. A report of successful surgical treatment in childhood.
Campylobacter fetus infection of abdominal aortic aneurysm.
Parenteral illegal drug use and limb loss.
Femoral saphenous vein bypass in a newborn.
Preoperative evaluation and surgical treatment for tricuspid regurgitation associated with acquired valvular heart disease. The Kay-Boyd method vs the Carpentier-Edwards ring method.
New quantitative method for evaluating tricuspid regurgitation.
Repetitive intraoperative mapping and cryotherapy improve the results of endocardial resection for ventricular tachycardia.
Surgical indication for aortic arch hypoplasia in infants.
Anomalous origin of the left coronary artery from the pulmonary artery. Surgical alternatives depending of the age of the patient.
Infective endocarditis and an embolomycotic aneurysm in a 25-month-old child.
Annulo-aortic ectasia with DeBakey type II dissecting aneurysm in Gaucher's disease.
Repair of coarctation with persistent fifth arterial arch and atresia of the fourth aortic arch.
The use of PTFE graft to correct anomalous drainage of persistent left superior vena cava.
Rapid expression of heat shock protein in the rabbit after brief cardiac ischemia.
Loss of endothelium-dependent relaxant activity in the pulmonary circulation of rats exposed to chronic hypoxia.
Urticaria: current therapy.
Physician practice for cardiovascular disease risk-factor reduction in six upper Midwestern communities.
Payment mechanism and patterns of use of medical services: the example of hypertension.
Association between post-dexamethasone cortisol level and blood pressure in depressed inpatients.
Free and peptide-bound amino acids as indicators of ischemic damage of the rabbit spinal cord.
Cardiopulmonary resuscitation and the patient with cancer.
Selective vasopressin inhibition in rats with heart failure decreases afterload and results in venodilatation.
Effect of local inhibition of gamma-aminobutyric acid uptake in the dorsomedial hypothalamus on extracellular levels of gamma-aminobutyric acid and on stress-induced tachycardia: a study using microdialysis.
Pharmacologic activity of bepafant (WEB 2170), a new and selective hetrazepinoic antagonist of platelet activating factor.
The J-curve phenomenon and the treatment of hypertension. Is there a point beyond which pressure reduction is dangerous?
Risk of angina pectoris and plasma concentrations of vitamins A, C, and E and carotene
Migraine and vertebrobasilar ischemia.
Blood pressure measurements during dental checkups representative of 26-hour registration.
Hemorrhoids. A practical approach to an aggravating problem.
Assessment of stable ischemic heart disease. Which tests are best for which patients?
Cryoglobulinemia induced by a murine IgG3 rheumatoid factor: skin vasculitis and glomerulonephritis arise from distinct pathogenic mechanisms.
Prevalence of hemodynamically significant stenosis of the carotid artery in an asymptomatic veteran population.
Prophylaxis of deep venous thrombosis after acute abdominal operation.
Natural history of progressive ischemic stroke in a population treated with heparin
The syndrome of bilateral hemispheric border zone ischemia.
Diagnostic significance of flow separation within the carotid bifurcation demonstrated by digital subtraction angiography.
Correlation between amino acid release and neuropathologic outcome in rat brain following middle cerebral artery occlusion.
Rupture of atheromatous plaque as a cause of thrombotic occlusion of stenotic internal carotid artery.
Angiographic contrast media interference with laser-induced fluorescence excitation and detection in atherosclerotic human coronary arteries.
Normalization of Doppler indices of diastolic dysfunction during pacing is a sign of ischemic mitral regurgitation.
Coronary angioplasty of diffuse coronary artery disease.
High output failure in patients with peripartum cardiomyopathy: a comparative study with dilated cardiomyopathy.
Pulse rate, coronary heart disease, and death: the NHANES I Epidemiologic Follow-up Study.
A randomized controlled trial of allopurinol in coronary bypass surgery.
The utility of echocardiography in the diagnostic strategy of postinfarction ventricular septal rupture: a comparison of two-dimensional echocardiography versus Doppler color flow imaging.
Dipyridamole perfusion scintigraphy: the experience with its application in one hundred seventy patients with known or suspected unstable angina.
Myocardial metabolic and hemodynamic effects of a sustained intravenous infusion of nifedipine with and without metoprolol in patients with unstable angina.
Incidence and clinical significance of ST segment elevation after electrical cardioversion of atrial fibrillation and atrial flutter.
Fragmented atrial activity in patients with transient atrial fibrillation.
Increasing the yield of ventricular tachycardia induction: a prospective, randomized comparative study of the standard ventricular stimulation protocol to a short-to-long protocol and a new two-site protocol.
Prognosis of patients with ventricular tachycardia or fibrillation and a normal electrophysiologic study.
Syncope of unknown origin: clinical, noninvasive, and electrophysiologic determinants of arrhythmia induction and symptom recurrence during long-term follow-up.
Electrocardiographic and antiarrhythmic effects of intravenous amiodarone: results of a prospective, placebo-controlled study.
Electrophysiologic characteristics of manifest and latent retrograde conduction in dogs.
Management of multiple risk factors for coronary heart disease in patients with hypertension.
Effects of doxazosin on serum lipids: a review of the clinical data and molecular basis for altered lipid metabolism.
Preliminary results of the Norwegian doxazosin postmarketing surveillance study: a twelve-week experience.
Doxazosin: a study in a cohort of patients with hypertension in general practice--an interim report.
An open, noncomparative study of doxazosin in essential hypertension: experience in general practice in The Netherlands.
Doxazosin and atenolol as monotherapy in mild and moderate hypertension: a randomized, parallel study with a three-year follow-up.
Efficacy of doxazosin in specific hypertensive patient groups.
Cardiovascular disease risk profiles.
Double-blind comparison of doxazosin and enalapril in patients with mild or moderate essential hypertension.
A double-blind comparative study of doxazosin and prazosin when administered with beta-blockers or diuretics.
The addition of doxazosin to the treatment regimen of patients with hypertension not adequately controlled by beta-blockers.
A double-blind comparative study of doxazosin and prazosin in the treatment of essential hypertension.
Clinical experience with doxazosin in general medical practice in New Zealand.
Doxazosin in the treatment of essential hypertension in general medical practice in Latin America.
A multicenter study of doxazosin in the treatment of essential hypertension in France.
Clinical experience with doxazosin in general medical practice in The Netherlands.
A long-term study of doxazosin in the treatment of mild or moderate essential hypertension in general medical practice.
Doxazosin in the treatment of mild or moderate essential hypertension: an echocardiographic study.
Echocardiographic assessment of doxazosin on left ventricular mass in patients with essential hypertension.
Efficacy and safety of doxazosin in the treatment of patients with mild or moderate essential hypertension and elevated levels of cholesterol.
A multicenter study of doxazosin in the treatment of patients with mild or moderate essential hypertension and concomitant intermittent claudication.
Doxazosin for the treatment of chronic congestive heart failure: results of a randomized double-blind and placebo-controlled study.
The effect of doxazosin on platelet aggregation in normotensive subjects and patients with hypertension: an in vitro study.
Evidence of an antiplatelet aggregation action of doxazosin in patients with hypertension: an ex vivo study.
Vitamin E in gastric mucosal injury induced by ischemia-reperfusion.
Role of oxygen free radicals in ischemic and reperfused myocardium.
Vitamin C and cardiovascular risk factors.
Inverse correlation between plasma vitamin E and mortality from ischemic heart disease in cross-cultural epidemiology.
Follow-up of patients who underwent arterial switch repair for transposition of the great arteries
Family history fails to identify many children with severe hypercholesterolemia.
Marfanoid children. Etiologic heterogeneity and cardiac findings.
On the inheritance of abdominal aortic aneurysm.
The hyperlipidemia of the nephrotic syndrome.
Extracorporeal LDL cholesterol removal: role of LDL-pheresis in combination with other hypolipidemic therapy to regress vascular disease.
Chronic therapy for congestive heart failure with benazepril HCl, a new angiotensin converting enzyme inhibitor.
Renal disease in noninsulin-dependent diabetes mellitus.
Effects of acute alcohol intake on tolerance to hypotension.
Cardiorespiratory effects of antagonism of diazepam sedation with flumazenil in patients with cardiac disease.
Multiple orbital tumors were cavernous hemangiomas.
Liver transplantation in children.
Triiodothyronine in the recovery of stunned myocardium in dogs
Coronary bypass grafting with totally calcified or acutely dissected ascending aorta.
Penetrating trauma involving the innominate artery.
Tricuspid valve papillary fibroelastoma: echocardiographic characterization.
Surgical repair of Wolff-Parkinson-White syndrome complicated with myocardial bridging.
Arterial switch procedure in an adult.
Ascites after rupture of dissecting aortic aneurysm into the right atrium.
Left ventricular aneurysm secondary to Behcet's disease.
Alternative technique for repair of sinus venosus atrial septal defect.
Valve replacement in patients with endocarditis and cerebral septic emboli.
Comparison of supraannular and subannular pledgeted sutures in mitral valve replacement
Right pulmonary artery obstruction after pulmonary artery banding.
Amiodarone versus bretylium for suppression of reperfusion arrhythmias in dogs.
Does cholesterol screening result in negative labeling effects? Results of the Massachusetts Model Systems for Blood Cholesterol Screening Project.
Acute rheumatic fever in West Virginia. Not just a disease of children.
Weight gain at the time of menopause.
Orthostatic hypotension after spinal cord injury: treatment with fludrocortisone and ergotamine.
Silent myocardial ischemia during rehabilitation for cerebrovascular disease.
Lower extremity arterial disease in systemic lupus erythematosus.
Vertebrobasilar occlusion following minor trauma in an 8-year-old boy.
The effects of age and peripheral vascular disease on the circulatory and mechanical response of skin to loading.
Prevention of hypotension following spinal anaesthesia for elective caesarean section by wrapping of the legs.
Massive histamine release in a patient with systemic mastocytosis.
The cancer experience in the Framingham Heart Study cohort.
Surgical management of pericardial effusion in patients with malignancies. Comparison of subxiphoid window versus pericardiectomy.
Late effects of treatment for Wilms' tumor. A report from the National Wilms' Tumor Study Group.
Occult cancer in patients with deep venous thrombosis. A systematic approach.
Combination therapy for anaplastic giant cell thyroid carcinoma.
Intrapericardial infusion of 5-fluorouracil. An unusual complication of a Hickman catheter.
Use of autologous blood in total hip replacement. A comprehensive program.
Ulcerative colitis and giant cell arteritis associated with sensorineural deafness
Long-term follow-up in isolated ventricular septal defect considered too small to warrant operation.
Lipoprotein-related coronary risk factors in patients with angiographically defined coronary artery disease: relation to number of stenosed arteries.
Effects of long-term treatment with metoprolol and hydrochlorothiazide on plasma lipids and lipoproteins.
Wives of coronary high-risk men--are they also at higher risk? The Tromso Heart Study.
Verapamil increases serum alkaline phosphatase in hypertensive patients.
Kidney function and cardiovascular risk factors in non-insulin-dependent diabetics (NIDDM) with microalbuminuria.
The frequency, causes and timing of death within 30 days of a first stroke: the Oxfordshire Community Stroke Project.
The natural history of non-arteritic anterior ischaemic optic neuropathy.
Syndromes of transient amnesia: towards a classification. A study of 153 cases.
Visual evoked potential monitoring of optic nerve function during surgery.
Lower extremity arterial disease in elderly subjects with systolic hypertension.
A prospective comparison of rubidium-82 PET and thallium-201 SPECT myocardial perfusion imaging utilizing a single dipyridamole stress in the diagnosis of coronary artery disease
Noninvasive measurement of renal blood flow with technetium-99m-DTPA in the evaluation of patients with suspected renovascular hypertension
Phosphorus-32-colloidal chromic phosphate: treatment of choice for malignant pericardial effusion.
Impact of echocardiography on the management of patients with mitral valve prolapse
Reducing unnecessary coronary care unit admissions: a comparison of three decision aids
Injuries to the cervical spine causing vertebral artery trauma: case reports.
Arginine vasopressin gene expression in chronic cardiac failure in rats.
Multicenter trial of L-carnitine in maintenance hemodialysis patients. II. Clinical and biochemical effects.
Anaphylactoid reactions during hemodialysis on AN69 membranes in patients receiving ACE inhibitors.
Long-term follow-up comparing subclavian flap angioplasty to resection with modified oblique end-to-end anastomosis
Coronary bypass surgery: is the operation different today?
Role of dipyridamole-echocardiography test in the evaluation of coronary reserve after coronary artery bypass grafting.
Does use of gastroepiploic artery graft increase surgical risk?
Neonatal repair of tetralogy of Fallot with and without pulmonary atresia.
Atrioventricular septal defects. Analysis of short- and medium-term results.
Studies of myocardial protection in the immature heart. III. Models of ischemic and hypoxic/ischemic injury in the immature puppy heart.
Fatal fungal pericarditis after cardiac surgery and immunosuppression.
Studies of myocardial protection in the immature heart. IV. Improved tolerance of immature myocardium to hypoxia and ischemia by intravenous metabolic support.
Studies of myocardial protection in the immature heart. V. Safety of prolonged aortic clamping with hypocalcemic glutamate/aspartate blood cardioplegia.
Factors predictive of results of direct ablative operations for drug-refractory ventricular tachycardia. Analysis of 80 patients.
Influence of clinical and hemodynamic variables on risk of supraventricular tachycardia after coronary artery bypass.
Long-term clinical results with the Ionescu-Shiley pericardial xenograft.
Treatable complications in undiagnosed cases of autosomal dominant polycystic kidney disease.
Two types of abnormal genes for plasminogen in families with a predisposition for thrombosis [published erratum appears in Proc Natl Acad Sci U S A 1991 Apr 1;88(7):2967]
Renovascular disease and renal complications of angiotensin-converting enzyme inhibitor therapy
Native valve endocarditis due to Pseudallescheria boydii in a patient with AIDS: case report and review.
Captopril-induced cholestatic jaundice.
A histopathologic study of spinal cord ischemia using an isohistogenic rat upper-half-body transplantation model.
Predictors of long-term cardiac survival in patients with multivessel coronary artery disease undergoing percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty.
Severity of single-vessel coronary arterial stenosis and duration of angina as determinants of recruitable collateral vessels during balloon angioplasty occlusion.
Characteristics of black patients admitted to coronary care units in metropolitan Seattle: results from the Myocardial Infarction Triage and Intervention Registry (MITI).
Late results of 200 repeat coronary artery bypass operations.
Cardiovascular risk factor clustering and ratio of total cholesterol to high-density lipoprotein cholesterol in angiographically documented coronary artery disease.
Prevalence of unsuspected mitral regurgitation and left ventricular diastolic dysfunction in patients with coronary artery disease and acute pulmonary edema associated with normal or depressed left ventricular systolic function.
Ventricular tachycardia and accelerated ventricular rhythm presenting in the first month of life.
Exercise thallium-201 imaging in complete left bundle branch block and the prevalence of septal perfusion defects.
Characterization of spontaneous termination of sustained ventricular tachycardia associated with coronary artery disease.
Duration of the QT interval and total and cardiovascular mortality in healthy persons (The Framingham Heart Study experience).
Comparison of lisinopril versus atenolol for mild to moderate essential hypertension.
Hemodynamic effects of renin inhibition by enalkiren in chronic congestive heart failure.
Effects of bucindolol on neurohormonal activation in congestive heart failure.
Outcomes of direct coronary angioplasty for acute myocardial infarction in candidates and non-candidates for thrombolytic therapy.
Blood rheology after cardiac valve replacement with mechanical prostheses or bioprostheses.
Etiology and pathophysiology of pyelonephritis.
Effect of hemodialysis on protein C, protein S, and antithrombin III levels.
Effect of a calcium-entry blocker, nicardipine, on intrarenal hemodynamics in essential hypertension.
Twelve-year incidence of coronary heart disease in middle-aged adults during the era of hypertensive therapy: the Framingham offspring study [published erratum appears in Am J Med 1991 Apr;90(4):537]
Furosemide-131I-hippuran renography after angiotensin-converting enzyme inhibition for the diagnosis of renovascular hypertension.
Captopril renography in the diagnosis of renal artery stenosis: accuracy and limitations.
Infusion of a stable prostacyclin analogue, iloprost, to patients with peripheral vascular disease: lack of antiplatelet effect but risk of thromboembolism.
The effects of indomethacin and a beta-sympathomimetic agent on the fetal ductus arteriosus during treatment of premature labor: a randomized double-blind study.
A risk-benefit analysis of elective bilateral oophorectomy: effect of changes in compliance with estrogen therapy on outcome.
Alterations in collateral blood flow produced by isoflurane in a chronically instrumented canine model of multivessel coronary artery disease.
Protamine-heparin-induced pulmonary hypertension in pigs: effects of treatment with a thromboxane receptor antagonist on hemodynamics and coagulation.
Coronary and left ventricular hemodynamic responses following reversal of flunitrazepam-induced sedation with flumazenil in patients with coronary artery disease.
Hexamethonium and midazolam terminate dysrhythmias and hypertension caused by intracerebroventricular bupivacaine in rabbits.
A positron emission tomographic comparison of pulmonary vascular permeability during the adult respiratory distress syndrome and pneumonia.
Morphometry of the subepithelial circulation in sheep airways. Effect of vascular congestion.
Estimating left ventricular filling pressure during positive end-expiratory pressure in humans.
Surgery for thoracoabdominal aortic aneurysms.
Sinistral (left-sided) portal hypertension.
Carotid artery disease in patients with head and neck carcinoma.
Left atrial to femoral arterial bypass using the biomedicus pump for operations of the thoracic aorta.
Cutaneous manifestations of multiple myeloma.
Fibrin- and fibrinogen-related antigens in patients with venous disease and venous ulceration.
Quincke's edema, revisited.
Effective endothelialization of polyurethane surfaces. Response to shear stress and platelet adhesion.
The influence of dialysate sodium and variable ultrafiltration on fluid balance during hemodialysis.
Deterioration following delay in performing femoral angioplasty.
Screening for hypercholesterolemia among Canadians: how much will it cost? [published erratum appears in Can Med Assoc J 1991 Mar 1;144(5):545]
Increased extravascular lung water in patients with low pulmonary artery occlusion pressure after acute myocardial infarction.
Hemodynamic profiles of prostaglandin E1, isoproterenol, prostacyclin, and nifedipine in experimental porcine pulmonary hypertension.
Effects of milrinone on pulmonary vasculature in normal dogs and in dogs with pulmonary hypertension.
Role of endogenous angiotensin II in the control of vasopressin secretion during hypovolemia and hypotension in conscious rabbits.
A prospective study of sodium-lithium countertransport and hypertension in Utah.
High-normal blood pressure progression to hypertension in the Framingham Heart Study.
Renal manifestations of NaCl sensitivity in borderline hypertensive rats.
Vasopressin response in collecting ducts of rats resistant to mineralocorticoid hypertension.
Exclusion of the Na(+)-H+ antiporter as a candidate gene in human essential hypertension.
Methodology of sodium sensitivity assessment. The example of age and sex.
Racial and ethnic modifiers of the salt-blood pressure response.
Biohistory of slavery and blood pressure differences in blacks today. A hypothesis.
An evolutionary perspective on salt, hypertension, and human genetic variability.
Clinical interaction of salt and weight change on blood pressure level.
Sodium-potassium interaction in hypertension and hypertensive cardiovascular disease.
Interaction of sodium sensitivity and stress in young adults.
A consensus approach to electrolytes and blood pressure. Could we all be right?
Dietary sodium reduction for hypertension prevention and treatment.
A perspective on reducing salt intake.
Salt and hypertension--future directions.
Research and policy directions. Salt and blood pressure.
An overview of randomized trials of sodium reduction and blood pressure
Neurovascular mechanisms and sodium balance in the pathogenesis of hypertension.
Salt and hypertension. Lessons from animal models that relate to human hypertension.
Genetic traits related to hypertension and electrolyte metabolism.
Sympathetic neural contribution to salt-induced hypertension in Dahl rats.
Relation between sodium intake, renal function, and the regulation of arterial pressure.
Dietary salt and blood pressure. A perspective.
Avoiding interpretive pitfalls when assessing arrhythmia suppression after myocardial infarction: insights from the long-term observations of the placebo-treated patients in the Cardiac Arrhythmia Pilot Study (CAPS)
Percutaneous angioscopy during coronary angioplasty using a steerable microangioscope.
Evaluation of preload reserve during isometric exercise testing in patients with old myocardial infarction: Doppler echocardiographic study.
Noninvasive assessment of intrinsic ventricular load dynamics in dilated cardiomyopathy
Methodology of head-up tilt testing in patients with unexplained syncope
Immediate reproducibility of electrically induced sustained monomorphic ventricular tachycardia before and during antiarrhythmic therapy
Differences in QRS configuration during unipolar pacing from adjacent sites: implications for the spatial resolution of pace-mapping.
Lack of prognostic value of syncope in patients with Wolff-Parkinson-White syndrome
Longitudinal dissociation of atrioventricular accessory pathways.
Tricuspid valve disease with significant tricuspid insufficiency in the fetus: diagnosis and outcome.
Late noninvasive evaluation of cardiac performance in mildly symptomatic older patients with Ebstein's anomaly of tricuspid valve: role of radionuclide imaging.
In-hospital mortality after balloon aortic valvuloplasty: frequency and associated factors.
Predictors of long-term survival after percutaneous aortic valvuloplasty: report of the Mansfield Scientific Balloon Aortic Valvuloplasty Registry.
Ventricular load optimization by unloading therapy in patients with heart failure.
Cardiovascular and hormonal effects of calcitonin gene-related peptide in congestive heart failure.
Clinical and angiographic determinants of primary coronary angioplasty success. M-HEART Investigators.
Experimental pericardial effusion: relation of abnormal respiratory variation in mitral flow velocity to hemodynamics and diastolic right heart collapse
Effect of lovastatin on intimal hyperplasia after balloon angioplasty: a study in an atherosclerotic hypercholesterolemic rabbit.
The flail mitral valve: echocardiographic findings by precordial and transesophageal imaging and Doppler color flow mapping.
Outcome probabilities and life history after surgical mitral commissurotomy: implications for balloon commissurotomy.
Spontaneous alterations in coronary blood flow velocity before and after coronary angioplasty in patients with severe angina.
Elevated plasma beta-endorphin levels in patients with congestive heart failure
Implications of echocardiographically assisted diagnosis of pericardial tamponade in contemporary medical patients: detection before hemodynamic embarrassment.
Superiority of transesophageal echocardiography in detecting cardiac source of embolism in patients with cerebral ischemia of uncertain etiology.
Recognition and embolic potential of intraaortic atherosclerotic debris.
Coronary arterial remodeling studied by high-frequency epicardial echocardiography: an early compensatory mechanism in patients with obstructive coronary atherosclerosis.
Detection of coronary blood flow associated with left main coronary artery stenosis by transesophageal Doppler color flow echocardiography.
Percutaneous coronary excimer laser-assisted balloon angioplasty: initial clinical and quantitative angiographic results in 50 patients.
Is routine preoperative hemodynamic evaluation of nonagenarians necessary?
Forearm blood flow response to posture change in the very old: non-invasive measurement by venous occlusion plethysmography.
Ostium secundum atrial septal defect in the elderly.
Extracorporeal renal artery reconstruction for renovascular hypertension.
The clinical course of residual carotid arterial disease.
Long-term follow-up of patients operated on for recurrent carotid stenosis.
The association of elevated plasma homocyst(e)ine with progression of symptomatic peripheral arterial disease.
Experience with in situ saphenous vein bypasses during 1981 to 1989: determinant factors of long-term patency.
Treatment of abdominal aortic aneurysm by exclusion and bypass: an analysis of outcome.
Angiographic localization of spinal cord blood supply and its relationship to postoperative paraplegia.
A prospective randomized study of cerebrospinal fluid drainage to prevent paraplegia after high-risk surgery on the thoracoabdominal aorta.
Arterial aneurysms in children: clinicopathologic classification.
A clinically applicable method for long-term salvage of postischemic skeletal muscle.
The role of duplex scanning in the selection of patients for transluminal angioplasty.
Ultrasound screening of first-degree relatives of patients with an abdominal aortic aneurysm.
The influence of elastic compression stockings on deep venous hemodynamics.
The association of skin color with blood pressure in US blacks with low socioeconomic status
Why is diabetes mellitus a stronger risk factor for fatal ischemic heart disease in women than in men? The Rancho Bernardo Study [published erratum appears in JAMA 1991 Jun 26;265(24):3249]
A successful treatment of an intrarenal arteriovenous fistula by percutaneous embolization.
Pharmacologic stress imaging.
Elderly men with histories of heavy drinking: correlates and consequences.
The erythrocyte sedimentation rate in congestive heart failure.
Acute myocarditis simulating myocardial infarction in a child.
Circadian rhythms in blood pressure in school-age children of normotensive and hypertensive parents.
Laser angioplasty: results of a prospective, multicenter study at 3-year follow-up.
Delayed rupture of a pseudoaneurysm of the costocervical trunk: treatment with therapeutic embolization.
Hepatic arterial embolization in cases of extensive celiac arterial stenosis.
Cineangiography of the heart in a single breath hold with a segmented turboFLASH sequence.
Gastric antral vascular ectasia ("watermelon stomach"): radiologic findings.
Gynecologic vascular abnormalities: diagnosis with Doppler US.
Clinicopathologic studies of children who die of acute lower respiratory tract infections: mechanisms of death.
Activation of coagulation in acute cardioembolic stroke.
Noninvasive assessment of cerebral collateral blood supply through the ophthalmic artery.
The role of neutrophils and platelets in a rabbit model of thromboembolic stroke.
Attenuated neuropathology by nilvadipine after middle cerebral artery occlusion in rats.
Hypertension, cigarette smoking, and the decline in stroke incidence in eastern Finland.
Recurrent transient ischemic attacks and stroke in association with an internal carotid artery web
Hemodynamic effects of H2-receptor antagonists.
Interpreting results of exercise studies after acute myocardial infarction altered by thrombolytic therapy, coronary angioplasty or bypass.
In-hospital symptoms of psychological stress as predictors of long-term outcome after acute myocardial infarction in men.
Effect of nifedipine on total ischemic activity and circadian distribution of myocardial ischemic episodes in angina pectoris.
Early assessment of coronary artery bypass graft patency by high-dose dipyridamole echocardiography.
Ablation of the atrioventricular junction with radiofrequency energy using a new electrode catheter.
Relative importance of activation sequence compared to atrioventricular synchrony in left ventricular function.
Effects of doxazosin on blood pressure, renin-angiotensin-aldosterone and urinary kallikrein.
Effect of mitral regurgitation and volume loading on pressure half-time before and after balloon valvotomy in mitral stenosis.
Sudden death during empiric amiodarone therapy in symptomatic hypertrophic cardiomyopathy.
Value of electrophysiologic studies in hypertrophic cardiomyopathy treated with amiodarone.
Rarity of preclinical alcoholic cardiomyopathy in chronic alcoholics less than 40 years of age.
Prognostic value of thallium-201 perfusion defects in idiopathic dilated cardiomyopathy.
Usefulness of color-flow Doppler in diagnosing and in differentiating supracristal ventricular septal defect from right ventricular outflow tract obstruction.
An unusual venous anomaly of the placenta.
Diagnostic value of DNA analysis in effusions by flow cytometry and image analysis. A prospective study on 102 patients as compared with cytologic examination
Genetic determination of cytomegalovirus-induced and age-related cardiopathy in inbred mice. Characterization of infiltrating cells.
Prospective study of a prosthetic H-graft portacaval shunt.
Vascular complications after orthotopic liver transplantation.
Diagnosing pulmonary embolism: new facts and strategies
Late deaths after treatment for childhood cancer.
Regurgitation of fat and marrow emboli into coronary veins during resuscitation.
Aspergillus terreus endophthalmitis in a patient with chronic lymphocytic leukemia.
Limitation of retinal injury by vitreoperfusion initiated after onset of ischemia.
A systemic non-lytic state and local thrombolytic failure of anistreplase (anisoylated plasminogen streptokinase activator complex, APSAC) in acute myocardial infarction.
Excess purine degradation caused by an imbalance in the supply of adenosine triphosphate in patients with congestive heart failure.
Dipyridamole magnetic resonance imaging: a comparison with thallium-201 emission tomography.
A controlled trial of community based coronary rehabilitation.
Increase in native valve endocarditis caused by coagulase negative staphylococci: an Anglo-French clinical and microbiological study.
Patients' observations of bioprosthetic valve failure: "my heart is honking, doctor".
A new method of haemodynamic assessment of mitral stenosis in atrial fibrillation: construction of a nomogram.
Rapid histological changes in endomyocardial biopsy specimens after myocarditis.
Lipoprotein (a) and coronary heart disease: a prospective case-control study in a general population sample of middle aged men.
Effect of thiazide on rates of bone mineral loss: a longitudinal study [published erratum appears in BMJ 1991 Jan 26;302(6770):18]
Primary defect in alpha-adrenergic responsiveness in patients with varicose veins.
Calcium entry blockade and adrenergic vascular reactivity in hypertensives: differences between nicardipine and diltiazem.
Skeletal muscle metabolism in heart failure: a 31P nuclear magnetic resonance spectroscopy study of leg muscle.
Dynamic association between artery shear flow condition and platelet cytosolic free Ca2+ concentration in human hypertension.
Prospective study on prevalence of esophageal chest pain in patients referred on an elective basis to a cardiac unit for suspected myocardial ischemia.
Ischemic colitis in a crack abuser.
Myocardial infarction prognostic scoring system.
Wellness motivation in cardiac rehabilitation.
Is phase 2 cardiac rehabilitation necessary for early recovery of patients with cardiac disease? A randomized, controlled study.
Myocardial infarction in the young adult.
Proton magnetic resonance of exercise-induced water changes in gastrocnemius muscle.
Selective pulmonary vasodilation with ATP-MgCl2 during pulmonary hypertension in lambs.
Venous and arterial thrombosis in patients who received adjuvant therapy for breast cancer.
Epirubicin at two dose levels with prednisolone as treatment for advanced breast cancer: the results of a randomized trial.
A prospective randomized trial comparing epirubicin monochemotherapy to two fluorouracil, cyclophosphamide, and epirubicin regimens differing in epirubicin dose in advanced breast cancer patients. The French Epirubicin Study Group
The effects of etomidate on cerebral metabolism and blood flow in a canine model for hypoperfusion.
Myocardial metabolism of fluorodeoxyglucose compared to cell membrane integrity for the potassium analogue rubidium-82 for assessing infarct size in man by PET
Clinical validation of a miniature nuclear probe system for continuous on-line monitoring of cardiac function and ST-segment
UK-68,798: a novel, potent and highly selective class III antiarrhythmic agent which blocks potassium channels in cardiac cells.
Antiarrhythmic efficacy of a new class III agent, UK-68,798, during chronic myocardial infarction: evaluation using three-dimensional mapping.
Characterization of LY233569 on 5-lipoxygenase and reperfusion injury of ischemic myocardium.
Vasculitis as a paraneoplastic syndrome. Report of 11 cases and review of the literature.
A possible role for antiphospholipid antibodies in acquired cardiac valve deformity.
Effects of prostaglandin E1 on collagen diseases with high levels of circulating immune complexes.
Mixed connective tissue disease with arterial thrombosis, antiphospholipid antibodies and heparin induced thrombocytopenia.
Microangiopathy in the eosinophilia-myalgia syndrome.
Systemic toxic effects associated with high-dose verapamil infusion and chemotherapy administration.
Coronary artery bypass operation in dialysis patients.
Mortality in hereditary antithrombin-III deficiency--1830 to 1989
Interaction of citrus juices with felodipine and nifedipine
Intracranial hemorrhage from aneurysms and arteriovenous malformations during pregnancy and the puerperium.
Brain retractor edema during induced hypotension: the effect of the rate of return of blood pressure.
Effects of repeated temporary clipping of the middle cerebral artery on pial arterial diameter, regional cerebral blood flow, and brain structure in cats.
Accelerated non-muscle contraction after subarachnoid hemorrhage: cerebrospinal fluid testing in a culture model.
Cerebral infarction and release of platelet thromboxane after subarachnoid hemorrhage.
Spinal cord hemangioblastoma with subarachnoid hemorrhage.
Spontaneous rupture of liver during pregnancy: current therapy.
The effect of lateral tilt on maternal and fetal hemodynamic variables.
Parathyroidectomy in chronic renal failure: a nine-year follow-up study.
Factors related to treatment resistance in hypertension.
Risk for postoperative congestive heart failure.
Improved results with combined donor-specific transfusion (DST) and sequential therapy protocol.
Fluosol: an oxygen-delivery fluid for use in percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty.
Improving compliance and increasing control of hypertension: needs of special hypertensive populations.
Do we need another antihypertensive agent?
Preclinical pharmacology of celiprolol: a cardioselective beta-adrenergic antagonist and mild vasodilator.
Clinical safety and efficacy of celiprolol.
Managing the whole patient with hypertension: practical applications in a clinical setting.
Metabolic considerations in the choice of therapy for the patient with hypertension.
Hypertension with concomitant conditions: the changing role of beta-adrenoceptor blockade.
Clinical perspective on celiprolol: cardioprotective potential.
Correlation of isomeric fatty acids in human adipose tissue with clinical risk factors for cardiovascular disease.
Blood pressure lowering in elderly subjects: a double-blind crossover study of omega-3 and omega-6 fatty acids.
Emergency aortocoronary bypass after failed angioplasty.
Long-term results after atrial correction of complete transposition of the great arteries.
When do cerebral emboli appear during open heart operations? A transcranial Doppler study.
Retrograde continuous warm blood cardioplegia: a new concept in myocardial protection
Coronary pathology predicts conduction disturbances after coronary artery bypass grafting.
Dopamine and high-dose insulin infusion (glucose-insulin-potassium) after a cardiac operation: effects on myocardial metabolism.
Misplaced caval filter and subsequent pericardial tamponade.
Transesophageal echocardiography in acute aortic transection.
Delayed death from aortic root trauma.
Tricuspid valve incompetence caused by nonpenetrating thoracic trauma.
Apical aortic cannulation: application of an old method with new paraphernalia.
Randomised single blind trial to compare the toxicity of subconjunctival gentamicin and cefuroxime in cataract surgery.
Infrainguinal bypass surgery: factors determining late graft patency.
Popliteal aneurysms identified by intra-arterial streptokinase: a changing pattern of presentation.
Muscle fatigue in McArdle's disease. Muscle fibre conduction velocity and surface EMG frequency spectrum during ischaemic exercise.
Influence of low osmolality contrast media on electrophysiology and hemodynamics in coronary angiography: differences between an ionic (ioxaglate) and a nonionic (iohexol) agent.
Precertification for percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty in Medicare beneficiaries: a melting pot or a need for better national standards?
Mitral valve disruption following percutaneous balloon valvuloplasty.
Percutaneous balloon pulmonic valvuloplasty following treated endocarditis in a patient with congenital pulmonary valve stenosis.
Balloon valvuloplasty for fungal endocarditis induced stenosis of a bioprosthetic tricuspid valve.
Percutaneous balloon pulmonary valvuloplasty in sickle cell anemia: a case report.
Rib compression of the coronary arteries.
Coronary stent implantation in acute vessel closure 48 hours after an unsatisfactory coronary angioplasty.
Implantation of an endoluminal prosthesis at the distal anastomosis of a bypass graft for abrupt closure following balloon angioplasty.
Alfentanil pharmacokinetics in patients undergoing abdominal aortic surgery.
Transoesophageal echocardiogram may fail to diagnose perioperative myocardial infarction.
High incidence of cardiopulmonary complications associated with implantation of adrenal medullary tissue into the caudate nucleus in patients with advanced neurologic disease.
Cardioprotective effects of authentic nitric oxide in myocardial ischemia with reperfusion.
Upper-extremity deep venous thrombosis and pulmonary embolism. A prospective study.
Deep venous thrombosis. Implications after open heart surgery.
Pulmonary function and cardiovascular risk factor relationships in black and in white young men and women. The CARDIA Study
Catecholamine-induced cardiomyopathy in multiple endocrine neoplasia. A histologic, ultrastructural, and biochemical study.
Ischemia and reperfusion during intermittent coronary occlusion in man. Studies of electrocardiographic changes and CPK release.
Efficacy and safety of intravenous nicardipine in the control of postoperative hypertension. IV Nicardipine Study Group.
Seven-pathogen tricuspid endocarditis in an intravenous drug abuser. Pitfalls in laboratory diagnosis.
Auto-PEEP during CPR. An "occult" cause of electromechanical dissociation?
Pulmonary embolism presenting as exercise-induced hypotension.
Regression of the left main trunk lesion by steroid administration in Takayasu's aortitis.
Monitoring the effect of CPAP on left ventricular function using continuous mixed-blood saturation.
Pseudo pre-excitation with concertina effect in idioventricular tachycardia.
Total left main coronary artery occlusion after aortic aneurysm repair and valve replacement.
Cardiac tamponade and contralateral hemothorax after subclavian vein catheterization.
Renal effects of cyclosporine.
Genetic data and natural history of Friedreich's disease: a study of 80 Italian patients.
Traumatic and spontaneous extracranial internal carotid artery dissections.
Progressive inflammatory lesions of the brain parenchyma in localized scleroderma of the head.
Prospective randomized multicenter comparison of in situ and reversed vein infrapopliteal bypasses.
Durability of vein graft revision: the outcome of secondary procedures.
Simultaneous operative repair of multilevel lower extremity occlusive disease.
Laser angioplasty in peripheral vascular disease: symptomatic versus hemodynamic results.
Abdominal aortic aneurysm with perianeurysmal fibrosis: experience from 11 Swedish vascular centers.
Ruptured abdominal aortic aneurysm: the Harborview experience.
Probability of rupture of an abdominal aortic aneurysm after an unrelated operative procedure: a prospective study.
Aortocaval and iliac arteriovenous fistulas: recognition and treatment.
The accuracy of CT scanning in the diagnosis of abdominal and thoracoabdominal aortic aneurysms.
Magnetic resonance imaging: a reliable test for the evaluation of proximal atherosclerotic renal arterial stenosis.
A prospective study of the incidence and natural history of femoral vascular complications after percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty.
Lacunar transient ischaemic attacks: a clinically useful concept?
Degenerative aortic stenosis. One effect of the graying of America.
When is pulmonary artery catheterization worth the risks?
Cholesterol screening in a black inner-city pediatric population.
Infrainguinal revascularization for limb salvage in patients with end-stage renal disease.
Relationship between blood groups and behavior patterns in men who have had myocardial infarction.
Deep venous thrombosis in intravenous cocaine abuse mimicking septic arthritis of the shoulder.
Unfavorable outcome following early surgical repair of ruptured cerebral aneurysms--a critical review of 238 patients.
Comparative clinical pharmacology of calcium channel blockers.
Relation between flow grade after thrombolytic therapy and the effect of angioplasty on left ventricular function: a prospective randomized trial.
Acute complications of percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty for total occlusion.
Stunned myocardium and myocardial collagen damage: differential effects of single and repeated occlusions.
Coronary sinus occlusion: effect on ischemic left ventricular dysfunction and reactive hyperemia.
Complete left main coronary artery occlusion: angiographic evaluation of collateral vessel patterns and assessment of hemodynamic correlates.
Factors associated with recurrent myocardial infarction within one year after acute myocardial infarction.
Dilatation of the left ventricular cavity on dipyridamole thallium-201 imaging: a new marker of triple-vessel disease.
Percutaneous balloon valvotomy for patients with mitral stenosis: initial and follow-up results.
Value and limitations of Doppler pressure half-time in quantifying mitral stenosis: a comparison with micromanometer catheter recordings.
Effect of severe pulmonary hypertension on the calculation of mitral valve area in patients with mitral stenosis.
The effect of quinidine and mexiletine on the adaptation of ventricular refractoriness to an increase in rate.
Effect of hyperkalemia on experimental myocardial depression by verapamil.
Flosequinan: a vasodilator with positive inotropic activity.
Dietary taurine deficiency and dilated cardiomyopathy in the fox.
Sports-related and non-sports-related sudden cardiac death in young adults.
Beat-to-beat detection of ventricular late potentials with high-resolution electrocardiography.
Is hyperglycemia associated with cardiovascular disease? The Framingham Study.
Risk stratification in survivors of acute myocardial infarction: routine cardiac catheterization and angiography is a reasonable approach in most patients [editorial]
Role of new antiplatelet agents as adjunctive therapies in thrombolysis.
Role of new anticoagulants as adjunctive therapy during thrombolysis.
Adjunctive use of beta-adrenergic blockers, calcium antagonists and other therapies in coronary thrombolysis.
Heparin as an adjunctive treatment after thrombolytic therapy for acute myocardial infarction.
Prognostic importance of delayed Q-wave evolution 3 to 24 hours after initiation of thrombolytic therapy for acute myocardial infarction.
Regional cardiac adrenergic function using I-123 meta-iodobenzylguanidine tomographic imaging after acute myocardial infarction.
Insensitivity of noninvasive tests to detect coronary artery vasculopathy after heart transplant.
Comparative effects of overweight on cardiovascular risk in younger versus older men.
Immediate and short-term results of a 1988-1989 coronary angioplasty registry.
Sustained reduction in valvular regurgitation and atrial volumes with tailored vasodilator therapy in advanced congestive heart failure secondary to dilated (ischemic or idiopathic) cardiomyopathy.
Frequency and severity of mitral regurgitation one year after balloon mitral valvuloplasty.
Hemodynamic and electrophysiologic evaluation of patients with hypertrophic cardiomyopathy surviving cardiac arrest.
Uses and limitations of transthoracic echocardiography in the assessment of atrial septal defect in the adult.
Congestive heart failure, coronary events and atherothrombotic brain infarction in elderly blacks and whites with systemic hypertension and with and without echocardiographic and electrocardiographic evidence of left ventricular hypertrophy.
Evaluation of the pharmacokinetics and electrocardiographic effects of intravenous verapamil with intravenous calcium chloride pretreatment in normal subjects.
Cardiovascular risk factor levels in ethnic Hawaiians.
Are people more health conscious? A longitudinal study of one community.
Vascular lesions of the intestines.
Pregnancy associated with Gorlin's syndrome.
Intraoperative detection of patent foramen ovale by transesophageal echocardiography.
Maternal and fetal effects of labetalol in pregnant ewes.
Active drainage of cardiac lymph in relation to reduction in size of myocardial infarction: an experimental study.
Coronary artery calcification detected by CT: clinical significance and angiographic correlates.
Therapy of ischemic cardiomyopathy with pentoxifylline.
The effect of dopexamine HCl upon collateral perfusion of the acutely ischemic myocardium in anesthetized dogs.
Right-to-left shunting through a patent foramen ovale caused by pulmonary hypertension associated with rheumatoid arthritis and Sjogren's syndrome: a case report.
Aortic dissection with a fistulous communication into the right atrium: a case report.
Complement activation is a secondary rather than a causative factor in rabbit pulmonary artery ischemia/reperfusion injury.
Relation between three-dimensional geometry of the inflow tract to the orifice and the area, shape, and velocity of regurgitant color Doppler jets: an in vitro study.
The reproducibility of intravascular ultrasound imaging in vitro.
The natural history of left ventricular spontaneous contrast.
Role of ultrasonic tissue characterization to distinguish reversible from irreversible myocardial injury.
Quantitative echocardiographic analysis of global and regional left ventricular function: a problem revisited.
Fenestrated atrial septal aneurysm: diagnosis by transesophageal echocardiography.
Giant breast hematoma requiring blood transfusion: an unusual complication after an echocardiographic study during thrombolytic therapy.
Six year follow up of a consecutive series of patients presenting to the coronary care unit with acute chest pain: prognostic importance of the electrocardiogram
Sustained improvement in left ventricular function after successful coronary angioplasty.
Post-extrasystolic potentiation without a compensatory pause in normal and diseased hearts.
Hypertrophic cardiomyopathy without hypertrophy: two families with myocardial disarray in the absence of increased myocardial mass
Streptokinase treatment for femoral artery thrombosis after arterial cardiac catheterisation in infants and children.
Evaluation of pulmonary arterial pressure by Doppler colour flow mapping in patients with a ductus arteriosus.
Preoperative measurement of pulmonary vascular resistance in complete transposition of the great arteries.
Early diastolic clicks after the Fontan procedure for double inlet left ventricle: anatomical and physiological correlates.
Sudden death in hypertrophic cardiomyopathy with normal left ventricular mass
Dilated and contracted forms of primary endocardial fibroelastosis: a single fetal disease with two stages of development.
Cor triatriatum dexter: antemortem diagnosis in an adult by cross sectional echocardiography.
Course of diabetic retinopathy following cataract surgery
A 5.3-kb deletion including exon XIII of the protein S alpha gene occurs in two protein S-deficient families.
Immunogenetic heterogeneity in rheumatoid disease as illustrated by different MHC associations (DQ, Dw and C4) in articular and extra-articular subsets.
Idiopathic hypereosinophilic syndrome terminating as disseminated T-cell lymphoma.
Hypersensitivity reactions to epipodophyllotoxins in children with acute lymphoblastic leukemia.
Transmural myocardial deformation in the ischemic canine left ventricle.
Protective effect of increased glycolytic substrate against systolic and diastolic dysfunction and increased coronary resistance from prolonged global underperfusion and reperfusion in isolated rabbit hearts perfused with erythrocyte suspensions.
Effect of coronary hyperemia on Emax and oxygen consumption in blood-perfused rabbit hearts. Energetic consequences of Gregg's phenomenon.
Spontaneous termination of reentry after one cycle or short nonsustained runs. Role of oscillations and excess dispersion of refractoriness.
Inotropic response to norepinephrine is augmented early and maintained late in conscious dogs with perinephritic hypertension.
Changes in diastolic cardiac function in developing and stable perinephritic hypertension in conscious dogs.
Effects of inosine on glycolysis and contracture during myocardial ischemia.
Myocardial sulfhydryl pool alterations occur during reperfusion after brief and prolonged myocardial ischemia in vivo.
Modulation of coronary vasomotor tone in humans. Progressive endothelial dysfunction with different early stages of coronary atherosclerosis.
Accuracy of exercise electrocardiography in detecting physiologically significant coronary arterial lesions.
In-hospital and 1-year mortality in 1,524 women after myocardial infarction. Comparison with 4,315 men.
Secular trends in Q wave and non-Q wave acute myocardial infarction. The Minnesota Heart Survey.
Impairment of the myocardial ultrastructure and changes of the cytoskeleton in dilated cardiomyopathy.
HLA class II (DR and DQ) antigen associations in idiopathic dilated cardiomyopathy. Validation study and meta-analysis of published HLA association studies
Acute hemodynamic effects of captopril in children with a congestive or restrictive cardiomyopathy
What is the best method for assessing the long-term outcome of surgery for accessory pathways and atrioventricular junctional reentrant tachycardias?
Intravital detection of skin capillary aneurysms by videomicroscopy with indocyanine green in patients with progressive systemic sclerosis and related disorders.
Effect of weight reduction in moderately overweight patients on recorded ambulatory blood pressure and free cytosolic platelet calcium.
Relation between leisure-time physical activity and blood pressure in older women.
Mechanisms of reoxygenation injury in cultured ventricular myocytes
A new method for quantification of regurgitant flow rate using color Doppler flow imaging of the flow convergence region proximal to a discrete orifice. An in vitro study.
Effects of pressure and volume of the receiving chamber on the spatial distribution of regurgitant jets as imaged by color Doppler flow mapping. An in vitro study.
Magnitude and time course of extracellular potassium inhomogeneities during acute ischemia in pigs. Effect of verapamil.
Changes in left ventricular volume, mass, and function during the development and regression of supraventricular tachycardia-induced cardiomyopathy. Disparity between recovery of systolic versus diastolic function.
Loss of endothelial pertussis toxin-sensitive G protein function in atherosclerotic porcine coronary arteries.
Load dependence of left ventricular diastolic pressure-volume relations during short-term coronary artery occlusion.
Left ventricular diastolic dysfunction limits use of maximum systolic elastance as an index of contractile function.
Intra-arterial urokinase as the initial therapy for acutely ischemic lower limbs
The natural history of peripheral vascular disease. Implications for its management.
Intravascular stents. General principles and status of lower-extremity arterial applications.
Impact of nonoperative therapy on the clinical management of peripheral arterial disease.
Diagnosis and evaluation of renovascular hypertension. Indications for therapy.
Results and complications of angioplasty in fibromuscular disease.
Management of renovascular disease. A surgical perspective.
Optimum results of the surgical treatment of carotid territory ischemia.
Morphological observations late (greater than 30 days) after clinically successful coronary balloon angioplasty.
Clinical and anatomical considerations for surgery in aortoiliac disease and results of surgical treatment.
Results and complications of angioplasty in aortoiliac disease
Standards for evaluating results of interventional therapy for peripheral vascular disease.
Clinical and anatomic considerations for surgery in femoropopliteal disease and the results of surgery.
Femoropopliteal angioplasty. Factors influencing long-term success.
Clinical and anatomic considerations for surgery in tibial disease and the results of surgery.
Clinical and anatomical considerations for nonoperative therapy in tibial disease and the results of angioplasty.
Hot-tip laser. Results and complications.
Efficacy of thrombolysis in infrainguinal bypass grafts.
The role of lasers in hemorrhoidectomy.
Treatment of obstructive pneumatosis coli with endoscopic sclerotherapy: report of a case.
The renally compromised older hypertensive: therapeutic considerations.
Sedation for upper gastrointestinal endoscopy: results of a nationwide survey.
Prevention of hypertension and vascular changes by captopril treatment.
Isolation of preferentially expressed genes in the kidneys of hypertensive rats.
Impaired insulin action on skeletal muscle metabolism in essential hypertension.
Nicotine impairs reflex renal nerve and respiratory activity in deoxycorticosterone acetate-salt rats.
Nephrotoxicity of allopurinol is enhanced in experimental hypertension.
Effect of drug and diet treatment of mild hypertension on diastolic blood pressure. The TAIM Research Group.
Characterization of auscultatory gaps with wideband external pulse recording.
Myocardial protein turnover in patients with coronary artery disease. Effect of branched chain amino acid infusion.
Sclerotherapy of varicose and telangiectatic leg veins. Minimal sclerosant concentration of hypertonic saline and its relationship to vessel diameter
Natural history of moderate aortic stenosis.
Clinical and electrophysiologic determinants, treatment and survival of patients with sustained malignant ventricular tachyarrhythmias occurring late after myocardial infarction
Effect of H1 receptor stimulation on coronary artery diameter in patients with variant angina: comparison with effect of acetylcholine
Percutaneous mitral valvuloplasty in surgical high risk patients.
The variable extent of jeopardized myocardium in patients with single vessel coronary artery disease: quantification by thallium-201 single photon emission computed tomography
Primary angioplasty in myocardial infarction: assessment of improved myocardial perfusion with technetium-99m isonitrile.
Differentiating cardiomyopathy of coronary artery disease from nonischemic dilated cardiomyopathy utilizing positron emission tomography.
Drug therapy for ventricular tachyarrhythmias: how many electropharmacologic trials are appropriate?
Comparison of pre- and postoperative conduction patterns in patients surgically cured of atrioventricular node reentrant tachycardia.
Prolonged and fractionated right atrial electrograms during sinus rhythm in patients with paroxysmal atrial fibrillation and sick sinus node syndrome.
Spontaneous changes in ventricular tachycardia cycle length.
Automatic implantable cardioverter-defibrillator implantation without thoracotomy using an endocardial and submuscular patch system.
Echocardiographic evaluation of cardiac structure and function in elderly subjects with isolated systolic hypertension
Restenosis after percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty: pathologic observations in 20 patients
Differential histopathology of primary atherosclerotic and restenotic lesions in coronary arteries and saphenous vein bypass grafts: analysis of tissue obtained from 73 patients by directional atherectomy.
Transplant coronary artery disease: histopathologic correlations with angiographic morphology.
Immunosuppressive therapy in the management of acute myocarditis in children: a clinical trial.
Lung function and pulmonary regurgitation limit exercise capacity in postoperative tetralogy of Fallot.
Effect of atenolol and diltiazem on heart period variability in normal persons.
The Mansfield Scientific Aortic Valvuloplasty Registry: overview of acute hemodynamic results and procedural complications.
Association between primary pulmonary hypertension and portal hypertension: analysis of its pathophysiology and clinical, laboratory and hemodynamic manifestations.
Atrial activation sequence during atrial flutter in the canine pericarditis model and its effects on the polarity of the flutter wave in the electrocardiogram.
Hypertrophy, fibrosis and diastolic dysfunction in early canine experimental hypertension.
Transesophageal echocardiography is superior to transthoracic echocardiography in the diagnosis of sinus venosus atrial septal defect.
Physicians' perspectives on cholesterol and heart disease.
Influence of dietary cod liver oil on fatty acid composition of plasma lipids in human male subjects after myocardial infarction.
Atrioventricular plane displacement in severe congestive heart failure following dilated cardiomyopathy or myocardial infarction.
Elevation of plasma neuropeptide Y-like immunoreactivity and noradrenaline during myocardial ischaemia in man.
Unnecessary deaths from valvular aortic stenosis.
Antihypertensive drugs and glucose metabolism: comparison between a diuretic, a beta-blocker and felodipine, a new calcium antagonist in subjects with arterial hypertension and diabetes.
High urinary cAMP in hypertensives despite careful drug treatment--an epidemiological study from the Dalby population.
Very high blood pressure in acute stroke.
Increased arterial adrenaline is related to pain in uncomplicated myocardial infarction.
Increased whole blood viscosity combined with decreased erythrocyte fluidity in untreated patients with essential hypertension.
Fatal pulmonary embolism caused by streptokinase treatment of deep venous thrombosis of the leg?
Assessment of myocardial perfusion in patients after the arterial switch operation.
Myocardial uptake of carbon-11-acetate as an indirect estimate of regional myocardial blood flow.
Blood-pool radionuclide angiography in patients with a Novacor left ventricular assist device.
Effect of aortic sclerosis on bone mineral measurements by dual-photon absorptiometry.
Early scintigraphic detection of experimental myocardial infarction in dogs with technetium-99m-glucaric acid
Effect of coronary occlusion and myocardial viability on myocardial activity of technetium-99m-sestamibi
The management of primary pulmonary hypertension.
Coronary artery bypass grafting in elderly patients. Comparative results in a consecutive series of 469 patients older than 75 years.
Thromboexclusion of the right ventricle in children with pulmonary atresia and intact ventricular septum.
Left ventricular mechanics of ejecting, postischemic hearts during left ventricular circulatory assistance.
Evolution of human cardiac myocyte dimension during prolonged mechanical support.
Overdose reperfusion of blood cardioplegic solution. A preventable cause of postischemic myocardial depression.
Studies of controlled reperfusion after ischemia. XXI. Reperfusate composition: superiority of blood cardioplegia over crystalloid cardioplegia in limiting reperfusion damage--importance of endogenous oxygen free radical scavengers in red blood cells.
Relation of central obesity and insulin resistance with high diabetes prevalence and cardiovascular risk in South Asians.
Hyperinsulinaemia and microvascular angina ("syndrome X")
Infiltration of epinephrine in tonsillectomy: a randomized, prospective, double-blind study.
Twelve-year comparison of a Bjork-Shiley mechanical heart valve with porcine bioprostheses
Lateral medullary infarction: prognosis in an unselected series.
Myotonic heart disease: a clinical follow-up.
Vascular abnormalities in epidermal nevus syndrome.
Cerebral air embolism treated by pressure and hyperbaric oxygen.
Abdominal aneurysms in childhood: report of a case and review of the literature.
Increased sensitivity to endotoxemia by tissue necrosis.
Hepatocellular carcinoma with tumor thrombus extending into the right atrium: report of a successful resection with the use of cardiopulmonary bypass.
Intercostal arteriovenous fistula due to pleural biopsy
Chylothorax secondary to obstruction of the superior vena cava: a complication of the LeVeen shunt.
Controlled trials of antihypertensive drugs in pregnancy.
Enalapril-associated anemia in renal transplant recipients treated for hypertension.
Renal hemodynamics in normal and hypertensive pregnancy: lessons from micropuncture.
Reduction of cardiovascular disease-related mortality among postmenopausal women who use hormones: evidence from a national cohort.
Endothelial-derived relaxing factor released by endothelial cells of human umbilical vessels and its impairment in pregnancy-induced hypertension.
Continuous electrocardiographic monitoring in hypertensive crises in pregnancy.
A case report of giant cell arteritis of the uterus and adnexa.
The prevalence of retinal vascular abnormalities in children and adolescents with essential hypertension.
Immunoreactivity of anti-streptococcal monoclonal antibodies to human heart valves. Evidence for multiple cross-reactive epitopes.
Detection of Coxsackievirus B3 RNA in myocardial tissues by the polymerase chain reaction.
Human atherosclerotic coronary artery xenografts: a model for investigation of transluminal recanalization.
ST segment alternans during percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty--a case report.
Mucoid vasculopathy of unknown etiology.
Giant left atrium--a case report.
Coronary artery aneurysm without stenosis in association with Osler-Weber-Rendu disease--a case report.
Sudden appearance of coronary thrombus observed by angiography--a case report.
How long can a coronary reperfusion catheter be placed in acute coronary occlusion following failed transluminal coronary angioplasty? A case report.
Spontaneous cerebral embolism from descending thoracic aortic aneurysm--a case report.
Unilateral diffuse pulmonary artery involvement in Takayasu's arteritis associated with coronary-pulmonary artery fistula and bronchial-pulmonary artery fistula: a case report.
Long-term evaluation of indobufen in peripheral vascular disease.
Total occlusion of the left main coronary artery in a young woman with survival: a case report.
Axillary subclavian vein thrombosis. Changing patterns of etiology, diagnostic, and therapeutic modalities.
Ischemic colitis. An ever-changing spectrum?
Thromboxane synthetase inhibition decreases polymorphonuclear leukocyte activation following hindlimb ischemia.
Multilevel occlusive vascular disease presenting with gangrene.
Relation of left ventricular mass and geometry to morbidity and mortality in uncomplicated essential hypertension.
Lipids, vascular disease, and dementia with advancing age. Epidemiologic considerations.
The role of calcium channel blockers in the treatment of essential hypertension.
Sensitivity of exercise electrocardiography for acute cardiac events during moderate and strenuous physical activity. The Lipid Research Clinics Coronary Primary Prevention Trial.
A standard heparin nomogram for the management of heparin therapy.
Ventricular tachycardia during routine treadmill testing. Risk and prognosis.
Short-term changes in renal function, blood pressure, and electrolyte levels in patients receiving cyclosporine for dermatologic disorders.
Giant cell arteritis. A case with unusual neurologic manifestations and a normal sedimentation rate.
Occlusive vasculopathy in systemic lupus erythematosus. Association with anticardiolipin antibody
Prognostic value of reduced heart rate variability after myocardial infarction: clinical evaluation of a new analysis method.
Direct measurement of skeletal muscle fatigue in patients with chronic heart failure.
An echocardiographic assessment of atrial mechanical behaviour.
End diastolic flow velocity just beneath the aortic isthmus assessed by pulsed Doppler echocardiography: a new predictor of the aortic regurgitant fraction.
Interatrial shunt flow profiles in newborn infants: a colour flow and pulsed Doppler echocardiographic study.
Lipomatous hypertrophy of the interatrial septum: an unusual intraoperative finding.
Prediction of outcome by prenatal Doppler analysis in a patient with aortic stenosis.
Holter monitoring of ventricular arrhythmias in a randomised, controlled study of intravenous streptokinase in acute myocardial infarction.
Extrahepatic portal vein aneurysm associated with a tortuous portal vein.
Cardiac arrest during hip arthroplasty with a cemented long-stem component. A report of seven cases.
Prosthetic arthroplasty of the knee after resection of a sarcoma in the proximal end of the tibia. A report of sixteen cases.
Digoxin Immune Fab therapy in the management of digitalis intoxication: safety and efficacy results of an observational surveillance study.
Multicenter registry of angioplasty therapy of cardiogenic shock: initial and long-term survival.
Factors determining improvement in left ventricular function after reperfusion therapy for acute myocardial infarction: primacy of baseline ejection fraction.
Incidence and clinical significance of transient creatine kinase elevations and the diagnosis of non-Q wave myocardial infarction associated with coronary angioplasty.
Reactivity of eccentric and concentric coronary stenoses in patients with chronic stable angina.
Long-term follow-up of medical versus surgical therapy for hypertrophic cardiomyopathy: a retrospective study
Obstruction of mechanical heart valve prostheses: clinical aspects and surgical management.
Myocardial magnesium: relation to laboratory and clinical variables in patients undergoing cardiac surgery.
Prediction of the frequency and duration of ambulatory myocardial ischemia in patients with stable coronary artery disease by determination of the ischemic threshold from exercise testing: importance of the exercise protocol
Stress echocardiography and the human factor: the importance of being expert.
Silent ischemia after coronary angioplasty: evaluation of restenosis and extent of ischemia in asymptomatic patients by tomographic thallium-201 exercise imaging and comparison with symptomatic patients.
Concealed entrainment as a guide for catheter ablation of ventricular tachycardia in patients with prior myocardial infarction.
Effects of standing on the induction of paroxysmal supraventricular tachycardia.
A randomized double-blind crossover comparison of four rate-responsive pacing modes.
The automatic implantable cardioverter-defibrillator: effect of patch polarity on defibrillation threshold.
Dissection of the aorta associated with congenital malformation of the aortic valve.
Surgery for Ebstein's anomaly: the clinical and echocardiographic evaluation of a new technique.
The role of chronotropic impairment during exercise after the Mustard operation.
Effect of captopril, an angiotensin-converting enzyme inhibitor, in patients with angina pectoris and heart failure
Effect of maintenance digoxin therapy on aerobic performance and exercise left ventricular function in mild to moderate heart failure due to coronary artery disease: a randomized, placebo-controlled, crossover trial.
Treatment of recurrent ischemia after thrombolysis and successful reperfusion for acute myocardial infarction: effect on in-hospital mortality and left ventricular function.
A paradigm for restenosis based on cell biology: clues for the development of new preventive therapies.
Percutaneous support devices for high risk or complicated coronary angioplasty.
Regional myocardial blood flow and left ventricular diastolic properties in pacing-induced ischemia.
Pressure-length loop area: its components analyzed during graded myocardial ischemia.
Modification of atrioventricular node transmission properties by intraoperative neodymium-YAG laser photocoagulation in dogs.
Duchenne's cardiomyopathy in a canine model: electrocardiographic and echocardiographic studies.
Natural evolution of cardiac function, cardiac pathology and antimyosin scan in a murine myocarditis model.
Follow-up of patients with low output, low gradient hemodynamics after percutaneous balloon aortic valvuloplasty: the Mansfield Scientific Aortic Valvuloplasty Registry.
Clinical diagnosis of Binswanger's disease.
A simple method to improve the accuracy of non-invasive ultrasound in selecting TIA patients for cerebral angiography.
Contracturing granulomatous myositis: a separate entity.
Platelet thromboxane release and delayed cerebral ischemia in patients with subarachnoid hemorrhage.
Endovascular occlusion of vertebral arteries in the treatment of unclippable vertebrobasilar aneurysms.
Effect of 21-aminosteroid U-74006F on lipid peroxidation in subarachnoid clot.
Superior hypophyseal artery aneurysm. Report of two cases.
Subarachnoid hemorrhage from a dissecting aneurysm of the middle cerebral artery. Case report.
Long-term outcome and prognostic indicators in the hemolytic-uremic syndrome.
The role of alpha adrenoceptor subtypes in sympathetic control of the acral-cutaneous microcirculation.
Peripheral alpha-1 and alpha-2 adrenergic receptors in three models of hypertension in rats: an in vitro autoradiography study.
Computed tomography in the evaluation of the aorta in patients sustaining blunt chest trauma.
Microscopic pulmonary tumor embolism causing subacute cor pulmonale: a difficult antemortem diagnosis [published erratum appears in Mayo Clin Proc 1991 Apr;66(4):439]
Essential thrombocythemia in young adults.
Divergent effects of serotonin on coronary-artery dimensions and blood flow in patients with coronary atherosclerosis and control patients
Effect of intracoronary serotonin on coronary vessels in patients with stable angina and patients with variant angina
Orbitozygomatic temporopolar approach for a high basilar tip aneurysm associated with a short intracranial internal carotid artery: a new surgical approach.
Rupture of a giant carotid aneurysm after extracranial-to-intracranial bypass surgery.
Failure of transluminal angioplasty in the treatment of myointimal hyperplasia of the internal carotid artery: case report.
A study of the effectiveness of the iron-chelating agent deferoxamine as vasospasm prophylaxis in a rabbit model of subarachnoid hemorrhage.
Impairment of cerebral autoregulation during the development of chronic cerebral vasospasm after subarachnoid hemorrhage in primates.
The effect of continuous drainage of cerebrospinal fluid in patients with subarachnoid hemorrhage: a retrospective analysis of 108 patients.
Cavernous malformations and capillary telangiectasia: a spectrum within a single pathological entity.
Blue rubber bleb nevus syndrome with oral hemangiomas.
Depression after acute myocardial infarction. The role of primary care physicians in rehabilitation.
Postangiographic femoral artery injuries: nonsurgical repair with US-guided compression
US-assisted aspiration thrombectomy: in vitro investigations.
Two urokinase dose regimens in native arterial and graft occlusions: initial results of a prospective, randomized clinical trial.
Peripheral arterial occlusive disease: prospective comparison of MR angiography and color duplex US with conventional angiography.
Quantification of vascular stenosis with color Doppler flow imaging: in vitro investigations.
Pancreatic transplantation: radiologic evaluation of vascular complications.
Renal vein renins: inability to predict response to revascularization in patients with hypertension.
Patient evaluation for cardiac transplantation.
Heparin as the cause of coagulopathy which may complicate grafting of the liver.
Electrocardiographic subset analysis of diltiazem administration on long-term outcome after acute myocardial infarction. The Multicenter Diltiazem Post-Infarction Trial Research Group.
Exercise echocardiography and technetium-99m MIBI single-photon emission computed tomography in the detection of coronary artery disease.
Impaired left ventricular filling and regional diastolic asynchrony at rest in coronary artery disease and relation to exercise-induced myocardial ischemia.
Predictors of cardiac survival after percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty in patients with severe left ventricular dysfunction.
Effects of diltiazem on complications and restenosis after coronary angioplasty.
Sudden cardiac death while wearing a Holter monitor.
Late results of the left subcostal approach for automatic implantable cardioverter defibrillator implantation.
Beneficial effect of atrial pacing in severe acute aortic regurgitation and role of M-mode echocardiography in determining the optimal pacing interval.
Simultaneous occurrence of mitral valve prolapse and systolic anterior motion in hypertrophic cardiomyopathy.
Comparison of left ventricular ejection fraction by magnetic resonance imaging and radionuclide ventriculography in idiopathic dilated cardiomyopathy.
Stroke volume during submaximal exercise in endurance-trained normotensive subjects and in untrained hypertensive subjects with beta blockade (propranolol and pindolol).
Focal scleroderma and severe cardiomyopathy. Patient report and brief review.
Hypertension, endothelium, and cardiovascular risk factors.
Cardiovascular risk reduction: the role of antihypertensive treatment.
Management of hypertension and cardiovascular risk.
The National Cholesterol Education Program: guidelines, status, and issues.
The tangled web of coronary risk factors.
Regression of atherosclerosis: what does it mean?
Evolving natural history of coronary artery disease in diabetes mellitus.
Insulin as a mitogenic factor: role in the pathogenesis of cardiovascular disease.
Insulin resistance, hyperinsulinemia, and hypertriglyceridemia in the etiology and clinical course of hypertension.
Diabetic nephropathy: can the natural history be modified?
New horizons in the treatment of coronary artery thrombosis.
Influence of desflurane on regional distribution of coronary blood flow in a chronically instrumented canine model of multivessel coronary artery obstruction.
Intestinal permeability in patients with chronic urticaria-angioedema with and without arthralgia.
Narrow QRS ventricular tachycardia.
Increased plasma endothelin-1 in pulmonary hypertension: marker or mediator of disease?
Lyme disease: recommendations for diagnosis and treatment
Cardiac echinococcosis with fatal intracerebral embolism.
Temporal arteritis with normal erythrocyte sedimentation rates presenting as occipital neuralgia.
Wegener's granulomatosis presenting as temporal arteritis.
Fatal pulmonary venoocclusive disease secondary to a generalized venulopathy: a new syndrome presenting with facial swelling and pericardial tamponade.
Evaluation of drug therapy for treatment of hypertensive urgencies in the emergency department.
Risk monitoring of randomized trials in emergency medicine: experience of the Brain Resuscitation Clinical Trial II.
Early diagnosis and survival of ruptured abdominal aortic aneurysms.
Oral labetalol in hypertensive urgencies.
Experience with esmolol for the treatment of cocaine-associated cardiovascular complications.
High resolution real-time ultrasound for the diagnosis of venous thrombosis in the rehabilitation setting.
Retinal arterial macroaneurysms: risk factors and natural history.
Hirudin interruption of heparin-resistant arterial thrombus formation in baboons.
Serum sialic acid concentration and cardiovascular mortality
Salvage of branch vessels during bifurcation lesion angioplasty: acute and long-term follow-up.
Comparison of exercise performance in left main and three-vessel coronary artery disease.
Atrial septal occlusion improves the accuracy of mitral valve area determination following percutaneous mitral balloon valvotomy.
Coronary angioplasty following cardiac transplantation: a case report and review of the literature.
Preservation of regional myocardial function during coronary angioplasty with an autoperfusion balloon catheter: a case report.
Successful mitral valvuloplasty using the Inoue balloon in a patient with mitral stenosis associated with subvalvular fibrosis and reduced left ventricular inflow cavity: a case report.
Percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty of anomalous right coronary artery.
Takayasu's disease with axillary, right coronary artery, and right internal mammary stenosis treated with angioplasty.
Rate-related left bundle branch block as a cause of non-ischemic chest pain.
Percutaneous right brachial artery approach with 5F catheters for studying coronary artery disease.
Accuracy and reproducibility of quantitative coronary arteriography using 6 and 8 French catheters with cine angiographic acquisition.
Coronary balloon angioplasty through diagnostic 6 French catheters.
Preliminary experience with 5 and 6 French diagnostic catheters as guiding catheters for coronary angioplasty.
Application of coronary angioplasty to the septal perforator arteries.
Radiation-associated valvular disease.
Cardiotoxicity of interferon. A review of 44 cases.
Lung beta-adrenoceptors in pulmonary hypertension. A study of biopsy specimens in children with congenital heart disease.
Systemic to pulmonary bronchial blood flow in mitral stenosis.
Catheter-induced tricuspid regurgitation. Incidence and clinical significance.
Right ventricular dysfunction in chronic obstructive pulmonary disease. Evaluation and management.
Paradoxic air embolism in the absence of an intracardiac defect.
Left atrial bacterial mural endocarditis.
Pericarditis with tamponade due to cytomegalovirus in the acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Spontaneous regression of cardiomyopathy in a patient with the acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
Coronary artery fistula formation secondary to permanent pacemaker placement.
Venous air embolism. Diagnosis by spontaneous right-sided contrast echocardiography.
The effect of thromboxane synthetase inhibition on cardiopulmonary function during endotoxemia in sheep.
Beta-lactam resistance mechanisms of methicillin-resistant Staphylococcus aureus.
Diagnosing Staphylococcus aureus endocarditis by detecting antibodies against S. aureus capsular polysaccharide types 5 and 8.
Role of tolerance in cloxacillin treatment of experimental Staphylococcus aureus endocarditis.
Sudden death and sleeping history among Finnish men.
Platelet fatty acids and function in two distinct regions of Belgium: relationship to age and dietary habits.
High cardiac output as a paraneoplastic syndrome.
Job dimensions associated with severe disability due to cardiovascular disease.
Regional obesity and risk of cardiovascular disease; the Framingham Study.
Medicare Peer Review Organization preprocedure review criteria. An analysis of criteria for three procedures
Potential complications of high-dose epinephrine therapy in patients resuscitated from cardiac arrest
Cardiomyopathy associated with the smoking of crystal methamphetamine.
Caloric expenditure, life status, and disease in former male athletes and non-athletes.
Selective inhibition by a synthetic hirudin peptide of fibrin-dependent thrombosis in baboons.
Hemolytic transfusion reaction following transfusion of frozen and washed autologous red cells
Home blood pressure readings in borderline hypertensive patients.
Vasodilatory beta-blockers: systemic and regional hemodynamic effects.
Angina, ischemia, and effort tolerance with vasodilating beta-blockers.
Efficacy of celiprolol in the elderly hypertensive patient.
Cardiovascular risk factors and the effects of intervention.
Reversal of cardiac and vascular hypertrophy by antihypertensive therapy.
Dialysis-induced alterations in left ventricular filling: mechanisms and clinical significance.
Hemodynamic effects of partial correction of chronic anemia by recombinant human erythropoietin in patients on dialysis.
Use of the fistula assessment monitor to detect stenoses in access fistulae.
Cyclosporine-induced thrombotic microangiopathy resulting in renal allograft loss and its successful reuse: a report of two cases.
Unsuspected mitral stenosis.
Prognostic significance of valvular regurgitation in patients with infective endocarditis.
Comparison of labetalol versus enalapril as monotherapy in elderly patients with hypertension: results of 24-hour ambulatory blood pressure monitoring.
Elderly patients with congestive heart failure under prepaid care.
Emery-Dreifuss muscular dystrophy.
Non-drug related asystole associated with anaesthetic induction.
Phenytoin administration by constant intravenous infusion: selective rates of administration.
The cardiovascular effects of cocaine.
Drug-induced supraventricular tachycardia: a case report of fluoxetine.
Torsades de pointes therapy with phenytoin.
Delayed onset of cardiac arrhythmias from sustained-release verapamil.
Estimation of myocardial ischemic injury during ventricular fibrillation with total circulatory arrest using high-energy phosphates and lactate as metabolic markers.
Comparison of two doses of endotracheal epinephrine in a cardiac arrest model.
Correction of metabolic acidosis in experimental CPR: a comparative study of sodium bicarbonate, carbicarb, and dextrose.
Plasma concentrations of epinephrine during CPR in the dog.
Tightening the screw: statutory and legal supervision of interhospital patient transfers.
Association of pneumothorax and hypotension with intraventricular haemorrhage.
Increased incidence of respiratory distress syndrome in babies of hypertensive mothers.
Review of clinical experience with digoxin immune Fab (ovine).
Antithrombotic efficacy of continuous extradural analgesia after knee replacement.
Local hypothermia to prolong safe tourniquet time.
Demographic, social and stress correlates of hypertension among the urban poor.
Strain differences in baroreflex inhibition by centrally infused enalapril in old rats.
Prostacyclin production in myocardial infarction in the acute phase and during follow-up.
Rapid and correct diagnosis of myocardial infarction: standardized case history and clinical examination provide important information for correct referral to monitored beds.
Skeletal muscle depressed calcium and phosphofructokinase in chronic heart failure are upregulated by captopril--a double-blind, placebo-controlled study.
Gastric lymphoma causing granulocytopenia and cold intolerance, with recovery after treatment.
Major clinical diagnoses found among patients with Raynaud phenomenon from the general population.
Serological arguments for classifying Raynaud's phenomenon as idiopathic.
Microheterogeneity of acute phase proteins in the differentiation of polymyalgia rheumatica from polymyositis.
Dapsone is an effective therapy for the skin lesions of subacute cutaneous lupus erythematosus and urticarial vasculitis in a patient with C2 deficiency.
Purulent pericarditis and cardiac tamponade caused by Nocardia asteroides in mixed connective tissue disease.
Primary orchiectomy versus estrogen therapy in advanced prostatic cancer--a randomized study: results after 7 to 10 years of followup.
Direct CO2 laser "revascularization" of the myocardium.
Improvement in the diagnosis of abscesses associated with endocarditis by transesophageal echocardiography
Late cardiac effects of doxorubicin therapy for acute lymphoblastic leukemia in childhood
Emergent aneurysm surgery without cerebral angiography for the comatose patient
Spinal cord compression from a thoracic paraganglioma: case report.
Exposure of the intracavernous carotid artery in aneurysm surgery.
Monitoring of spinal cord stimulation evoked potentials during thoracoabdominal aneurysm surgery.
Grinspan's syndrome: a drug-induced phenomenon?
Presentation and management of an acute caffeine overdose.
Pathogenesis of ischemic necrosis in random-pattern skin flaps induced by long-term low-dose nicotine treatment in the rat.
Free-tissue transfers for limb salvage utilizing in situ saphenous vein bypass conduit as the inflow.
Antibodies directed against neutrophils (C-ANCA and P-ANCA) are of distinct diagnostic value in systemic vasculitis.
Radiographic manifestations of anomalies of the lung.
Effect of left ventricular aneurysm on risk of sudden and nonsudden cardiac death.
Angiographic morphology in unstable angina and its relation to transient myocardial ischemia and hospital outcome.
Anginal symptoms without ischemic electrocardiographic changes during ambulatory monitoring in men with coronary artery disease.
Dependence of Doppler echocardiographic transmitral early peak velocity on left ventricular systolic function in coronary artery disease.
Relation of serum lipoprotein cholesterol levels to presence and severity of angiographic coronary artery disease.
Edge detection versus densitometry for assessing coronary stenting quantitatively.
Frequency of success and complications of coronary angioplasty of a stenosis at the ostium of a branch vessel.
Doppler echocardiographic comparison of the Carpentier and Duran anuloplasty rings versus no ring after mitral valve repair for mitral regurgitation.
Mapping of the locus for X-linked cardioskeletal myopathy with neutropenia and abnormal mitochondria (Barth syndrome) to Xq28.
Thermolabile methylenetetrahydrofolate reductase: an inherited risk factor for coronary artery disease.
The spectrum of portal vein thrombosis in liver transplantation.
Fibrous skeleton and ventricular outflow tracts in double-outlet right ventricle.
Progress of patients with pulmonary atresia after systemic to pulmonary arterial shunts.
Superiority of retrograde cardioplegia after acute coronary occlusion.
Efficacy of coronary sinus cardioplegia in patients with complete coronary artery occlusions.
Replacement of the aortic valve or root with a pulmonary autograft in children.
Failure of Hancock pericardial xenografts: is prophylactic bioprosthetic replacement justified?
Management of aortic insufficiency in chronic aortic dissection.
Postcardiotomy mechanical circulatory support in the elderly.
Hemodynamic effects of lobar pulmonary artery occlusion in a porcine sepsis model.
Reoperation for persistent outflow obstruction in hypertrophic cardiomyopathy.
Combined myocardial revascularization and abdominal aortic aneurysm repair.
Left ventricular pseudoaneurysm with hemoptysis.
An unusual complication of cardiac transplantation--infected aortic pseudoaneurysm.
Repair of posterior left ventricular aneurysm in a six-year-old boy.
Hemolysis due to branch pulmonary stenosis after the arterial switch procedure.
False aneurysm formation of the great arteries after arterial switch operation.
Silicone pouch for protection of automatic implantable cardioverter-defibrillator leads.
Fistulas between the aorta and tracheobronchial tree.
Dural spinal cord arteriovenous malformation.
A cellist with arm pain: thermal asymmetry in scalenus anticus syndrome.
Coagulation studies in the syndrome of haemolysis, elevated liver enzymes and low platelets.
Comparison between perindopril and nifedipine in hypertensive and normotensive diabetic patients with microalbuminuria. Melbourne Diabetic Nephropathy Study Group
Detecting hypertension: screening versus case finding in Norway.
Changes in haemostasis after stopping the combined contraceptive pill: implications for major surgery.
Complications in percutaneous transluminal angioplasty: relationships with patient age.
Double-blind randomized trial of perioperative fibrinolytic enhancement for femoropopliteal bypass.
Infrarenal abdominal aortic disease: a review of the retroperitoneal approach.
Treatment with deferoxamine during ischemia improves functional and metabolic recovery and reduces reperfusion-induced oxygen radical generation in rabbit hearts
Myocardial infarct size-limiting effect of ischemic preconditioning was not attenuated by oxygen free-radical scavengers in the rabbit.
Transvascular intracardiac applications of a miniaturized phased-array ultrasonic endoscope. Initial experience with intracardiac imaging in piglets.
Contractility and stiffness of noninfarcted myocardium after coronary ligation in rats. Effects of chronic angiotensin converting enzyme inhibition.
Coronary blood flow in dogs with contractile dysfunction due to experimental volume overload.
Myocardial perfusion-contraction matching. Implications for coronary heart disease and hibernation.
Ten-year incidence of myocardial infarction and prognosis after infarction. Department of Veterans Affairs Cooperative Study of Coronary Artery Bypass Surgery
What is the best predictor of spontaneous ventricular tachycardia and sudden death after myocardial infarction?
Prospective comparison of a conventional and an accelerated protocol for programmed ventricular stimulation in patients with coronary artery disease.
Value of peak exercise oxygen consumption for optimal timing of cardiac transplantation in ambulatory patients with heart failure.
Results and follow-up after percutaneous pulsed laser-assisted balloon angioplasty guided by spectroscopy
Left ventricular passive diastolic properties in chronic mitral regurgitation.
Prognostic significance of Doppler measures of diastolic function in cardiac amyloidosis. A Doppler echocardiography study.
Catheter modification of the atrioventricular junction with radiofrequency energy for control of atrioventricular nodal reentry tachycardia.
Fibrinogen, viscosity, and white blood cell count are major risk factors for ischemic heart disease. The Caerphilly and Speedwell collaborative heart disease studies
Upward shift of the lower range of coronary flow autoregulation in hypertensive patients with hypertrophy of the left ventricle
Concept of maximal flow ratio for immediate evaluation of percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty result by videodensitometry.
Heart rate adjustment of exercise-induced ST segment depression. Improved risk stratification in the Framingham Offspring Study
Electrocardiographic body surface potential mapping in the Wolff-Parkinson-White syndrome. Noninvasive determination of the ventricular insertion sites of accessory atrioventricular connections.
Diagnostic efficiency of troponin T measurements in acute myocardial infarction
Intravascular ultrasound imaging of human coronary arteries in vivo. Analysis of tissue characterizations with comparison to in vitro histological specimens.
Acute coronary artery occlusion during and after percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty. Frequency, prediction, clinical course, management, and follow-up [published erratum appears in Circulation 1991 Jul;84(1):446]
Baroreflex sensitivity and electrophysiological correlates in patients after acute myocardial infarction.
Giant cell versus lymphocytic myocarditis. A comparison of their clinical features and long-term outcomes
Multiplexing studies of effects of rapid atrial pacing on the area of slow conduction during atrial flutter in canine pericarditis model.
Xanthine oxidase inhibition does not limit canine infarct size.
Hemodynamic benefit of maintaining atrioventricular synchrony during cardiac pacing in critically ill patients.
Pulmonary effects of ischemic limb reperfusion: evidence for a role for oxygen-derived radicals.
Mild hypothermic cardiopulmonary resuscitation improves outcome after prolonged cardiac arrest in dogs
Hemorrhoidectomy during pregnancy: risk or relief?
Trolox protects rat hepatocytes against oxyradical damage and the ischemic rat liver from reperfusion injury.
Temporal relationship between the decrease in arterial pressure and sodium retention in conscious spontaneously hypertensive rats with carbon tetrachloride-induced cirrhosis.
Adrenergic stimulation of renal prostanoids in the Lyon hypertensive rat.
Effects of antihypertensive therapy on mechanics of cerebral arterioles in rats.
Leukocyte counts and activation in spontaneously hypertensive and normotensive rats
Kinetic abnormalities of the red blood cell sodium-proton exchange in hypertensive patients.
Specific supersensitivity of the mesenteric vascular bed of Dahl salt-sensitive rats.
High NaCl diet enhances arterial baroreceptor reflex in NaCl-sensitive spontaneously hypertensive rats.
Effect of age on coronary circulation after imposition of pressure-overload in rats.
Systolic Hypertension of the Elderly Program (SHEP). Part 10: Analysis.
Arterial mechanical properties in dilated cardiomyopathy. Aging and the response to nitroprusside.
Diastolic dysfunction in hypertrophic cardiomyopathy. Effect on active force generation during systole.
Epidermotropic eccrine porocarcinoma.
Unfading acral microlivedo. A discrete marker of thrombotic skin disease associated with antiphospholipid antibody syndrome.
Cutaneous manifestations in patients with essential thrombocythemia.
Round fingerpad sign: an early sign of scleroderma.
Thrombotic vasculopathy associated with cryofibrinogenemia.
Perioperative myocardial ischemia in patients undergoing noncardiac surgery--I: Incidence and severity during the 4 day perioperative period. The Study of Perioperative Ischemia (SPI) Research Group.
Perioperative myocardial ischemia in patients undergoing noncardiac surgery--II: Incidence and severity during the 1st week after surgery. The Study of Perioperative Ischemia (SPI) Research Group.
Influence of right bundle branch block on short- and long-term survival after acute anterior myocardial infarction
Thrombosis-related markers in unstable angina pectoris.
Effect of abrupt mitral regurgitation after balloon valvuloplasty on myocardial load and performance.
Coronary vasodilation is impaired in both hypertrophied and nonhypertrophied myocardium of patients with hypertrophic cardiomyopathy: a study with nitrogen-13 ammonia and positron emission tomography.
Mechanisms for left ventricular systolic dysfunction in aortic regurgitation: importance for predicting the functional response to aortic valve replacement
Impact of orifice geometry on the shape of jets: an in vitro Doppler color flow study.
Patient age and results of balloon aortic valvuloplasty: the Mansfield Scientific Registry experience. The Mansfield Scientific Aortic Valvuloplasty Registry Investigators.
Drug response at electropharmacologic study in patients with ventricular tachyarrhythmias: the importance of ventricular refractoriness.
Morphologic comparison of patients with mitral valve prolapse who died suddenly with patients who died from severe valvular dysfunction or other conditions.
Tricuspid atresia or severe stenosis with partial common atrioventricular canal: anatomic data, clinical profile and surgical considerations.
Tricuspid valve dysplasia or displacement in intrauterine life.
Aortico-left ventricular tunnel: long-term outcome after surgical repair.
Anti-ischemic effects of atenolol versus nifedipine in patients with coronary artery disease and ambulatory silent ischemia.
Sinus node-atrioventricular node isolation: long-term results with the "corridor" operation for atrial fibrillation
Value of ventricular electrogram recordings in the diagnosis of arrhythmias precipitating electrical device shock therapy.
Smooth muscle cell proliferation and restenosis after stand alone coronary excimer laser angioplasty
Life events and difficulties preceding stroke.
Transient ischaemic attacks in young patients: a thromboembolic or migrainous manifestation? A 10 year follow up study of 46 patients.
Case finding, data quality aspects and comparability of myocardial infarction registers: results of a south German register study.
Sequential or fixed sample trial design? A case study by stochastic simulation.
Inability to demonstrate physiologic correlates of subjective improvement among patients taught the relaxation response.
Changes in cardiac function during extracorporeal membrane oxygenation for persistent pulmonary hypertension in the newborn infant.
Cardiac performance in infants referred for extracorporeal membrane oxygenation.
Influence of preservation or perfusion of intraoperatively identified spinal cord blood supply on spinal motor evoked potentials and paraplegia after aortic surgery.
Abdominal aortic aneurysm: results of a family study.
Revascularization of an ischemic limb by use of a muscle pedicle flap: a rabbit model.
Limitations of magnetic resonance imaging and ultrasound-directed (duplex) scanning in the diagnosis of subclavian vein thrombosis.
Popliteal artery aneurysms. Long-term follow-up of aneurysmal disease and results of surgical treatment.
Occlusion of the brachial artery by thrombus dislodged from a traumatic aneurysm of the anterior humeral circumflex artery.
Interval gangrene of the lower extremity: a complication of vascular surgery.
Hemodynamic consequences of carotid-carotid bypass for innominate artery stenosis.
Skewflap versus long posterior flap in below-knee amputations: multicenter trial.
Limitations of electroencephalographic monitoring in the detection of cerebral ischemia accompanying carotid endarterectomy.
Suggested standards for reporting on arterial aneurysms. Subcommittee on Reporting Standards for Arterial Aneurysms, Ad Hoc Committee on Reporting Standards, Society for Vascular Surgery and North American Chapter, International Society for Cardiovascular Surgery.
Exposing patients with chronic, stable, exertional angina to placebo periods in drug trials.
Antihypertensive therapy. To stop or not to stop?
The surgical treatment of atrial fibrillation. I. Summary of the current concepts of the mechanisms of atrial flutter and atrial fibrillation.
The surgical treatment of atrial fibrillation. II. Intraoperative electrophysiologic mapping and description of the electrophysiologic basis of atrial flutter and atrial fibrillation.
Comparison of two levels of anticoagulant therapy in patients with substitute heart valves
Analysis and predictors of pulmonary vascular resistance after cardiac transplantation.
The mechanism of heart failure caused by cardiac allograft rejection.
Emergency cardiopulmonary bypass support in patients with cardiac arrest.
Studies of controlled reperfusion after ischemia. XXIII. Deleterious effects of simulated thrombolysis preceding simulated coronary artery bypass grafting with controlled blood cardioplegic reperfusion.
Mitral valve repair by replacement of chordae tendineae with polytetrafluoroethylene sutures.
Alcohol and pyruvate cardioplegia. Twenty-four-hour in situ preservation of hamster hearts.
The dynamics of antegrade cardioplegia with simultaneous coronary sinus occlusion. Effects on aortic root infusion pressure, coronary sinus pressure, and myocardial cooling.
Critical aortic stenosis in early infancy. Anatomic and echocardiographic substrates of successful open valvotomy.
Freehand allograft aortic valve replacement and aortic root replacement. Utility of intraoperative echocardiography and Doppler color flow mapping.
Deprivation in infancy or in adult life: which is more important for mortality risk?
Paraneoplastic vasculitic neuropathy: a treatable neuropathy.
Hypoglycemia, hypotonia, and cardiomyopathy: the evolving clinical picture of long-chain acyl-CoA dehydrogenase deficiency.
Tilt test for diagnosis of unexplained syncope in pediatric patients.
Orthopedic complications. Compartment syndrome, fat embolism syndrome, and venous thromboembolism.
Raynaud's syndrome. Using a range of therapies to help patients.
Heart transplantation in patients with severe pulmonary hypertension and increased pulmonary vascular resistance.
Surgical treatment of active native valve endocarditis.
Spinal cord injury after subclavian flap aortoplasty. An experimental study in piglets.
Ultrastructural changes in rat hearts following cold cardioplegic ischemia of differing duration and differing modes of reperfusion.
Coronary trapping of a complement activation product (C3a des-Arg) during myocardial reperfusion in open-heart surgery.
Gastric infarction.
Elective resection of 332 abdominal aortic aneurysms in a southern West Virginia community during a recent five-year period.
Late arterial hemorrhage secondary to a Greenfield filter requiring operative intervention.
Subacute poisoning with phosalone, an organophosphate insecticide.
New developments in cardiopulmonary resuscitation.
Outpatient management of schizophrenia.
Safety and efficacy of urokinase during elective coronary angioplasty.
Late streptokinase infusion and antithrombotic treatment in myocardial infarction reduce subsequent myocardial ischemia.
Immediate regional endocardial surface expansion following coronary occlusion in the canine left ventricle: disproportionate effects of anterior versus inferior ischemia.
Detection of myocardial infarction in the presence of Wolff-Parkinson-White syndrome by QRST isoarea map in dogs.
Acute reduction of mitral valve area after percutaneous balloon mitral valvuloplasty: assessment with Doppler continuity equation method.
Acute hemodynamic effects of intravenous diperdipine, a new dihydropyridine derivative, in coronary heart disease.
Ultra short-acting intravenous beta-adrenergic blockade as add-on therapy in acute unstable angina.
Improvement of systolic and diastolic left ventricular wall motion by serial echocardiograms in selected patients treated for unstable angina.
Collateral circulation in Kawasaki disease with coronary occlusion or severe stenosis.
Histologic abnormalities of large and small coronary arteries, neural structures, and the conduction system of the heart found in postmortem studies of individuals dying from the toxic oil syndrome.
Time course of improvement in ventricular function after ablation of incessant automatic atrial tachycardia.
Identification of the rate-dependent functional refractory period of the atrioventricular node in simulated atrial fibrillation.
Septal ventricular pacing in the immature canine heart: a new perspective.
Noninvasive estimation of left atrial pressure in patients with congestive heart failure and mitral regurgitation by Doppler echocardiography.
Coronary collateral recruitment: functional significance and relation to rate of vessel closure.
Myocardial imaging with Tc-99m teboroxime: technique and initial results.
Epidemiology of heart failure.
Future directions in vasodilator therapy for heart failure.
Clinical efficacy of flosequinan in heart failure.
Early beneficial effect of streptokinase on left ventricular function in acute myocardial infarction.
Effects of nisoldipine on myocardial ischemia during exercise and during daily activity.
Usefulness of blood lactate as a predictor of shock development in acute myocardial infarction [published erratum appears in Am J Cardiol 1991 Apr 15;67(9):912]
Long-term follow-up of the first 56 patients treated with intracoronary self-expanding stents (the Lausanne experience).
Capabilities of supine exercise electrocardiography versus exercise radionuclide angiography in predicting coronary events.
Cardiac Arrest in Seattle: Conventional Versus Amiodarone Drug Evaluation (the CASCADE study).
Relation of cardiac output at rest and during exercise to age in essential hypertension.
Comparison of the effects of guanadrel sulfate and propranolol on blood pressure, functional capacity, serum lipoproteins and glucose in systemic hypertension.
Comparison of ambulatory left ventricular ejection fraction and blood pressure in systemic hypertension in patients with and without increased left ventricular mass.
Abnormal baroreflex control of heart rate in decompensated congestive heart failure and reversal after compensation.
Doppler echocardiographic study of porcine bioprosthetic heart valves in the aortic valve position in patients without evidence of cardiac dysfunction.
Clinical and Doppler echocardiographic follow-up after percutaneous balloon valvuloplasty for aortic valve stenosis.
Indapamide: a diuretic of choice for the treatment of hypertension?
Gonococcal endocarditis: twenty-five year experience.
Prevalence and association of asteroid hyalosis with systemic diseases.
Effects of the phospholipase inhibitor mepacrine on injury in ischemic and metabolically inhibited adult isolated myocytes.
Susceptibility to Coxsackievirus B3-induced chronic myocarditis maps near the murine Tcr alpha and Myhc alpha loci on chromosome 14.
Postoperative myocardial ischemia in patients undergoing coronary artery bypass graft surgery. S.P.I. Research Group.
Acute respiratory failure caused by pulmonary vasculitis after L-tryptophan ingestion.
Oxygen supply and utilization relationships. A reevaluation.
Propafenone treatment of symptomatic paroxysmal supraventricular arrhythmias. A randomized, placebo-controlled, crossover trial in patients tolerating oral therapy.
Digoxin for atrial fibrillation: a drug whose time has gone?
Ceftriaxone-sulbactam combination in rabbit endocarditis caused by a strain of Klebsiella pneumoniae producing extended-broad-spectrum TEM-3 beta-lactamase.
Daptomycin compared with teicoplanin and vancomycin for therapy of experimental Staphylococcus aureus endocarditis.
Causes and consequences of blood pressure alterations in obstructive sleep apnea.
Changes in physician practice for the prevention of cardiovascular disease.
Low-dose heparin. A cause of hematoma of rectus abdominis.
The pathology of heart allograft rejection.
The surgical pathologist's role in liver transplantation.
Current status of organ preservation with University of Wisconsin solution.
Antecedent medical diseases in patients with amyotrophic lateral sclerosis. A population-based case-controlled study in Rochester, Minn, 1925 through 1987.
Splenic artery aneurysm rupture [published erratum appears in Am J Emerg Med 1991 Mar;9(2):205]
Oral contraceptive therapy and the surgical management of ENT patients: a review of current clinical practice.
Ventricular ectopy: significance and management.
Weight reduction in obese hypertensive patients.
Digital cutaneous vascular responses to histamine and neuropeptides in Raynaud's phenomenon.
Senile cardiac amyloidosis associated with homozygosity for a transthyretin variant (ILE-122).
Assessment and counseling of coronary risk factors by family practice residents.
A manifesting carrier of Duchenne muscular dystrophy with severe myocardial symptoms.
Giant carotid-ophthalmic artery aneurysms: direct clipping utilizing the "trapping-evacuation" technique.
Subarachnoid hemorrhage of unknown etiology: early prognostic factors for long-term functional capacity.
Hemifacial spasm caused by a spontaneous dissecting aneurysm of the vertebral artery. Case report.
Warning: fatal reaction to the use of fibrin glue in deep hepatic wounds. Case reports.
Traumatic popliteal artery pseudoaneurysms: case report and review of the literature.
Red cell Na+/Li+ countertransport in non-insulin-dependent diabetics with diabetic nephropathy.
Direct vasopressor effect of recombinant human erythropoietin on renal resistance vessels.
Microvascular pedal bypass for salvage of the severely ischemic limb
Serum lipids and lipoproteins are less powerful predictors of extracranial carotid artery atherosclerosis than are cigarette smoking and hypertension
Early outcome after placement of a metallic intracoronary stent: initial Mayo Clinic experience
Efficacy of percutaneous mitral balloon valvuloplasty with the inoue balloon.
Hypertension during pregnancy in insulin-dependent diabetic women.
No effect of experimental noise exposure on human pregnancy.
Extensive aneurysmal bone cyst of the mandible: surgical resection and immediate reconstruction. A case report.
Cardiovascular sequelae of therapeutic thoracic radiation.
Isolated pulmonary valvular regurgitation: current perspectives.
Mortality in acute stroke with atrial fibrillation. The Italian Acute Stroke Study Group.
Treatment of acute hydrocephalus after subarachnoid hemorrhage with serial lumbar puncture.
Brain magnetic resonance imaging and neuropsychologic evaluation of patients with idiopathic dilated cardiomyopathy.
Atrial fibrillation after stroke in the elderly.
An improved photochemical model of embolic cerebral infarction in rats.
Clentiazem reduces infarct size in rabbit middle cerebral artery occlusion.
Basilar artery occlusion in rats.
Turner's syndrome, fibromuscular dysplasia, and stroke.
Babinski-Nageotte syndrome on magnetic resonance imaging.
Correlation of common carotid flow volume measured by ultrasonic quantitative flowmeter with pathological findings.
Quantitative assessment of cerebral blood volume by single-photon emission computed tomography.
Air embolism of the brain in rabbits pretreated with mechlorethamine.
Adventitial red blood cells produce intimal platelet accumulation in cerebral arteries of cats following subarachnoid hemorrhage.
Scleroderma and central nervous system vasculitis.
A model to predict multivessel coronary artery disease from the exercise thallium-201 stress test.
Clinical, radiographic, and hemodynamic correlations in chronic congestive heart failure: conflicting results may lead to inappropriate care.
Percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty in hypothyroidism.
Bacterial endocarditis presenting as acute myocardial infarction: a cautionary note for the era of reperfusion.
The yield of cholesterol screening in an urban black community.
The validity of health risk appraisals for coronary heart disease: results from a randomized field trial.
Dose-response evaluation of oral labetalol in patients presenting to the emergency department with accelerated hypertension.
Elapsed time from symptom onset and acute myocardial infarction in a community hospital.
Outcome of CPR in a large metropolitan area--where are the survivors?
Dispatcher-assisted telephone CPR: common delays and time standards for delivery.
Thrombolytic therapy for noncoronary diseases.
Endocarditis in the emergency department.
Endoscopic laser surgery. A single-center comprehensive experience.
The failure of serial pneumatic cuff venous occlusion plethysmography to predict patients at risk for pulmonary emboli after trauma.
Effect of antihypertensives on sexual function and quality of life: the TAIM Study
Emboli in infective endocarditis: the prognostic value of echocardiography.
Comparison of silent and symptomatic ischemia during exercise testing in men
Tolerance to organic nitrates: evidence, mechanisms, clinical relevance, and strategies for prevention.
A prospective study of acute central retinal artery obstruction. The incidence of secondary ocular neovascularization.
Symptoms of Raynaud's syndrome in patients with fibromyalgia. A study utilizing the Nielsen test, digital photoplethysmography, and measurements of platelet alpha 2-adrenergic receptors.
Epidemiologic and immunogenetic aspects of polymyalgia rheumatica and giant cell arteritis in northern Italy.
Diagnosis of recent myocardial infarction with quantitative backscatter imaging: preliminary studies.
Plaque and structural characteristics of the descending thoracic aorta using transesophageal echocardiography.
Doppler echocardiographic assessment of changes in pulmonary artery pressure associated with vasodilating therapy in patients with congestive heart failure.
When is echocardiography unreliable in patients undergoing catheterization for pediatric cardiovascular disease?
Value and limitations of proximal jet dimensions for the quantitation of valvular regurgitation: an in vitro study using Doppler flow imaging.
Quadricuspid aortic valve and aortic regurgitation diagnosed by Doppler echocardiography: report of two cases and review of the literature.
Detection and evaluation of intrapulmonary vascular shunt with "contrast Doppler" transesophageal echocardiography.
Lower leg subcutaneous blood flow during walking and passive dependency in chronic venous insufficiency.
Angiotensin II levels in hypertensive and normotensive pregnancies.
Small bowel enteroscopy: an early experience in gastrointestinal bleeding of unknown origin.
A technique for improving accuracy of the pulmonary artery diastolic pressure as an estimate of left ventricular end-diastolic pressure.
Effects of two chest tube clearance protocols on drainage in patients after myocardial revascularization surgery.
Effects of occupied and unoccupied bed making on myocardial work in healthy subjects.
Right ventricular infarction: a clinical case study.
Effect of increased left atrial pressure on breathing frequency in anesthetized dog.
Lung injury in a surfactant-deficient lung is modified by indomethacin.
Hemodynamic effects of synchronous high-frequency jet ventilation in mitral regurgitation.
Role of hemodynamics and vagus nerves in development of fibrin-induced pulmonary edema.
Intraoperative anaphylaxis: an association with latex sensitivity.
Dipyridamole technetium-99m-2-methoxy isobutyl isonitrile tomoscintigraphic imaging for identifying diseased coronary vessels: comparison with thallium-201 stress-rest study.
Lung thallium-201 uptake during exercise emission computed tomography.
Relative accuracy of three scintigraphic methods for determination of right ventricular ejection fraction: a correlative study with ultrafast computed tomography.
Comparison of myocardial imaging with iodine-123-iodophenyl-9-methyl pentadecanoic acid and thallium-201-chloride for assessment of patients with exercise-induced myocardial ischemia.
Involvement of sodium in the protective effect of 5-(N,N-dimethyl)-amiloride on ischemia-reperfusion injury in isolated rat ventricular wall.
Full recovery after a chloroquine suicide attempt.
Diltiazem overdose: pharmacokinetics of diltiazem and its metabolites and effect of multiple dose charcoal therapy.
Hypertension as an unusual feature in an outbreak of tetrodotoxin poisoning.
Ultrastructural changes in impotent penile tissue: a comparison of 65 patients.
Estrogen and coronary heart disease in women.
Exercise capability in heart failure: is cardiac output important after all?
Thrombotic thrombocytopenic purpura related to ticlopidine
Ataxia-telangiectasia: an interdisciplinary approach to pathogenesis.
Proximal posterior cerebral artery occlusion simulating middle cerebral artery occlusion.
Retinal vasculitis as a complication of rheumatoid arthritis.
Pulmonary artery-bronchus ratios in patients with normal lungs, pulmonary vascular plethora, and congestive heart failure.
Gallbladder varices: imaging findings in patients with portal hypertension.
Normal and diffusely abnormal myocardium in humans: functional and metabolic characterization with P-31 MR spectroscopy and cine MR imaging.
Liver transplantation: MR angiography with surgical validation.
Deep venous thrombosis: longitudinal study with duplex US.
Clot-trapper device for transjugular thrombectomy from the inferior vena cava.
The Greenfield filter as the primary means of therapy in venous thromboembolic disease.
Ischemic intestinal complications in patients with burns.
Computed tomography for evaluation of puerperal infections.
Retinal vasculitis--a primer.
Effects of atenolol alone, nifedipine alone and their combination on ambulant myocardial ischemia.
Spontaneous myocardial ischemia and the signal-averaged electrocardiogram.
Right ventricular systolic function during exercise with and without significant coronary artery disease.
Coronary collateral circulation in coronary artery disease and systemic hypertension.
Results of intracoronary stents for management of coronary dissection after balloon angioplasty.
Late outcome of survivors of out-of-hospital cardiac arrest with left ventricular ejection fractions greater than or equal to 50% and without significant coronary arterial narrowing.
Comparison of clinical and electrophysiologic features of preexcitation syndromes in patients presenting initially after age 50 years with those presenting at younger ages.
Time of onset of supraventricular tachyarrhythmia in relation to alcohol consumption.
Hemodynamic and neurohormonal effects of quinidine in patients with severe left ventricular dysfunction secondary to coronary artery disease or idiopathic dilated cardiomyopathy.
Effects of prolonged infusion of human alpha calcitonin gene-related peptide on hemodynamics, renal blood flow and hormone levels in congestive heart failure.
Catheter-based intravascular ultrasound imaging of chronic thromboembolic pulmonary disease.
Assessment of right ventricular oxidative metabolism by positron emission tomography with C-11 acetate in aortic valve disease.
Treatment of hypertension in the elderly: effects on blood pressure, heart rate, and physical fitness.
Hypertension and the risk of dementia in the elderly.
Veterans Administration Cooperative Study Group on Hypertensive Agents: effects of age on treatment results.
Age-related hypotensive effect of placebo and active treatment in patients older than 60 years. European Working Party on High Blood Pressure in the Elderly.
Choice of drug treatment for elderly hypertensive patients.
Body mass index and prognosis in elderly hypertensive patients: a report from the European Working Party on High Blood Pressure in the Elderly.
Adverse treatment effects in the trial of the European Working Party on High Blood Pressure in the Elderly.
Renal function in the elderly: results from the European Working Party on High Blood Pressure in the Elderly trial.
Trends in systolic blood pressure, 24-hour sodium excretion, and stroke mortality in the elderly in Belgium.
The determinants and prognostic significance of serum uric acid in elderly patients of the European Working Party on High Blood Pressure in the Elderly trial.
Left ventricular hypertrophy in elderly hypertensive patients: a report from the European Working Party on High Blood Pressure in the Elderly trial.
Mortality and treated blood pressure in patients of the European Working Party on High Blood Pressure in the Elderly.
Serum cholesterol levels and survival in elderly hypertensive patients: analysis of data from the European Working Party on High Blood Pressure in the Elderly.
Isolated systolic hypertension in the elderly: an epidemiologic review.
Which drug prevents tachycardia and hypertension associated with tracheal intubation: lidocaine, fentanyl, or esmolol?
The effect on skin blood flow of short-term venous hypertension in normal subjects.
Perivascular innervation of the cerebral arteries in spontaneously hypertensive rats--an immunohistochemical study.
Cardiac arrest due to spontaneous coronary artery dissection in a patient with coronary ectasia--a case report.
Pheochromocytoma with electrocardiographic change mimicking angina pectoris, and cyclic change in direct arterial pressure--a case report.
Occult inferior vena cava thrombosis: diagnosis by sonography--case reports.
Downslope claudication in eosinophilic fasciitis: a fourth type of claudication--case presentations.
The role of intracaval filters in patients with COPD and DVT.
A rheolytic system for percutaneous coronary and peripheral plaque removal.
Comparison of coronary angiographic features and oral dipyridamole thallium 201 tomography.
Azathioprine. An effective, corticosteroid-sparing therapy for patients with recalcitrant cutaneous lupus erythematosus or with recalcitrant cutaneous leukocytoclastic vasculitis.
Effects of calcium on vascular smooth muscle tone.
Sustained calcium channel blockade in the treatment of severe hypertension. A two year experience.
Nifedipine gastrointestinal therapeutic system in the treatment of hypertension. Results of a multicenter trial. The Modern Approach to the Treatment of Hypertension (MATH) Study Group.
Antihypertensive effectiveness of nifedipine gastrointestinal therapeutic system in the elderly. The Modern Approach to the Treatment of Hypertension (MATH) Study Group.
Endocrine and renal effects of nifedipine gastrointestinal therapeutic system in patients with essential hypertension. Results of a multicenter trial. The Modern Approach to the Treatment of Hypertension Study Group.
Therapeutic considerations in the elderly hypertensive. The role of calcium channel blockers.
Metabolic considerations in hypertension.
Pathophysiology of hypertension in blacks.
Different plasma ionized calcium correlations with blood pressure in high and low renin normotensive adults in Utah.
Arterial blood pressure. Correlation with erythrocyte count, hematocrit, and hemoglobin concentration.
Loss of nocturnal decline of blood pressure in hypertension due to chronic renal failure.
Extended release felodipine in essential hypertension. Variations in blood pressure during whole-day continuous ambulatory recording.
Relationship between blood pressure, plasma insulin and triglyceride concentration, and insulin action in spontaneous hypertensive and Wistar-Kyoto rats.
Coronary vascular remodeling and myocardial fibrosis in the rat with renovascular hypertension. Response to captopril.
Tachycardia during reversal of one-kidney, one-clip hypertension in conscious rats.
Proximal tubular alpha 2-adrenoceptor density in the spontaneously hypertensive rat.
Inhibition of norepinephrine release from vascular adrenergic neurons by oral administration of beta-blocker in DOCA-salt hypertension.
The effect of Ca and Mg supplementation and the role of the opioidergic system on the development of DOCA-salt hypertension.
Use of arterial compliance for evaluation of hypertension.
Jets over Labrador and Quebec: noise effects on human health.
Long-term minoxidil treatment in refractory hypertension and renal failure.
Intraocular pressure increases with fenoldopam, but not nitroprusside, in hypertensive humans.
The effects of benazepril, a new angiotensin-converting enzyme inhibitor, in mild to moderate essential hypertension: a multicenter study.
Selective prolongation of QRS late potentials by sodium channel blocking antiarrhythmic drugs: relation to slowing of ventricular tachycardia. Electrophysiologic Study Versus Electrocardiographic Monitoring Trial (ESVEM) Investigators.
Comparison of cardiac catheterization and Doppler echocardiography in the decision to operate in aortic and mitral valve disease
Prognostic value of thallium-201 myocardial perfusion imaging in patients with unstable angina who respond to medical treatment [published erratum appears in J Am Coll Cardiol 1991 Sep;18(3):889]
Comparison of epicardial coronary artery tone and reactivity in Prinzmetal's variant angina and chronic stable angina pectoris
Exercise intolerance in patients with heart failure and preserved left ventricular systolic function: failure of the Frank-Starling mechanism
Quantitative assessment of ultrasonic myocardial reflectivity in hypertrophic cardiomyopathy
Adjacent solid boundaries alter the size of regurgitant jets on Doppler color flow maps.
Effect of lesion characteristics on outcome of directional coronary atherectomy.
Comparison of early versus late experience with percutaneous mitral balloon valvuloplasty.
Transcardiac release of leukotriene C4 by neutrophils in patients with coronary artery disease.
Recovery of retrograde fast pathway excitability in the atrioventricular node reentrant circuit after concealed anterograde impulse penetration.
The severity of coronary atherosclerosis at sites of plaque rupture with occlusive thrombosis.
Transesophageal echocardiography in evaluation and management after a Fontan procedure.
Balloon valvuloplasty for critical aortic stenosis in the newborn: influence of new catheter technology.
Treatment of complicated prosthetic aortic valve endocarditis with annular abscess formation by homograft aortic root replacement.
Immediate and short-term cardiovascular effects of fosinopril, a new angiotensin-converting enzyme inhibitor, in patients with essential hypertension.
Follow-up recatheterization after balloon aortic valvuloplasty. Mansfield Scientific Aortic Valvuloplasty Registry Investigators.
Regional diastolic mechanics of ischemic and nonischemic myocardium in the pig heart.
Onset of induced atrial flutter in the canine pericarditis model
Standards for analysis of ventricular late potentials using high-resolution or signal-averaged electrocardiography: a statement by a task force committee of the European Society of Cardiology, the American Heart Association, and the American College of Cardiology.
Left ventricular diastolic dysfunction presenting as ascites: the importance of clinically assessing central venous pressure.
Normotensive young men with family histories of hypertension gain weight and decrease their intraerythrocyte sodium content during a 5-year follow-up.
Determinants of carotid intima-media thickness: a population-based ultrasonography study in eastern Finnish men.
Felodipine in the treatment of hypertensive type II diabetics: effect on glucose homeostasis.
Atrial fibrillation and left atrial enlargement: cause or effect?
Dilated cardiomyopathy associated with Chlamydia trachomatis infection.
Natural death as viewed by the medical examiner: a review of 1000 consecutive autopsies of individuals dying of natural disease.
Relationship of ischemic heart disease to sudden death.
Cocaine babies: the scourge of the '90s.
Sudden death caused by coronary artery aneurysms: a late complication of Kawasaki disease.
The legal implications of dietary fats: risks of cardiovascular disease and the duty of food manufacturers.
Antihypertensive effect and pharmacokinetics of nitrendipine in children.
The surgical treatment of atrial fibrillation. III. Development of a definitive surgical procedure.
The surgical treatment of atrial fibrillation. IV. Surgical technique.
Continuous extracorporeal fluid removal in children with low cardiac output after cardiac operations.
Superior protective effect of low-calcium, magnesium-free potassium cardioplegic solution on ischemic myocardium. Clinical study in comparison with St. Thomas' Hospital solution.
Association of the renin-sodium profile with the risk of myocardial infarction in patients with hypertension
Control of hypertensive emergencies
Advances in noninvasive detection of CAD.
Newer antihypertensive agents.
Renovascular hypertension. Difficulties in diagnosis and treatment.
Pathophysiology of ischemic skin flaps: differences in xanthine oxidase levels among rats, pigs, and humans.
Intestinal ischemia complicating abdominal aortic surgery.
Cytologic patterns in juice from human pancreatic transplants: correlation with histologic findings in the graft.
Inflammatory abdominal aortic aneurysm: an indication for the retroperitoneal approach.
Intravenous enalaprilat therapy for hypertension.
The origin and fate of complex coronary lesions.
Quantification of rate of coronary artery disease progression by a new method of angiographic analysis.
Severity of coronary atherosclerosis correlates with the respiratory component of heart rate variability.
Clinical efficacy of PTCA and identification of restenosis: evaluation by serial body surface potential mapping.
Segmental wall motion abnormalities in the absence of clinically documented myocardial infarction: clinical significance and evidence of hibernating myocardium.
Effect of direct intracoronary administration of methylergonovine in patients with and without variant angina.
Coronary angiographic patterns in hypertensive compared with normotensive patients.
Relationship of left ventricular mass to impairment of coronary vasodilator reserve in hypertensive heart disease.
Electrocardiographic signs of atrial overload in hypertensive patients: indexes of abnormality of atrial morphology or function?
Diagnostic value of ventricular stimulation in patients with idiopathic dilated cardiomyopathy.
Sinus nodal dysfunction in young patients with long QT syndrome.
Dynamic changes in left ventricular outflow tract flow velocities after amyl nitrite inhalation in hypertrophic cardiomyopathy.
Transesophageal echocardiographic features of normal and dysfunctioning bioprosthetic valves.
Doppler echocardiographic evaluation of streptokinase lysis of thrombosed right-sided St. Jude Medical valves in patients with congenital heart defects.
Assessment of experimental pericardial effusion using nuclear magnetic resonance imaging techniques.
The role of peripheral capacitance and resistance vessels in hypotension following hemodialysis.
Left ventricular remodeling after acute myocardial infarction: clinical course and beneficial effects of angiotensin-converting enzyme inhibition.
Resolved and unresolved issues in the prevention and treatment of coronary artery disease: a workshop consensus statement.
The epidemiology of impaired glucose tolerance and hypertension.
Essential hypertension, metabolic disorders, and insulin resistance.
Insulin resistance and compensatory hyperinsulinemia: role in hypertension, dyslipidemia, and coronary heart disease.
Diabetes mellitus and hypertension: a physiologic basis for a rational therapeutic approach.
Doxazosin therapy in the treatment of diabetic hypertension.
Effect of alpha-adrenergic blockade on blood pressure, glucose, and lipid metabolism in hypertensive patients with non-insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus.
Doxazosin effects on insulin and glucose in hypertensive patients. The Finnish Multicenter Study Group.
Bilateral infrapatellar tendon rupture in a patient with jumper's knee.
Lung vascular injury after administration of viable hemolysin-forming Escherichia coli in isolated rabbit lungs.
Aortic dissection with the entrance tear in the descending thoracic aorta. Analysis of 40 necropsy patients.
Long-term psychosocial adjustment to coronary artery disease.
Interaction of 1,25-dihydroxyvitamin D and plasma renin activity in high renin essential hypertension.
Calcium metabolic indices, vascular retinopathy, and plasma renin activity in essential hypertension.
Awareness of hypertension increases blood pressure and sympathetic responses to cold pressor test.
Captopril-stimulated renal vein renin in hypertensive patients with or without renal artery stenosis.
Increased platelet membrane sodium-proton exchange rate in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
Effect of propranolol on endothelin-induced increase in cytosolic free calcium.
Microalbuminuria in essential hypertension.
Roles of renal and vascular renin in spontaneous hypertension and switching of the mechanism upon nephrectomy. Lack of hypotensive effects of inhibition of renin, converting enzyme, and angiotensin II receptor blocker after bilateral nephrectomy.
Discordant nephron function. A pathogenic factor in hypertension and its vascular complications of stroke and heart attack.
Characteristics of a new angiotensin converting enzyme inhibitor: delapril.
A study of the effects of delapril, a new angiotensin converting enzyme inhibitor, on the diurnal variation of arterial pressure in patients with essential hypertension using indirect and direct arterial pressure monitoring methods.
Comparison of the antihypertensive effects of delapril and enalapril.
Clinical evaluation of delapril in Japan. Report from the Japan Study Group on Delapril.
Comparative study of the effects of three angiotensin converting enzyme inhibitors on the cough reflex.
Long-term effects of delapril on renal function and urinary excretion of kallikrein, prostaglandin E2, and thromboxane B2 in hypertensive patients.
The antihypertensive mechanism of delapril, a newly developed converting enzyme inhibitor, is related to the suppression of vascular angiotensin II release in the spontaneously hypertensive rat.
Converting enzyme inhibitors and renal function in essential and renovascular hypertension.
The use of angiotensin converting enzyme inhibitors in combination with other antihypertensive agents.
Angiotensin converting enzyme inhibitors and quality of life.
Report of the Canadian Cardiovascular Society's consensus conference on the Management of the Postmyocardial Infarction Patient.
Essential hypertension: a sign in search of a disease.
Identification of ischemic and hibernating myocardium: feasibility of post-exercise F-18 deoxyglucose positron emission tomography.
Coronary artery dilatation requiring high inflation pressure.
Coronary angioplasty requiring extraordinarily high balloon inflation pressure.
Successful treatment of an excimer laser-associated coronary artery perforation with the Stack perfusion catheter.
Percutaneous extraction of fractured guidewire from distal right coronary artery.
Arteriovenous fistula as a complication of temporary pacemaker insertion: treatment with percutaneous embolization.
Treatment of congenital coronary arteriovenous malformations with micro-particle embolization.
Angiographic follow-up and clinical outcome of 126 patients after percutaneous directional atherectomy (Simpson AtheroCath) for occlusive peripheral vascular disease.
Predictability and prognosis of PTCA-induced coronary artery aneurysms.
Left ventricular mid-cavitary obstruction after balloon dilation in isolated aortic valve stenosis in children.
Regulation of expression of M, B, and mitochondrial creatine kinase mRNAs in the left ventricle after pressure overload in rats.
Thromboxane mediates diapedesis after ischemia by activation of neutrophil adhesion receptors interacting with basally expressed intercellular adhesion molecule-1.
Fasting in vivo delays myocardial cell damage after brief periods of ischemia in the isolated working rat heart.
Increased Ca2+ signaling after alpha-adrenoceptor activation in vascular hypertrophy.
Carnitine palmitoyltransferase in cardiac ischemia. A potential site for altered fatty acid metabolism.
Circus movement atrial flutter in the canine sterile pericarditis model. Differential effects of procainamide on the components of the reentrant pathway.
Opioids in cerebrospinal fluid in hypotensive newborn pigs.
Inhibitory role of the coronary arterial endothelium to alpha-adrenergic stimulation in experimental heart failure.
Correlation dimension of heartbeat intervals is reduced in conscious pigs by myocardial ischemia.
Effects of mental stress on myocardial perfusion in patients with ischemic heart disease.
Mental stress as a provocative test in patients with various clinical syndromes of coronary heart disease.
Electrocardiographic markers of ischemia during mental stress testing in postinfarction patients. Role of body surface mapping.
Platelet activation by emotional stress in patients with coronary artery disease.
Ventricular responses to mental stress testing in patients with coronary artery disease. Pathophysiological implications.
Methodology of mental stress testing in cardiovascular research.
Influence of mental stress on ventricular pump function in postinfarction patients. An invasive hemodynamic investigation.
Effects of mental exercise in patients with dilated cardiomyopathy and congestive heart failure. An echocardiographic Doppler study.
Assessment of ventricular function with an ambulatory left ventricular function monitor.
Stressful experience and cardiorespiratory disorders.
Psychophysiological stress testing in postinfarction patients. Psychological correlates of cardiovascular arousal and abnormal cardiac responses.
Sympathovagal interaction during mental stress. A study using spectral analysis of heart rate variability in healthy control subjects and patients with a prior myocardial infarction.
Biobehavioral factors in Cardiac Arrhythmia Pilot Study (CAPS). Review and examination.
Mental activity, adrenergic modulation, and cardiac arrhythmias in patients with heart disease.
Stress and sudden death. The case of the long QT syndrome.
Autonomic nervous system and coronary blood flow changes related to emotional activation and sleep.
Coronary flow and mental stress. Experimental findings.
Coronary dynamics and mental arithmetic stress in humans.
Pulmonary hypertension five years after left pneumonectomy for adenoid cystic carcinoma.
Hydatid cyst of the interatrial and interventricular septum of the heart.
Obstructive sleep apnea presenting with nocturnal angina, heart failure, and near-miss sudden death.
Failure of long-term digitalization to prevent rapid ventricular response in patients with paroxysmal atrial fibrillation.
Dilated cardiomyopathy complicated by a pedunculated and mobile left ventricular thrombus on ruptured false tendons.
Proximal aortic dissection with cardiac tamponade. Long-term survival without surgery.
Primary malignant fibrous histiocytoma of the aorta associated with aortic dissection.
Daytime hypertension in obstructive sleep apnea. Prevalence and contributing risk factors.
Is sick sinus syndrome an adenosine-mediated disease? Effects of intravenous aminophylline on sick sinus node function after pharmacologic autonomic blockade.
Ventricular free-wall rupture after myocardial infarction. Treatment and outcome.
CR leads in cardiac emergencies. A preliminary study.
Great vein and right atrial thrombosis in critically ill infants and children with central venous lines.
Reversible cardiogenic shock due to chest tube compression of the right ventricle.
Thrombolysis in acute myocardial infarction.
Bolus, front-loaded, and accelerated thrombolytic infusions for myocardial infarction and pulmonary embolism.
Reperfusion arrhythmias after thrombolysis. Electrophysiologic tempest, or much ado about nothing.
Reperfusion adjunctive therapy.
Indications, timing, and optimal technique for diagnostic angiography and angioplasty in acute myocardial infarction.
Doppler ultrasound of the deep leg veins. A revolution in the diagnosis of deep vein thrombosis and monitoring of thrombolysis.
The pharmacology of aspirin, heparin, coumarin, and thrombolytic agents. Implications for therapeutic use in cardiopulmonary disease.
Geriatric endocarditis: avoiding the trend toward mismanagement.
Mitral annular calcification: significant and worth acting upon.
Impaired pressor reactivity in cirrhosis: evidence for a peripheral vascular defect.
Evaluation of postprandial hyperemia in superior mesenteric artery and portal vein in healthy and cirrhotic humans: an operator-blind echo-Doppler study.
Physical fitness and cardiovascular regulation: mechanisms of orthostatic intolerance.
Preservation of oscillations in postocclusive reactive hyperemia.
Neonatal calves develop airflow limitation due to chronic hypobaric hypoxia.
Mechanisms of blood flow during pneumatic vest cardiopulmonary resuscitation.
Quantitative relationships between left ventricular ejection and wall thickening and geometry.
Surgical correction of recurrent venous ulcer.
Semi-closed, ex-situ, non-reversed or reversed autogenous vein grafting. A technique for femoro-distal arterial bypass.
Femoro-popliteal and femoro-distal bypass: a comparison between in situ and reversed technique.
Transcatheter treatment of splenic artery aneurysms (SAA). Report of two cases.
Late rupture of a superior intercostal artery following repair of aortic coarctation.
Right hemothorax: an unusual presentation of ruptured aortic dissection.
Occlusive arterial disease as a form of presentation of homocystinuria.
Endocardial resection in the treatment of ventricular tachycardia secondary to cardiac trauma.
Coronary artery bypass grafting in a patient with cryoglobulinemia.
False aneurysm of the internal mammary artery.
The clinical utility of carotid duplex scanning.
Surgical treatment of renovascular hypertension and respective late results. A twenty years experience.
Renal angioplasty for renovascular disease: a reappraisal.
Reoperation for myocardial revascularization using the internal mammary artery.
Renal dysfunction after angiography; a risk factor analysis in patients with peripheral vascular disease.
Evaluation of the perforating veins of the lower extremity using high resolution duplex imaging.
Reconstructive surgery in chronic venous obstruction of the lower limbs.
Effects of chronic administration of a vasopressin antagonist with combined antivasopressor and antiantidiuretic activities in rats with left ventricular dysfunction.
Incidental blood pressure elevations: a MIRNET project.
Acute posterior multifocal placoid pigment epitheliopathy with cerebral involvement.
Risk factors for carotid artery stenosis: an epidemiological study of men aged 69 years.
Self-report of physical activity and patterns of mortality in Seventh-Day Adventist men.
Case-control study of coronary heart disease risk factors in the elderly.
Perioperative monitoring of blood flow in femoroinfragenicular vein grafts with Doppler ultrasonography: a preliminary report.
Effects of ischemia and hemoglobin on vascular function in isolated rabbit aortas.
Hemodynamic basis of stasis ulceration--a hypothesis.
Endovascular management of arterial intimal defects: an experimental comparison by arteriography, angioscopy, and intravascular ultrasonography.
Recurrent intracaval renal cell carcinoma: the role of intravascular ultrasonography.
Intravascular ultrasound imaging of an acute dissecting aortic aneurysm: a case report.
The need for quality assurance in vascular surgery.
Long-term vascular access via the inferior vena cava.
Preoperative selection for curable renovascular hypertension.
Ischemic optic neuropathy.
Atherosclerotic carotid disease and the eye.
Hyperhomocysteinemia: an independent risk factor for vascular disease.
Effect of cyclosporine on the development of cerebral vasospasm in a primate model.
Effect of subarachnoid hemorrhage on serotonin uptake and release in the rabbit basilar artery.
Prospective observations of 100 high-risk neonates by high-field (1.5 Tesla) magnetic resonance imaging of the central nervous system: I. Intraventricular and extracerebral lesions.
Follow-up of infants treated with extracorporeal membrane oxygenation for newborn respiratory failure.
Visual loss with dancing extremities and mental disturbances.
Frequency and significance of occult late potentials on the signal-averaged electrocardiogram in sustained ventricular tachycardia after healing of acute myocardial infarction.
Usefulness of the automatic implantable cardioverter defibrillator in improving survival of patients with severely depressed left ventricular function associated with coronary artery disease.
Left ventricular diastolic function in patients with left ventricular systolic dysfunction due to coronary artery disease and effect of nicardipine.
A new method for estimating preexcitation index without extrastimulus technique and its usefulness in determining the mechanism of supraventricular tachycardia.
Usefulness of the electrophysiology laboratory for evaluation of proarrhythmic drug response in coronary artery disease.
Short- and long-term results of catheter balloon percutaneous transvenous mitral commissurotomy.
Ventricular late potentials and induced ventricular arrhythmias after surgical repair of tetralogy of Fallot.
Thallium-201 stress scintigraphy in Takayasu arteritis.
Dietary fats and oils in cardiac arrhythmia in rats.
Introduction: nutritional aspects of palm oil.
Successful liver transplantation in a patient with a thrombosed portomesenteric system after multiple failed shunts.
Chronic diarrhea in essential mixed cryoglobulinemia: a manifestation of visceral vasculitis?
Obesity-related hypertension: evaluation of the separate effects of energy restriction and weight reduction on hemodynamic and neuroendocrine status.
Anticardiolipin antibodies in polymyalgia rheumatica-giant cell arteritis: association with severe vascular complications.
Alcohol consumption--a risk factor for hemorrhagic and non-hemorrhagic stroke.
Reversal of cardiac dysfunction secondary to type 1 primary hyperoxaluria after combined liver-kidney transplantation.
Anti-inflammatory effects of pentoxifylline in claudication.
Pseudoaneurysm of the abdominal aorta: a case report and review of the literature.
Human coronary transplantation-associated arteriosclerosis. Evidence for a chronic immune reaction to activated graft endothelial cells.
Synthesis of IL-1 alpha and IL-1 beta by arterial cells in atherosclerosis.
Ventricular arrhythmias in ischemic heart disease.
Spontaneous dural carotid-cavernous fistula with central retinal vein occlusion and iris neovascularization.
Cardiopulmonary perfusion and cerebral blood flow in bilateral carotid artery disease
Aortic regurgitation after left ventricular myotomy and myectomy.
Tricuspid valve repair for tricuspid valve endocarditis: tricuspid valve "recycling".
Closed heart cryoablation of the His bundle using an anterior septal approach.
Palliative repair of aortic atresia associated with tricuspid atresia and transposition of the great arteries.
Dynamic cardiomyoplasty in chronic Chagas' heart disease: clinicopathological data.
Fibrosing mediastinitis with coronary artery involvement.
Percutaneous transaortic closure of postinfarctional ventricular septal rupture.
Pulmonary artery balloon counterpulsation for intraoperative right ventricular failure.
Excimer laser angioplasty during aortocoronary bypass grafting.
Coronary ostial reconstruction: technical issues.
Patch aortotomy for aortic valve replacement after previous coronary artery bypass grafting.
New operative method for distal aortopulmonary septal defect.
Comparison of sublingual captopril and nifedipine in immediate treatment of hypertensive emergencies. A randomized, single-blind clinical trial.
Progression of peripheral occlusive arterial disease in diabetes mellitus. What factors are predictive?
Female gout. Clinical spectrum and uric acid metabolism.
Afibrinogenemia and hypobetalipoproteinemia in a kindred.
Nonbacterial thrombotic endocarditis in Hong Kong Chinese.
Incidence of myocarditis. A 10-year autopsy study from Malmo, Sweden.
Magnetic resonance imaging white matter lesions and cognitive impairment in hypertensive individuals.
Color Doppler imaging. A new noninvasive technique to diagnose and monitor carotid cavernous sinus fistulas.
The effects of cyclosporin A on eicosanoid excretion in patients with rheumatoid arthritis.
Lipid screening: is it enough to measure total cholesterol concentration?
An in vitro evaluation of an artificial heart.
Intra-aortic balloon counterpulsation in newborn lambs infected with group B streptococcus.
Pathological changes in levator palpebrae superioris muscle treated with botulinum toxin in a case of carotico-cavernous fistula.
Glucose tolerance and blood pressure: long term follow up in middle aged men [published erratum appears in BMJ 1991 Apr 20;302(6782):939]
Prognosis and prognostic factors of retinal infarction: a prospective cohort study.
Prospective study of quality of life before and after coronary artery bypass grafting
Hyaluronan in pleural effusions and in serum.
Acute angiographic and clinical outcome of high speed percutaneous rotational atherectomy (Rotablator).
Angioplasty of coronary bifurcation stenoses: immediate and long-term results of the protecting branch technique.
Vascular entrapment of intra-aortic balloon after short-term balloon counterpulsation.
Nondiagnosed left main ostial stenosis partly due to the use of 5 French coronary angiographic catheters.
Fatty infiltration: another restrictive cardiomyopathic pattern.
New technologies for the treatment of obstructive arterial disease.
Percutaneous balloon versus surgical closed commissurotomy for mitral stenosis. A prospective, randomized trial
Identification of acute myocardial infarction patients suitable for early hospital discharge after aggressive interventional therapy. Results from the Thrombolysis and Angioplasty in Acute Myocardial Infarction Registry.
Expected gains in life expectancy from various coronary heart disease risk factor modifications
Logistic discriminant analysis improves diagnostic accuracy of exercise testing for coronary artery disease in women.
Linking in accessory pathways. Functional loss of antegrade preexcitation.
Patients with two types of atrioventricular junctional (AV nodal) reentrant tachycardia. Evidence that a common pathway of nodal tissue is not present above the reentrant circuit.
Thallium reinjection after stress-redistribution imaging. Does 24-hour delayed imaging after reinjection enhance detection of viable myocardium?
Inhibition of dipyridamole-induced ischemia by antianginal therapy in humans. Correlation with exercise electrocardiography.
Screening for total cholesterol. Do the National Cholesterol Education Program's recommendations detect individuals at high risk of coronary heart disease?
Low rate of treatment of hypercholesterolemia by cardiologists in patients with suspected and proven coronary artery disease.
Association between blood pressure and serum lipids in a population. The Tromso Study.
Fibrocellular tissue response after percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty. An immunocytochemical analysis of the cellular composition.
Early afterdepolarizations and triggered activity in rabbit cardiac Purkinje fibers recovering from ischemic-like conditions. Role of acidosis.
Interventricular coronary steal induced by stenosis of left anterior descending coronary artery in exercising pigs.
Chronic pulmonary thromboembolism in dogs treated with tranexamic acid.
Morphological changes and smooth muscle cell proliferation after experimental excimer laser treatment.
Estimation of myocardial infarct size with ultrasonic tissue characterization.
Nifedipine protects the heart from the acute deleterious effects of cocaine if administered before but not after cocaine.
Hypertension in African-Americans.
Hypertension in Hispanics, Asians and Pacific-Islanders, and Native Americans.
Strokes in African-Americans.
Strokes in Asians and Pacific-Islanders, Hispanics, and Native Americans.
Hypertensive heart disease in African-Americans.
Coronary artery disease in African-Americans.
Heart disease in Asians and Pacific-Islanders, Hispanics, and Native Americans.
Renal vascular disease in African-Americans and other racial minorities.
Standards for analysis of ventricular late potentials using high-resolution or signal-averaged electrocardiography. A statement by a Task Force Committee of the European Society of Cardiology, the American Heart Association, and the American College of Cardiology.
Granulomatous vasculitis in Crohn's disease [published erratum appears in Gastroenterology 1991 Aug;101(2):595]
Diagnosis of Budd-Chiari syndrome by pulsed Doppler ultrasound.
Hepatic lesions in the rabbit induced by acoustic cavitation.
Expandable venous stents for treatment of the Budd-Chiari syndrome.
Power of oesophageal peristalsis can be controlled voluntarily.
Anorectal varices--their frequency in cirrhotic and non-cirrhotic portal hypertension.
Brain and liver angiotensinogen messenger RNA in genetic hypertensive and normotensive rats.
Salt blocks the renal benefits of ramipril in diabetic hypertensive rats.
Role of prostanoids in renin-dependent and renin-independent hypertension.
Effect of hydralazine on the mesenteric vasculature of hypertensive rats.
Effects of alpha 1-blockade on arterial compliance in normotensive and hypertensive rats.
Rapid baroreceptor resetting in Dahl salt-sensitive rats.
Plasma norepinephrine and dihydroxyphenylglycol in essential hypertension.
Why do lean hypertensives have higher mortality rates than other hypertensives? Findings of the Hypertension Detection and Follow-up Program.
Obesity, glucose intolerance, hyperinsulinemia, and response to antihypertensive drugs.
Prognostic significance of exercise versus resting blood pressure in hypertensive men.
Metoprolol versus thiazide diuretics in hypertension. Morbidity results from the MAPHY Study.
Stress and sodium intake in neural control of renal function in hypertension.
Abnormal cardiovascular reactivity in borderline and mild essential hypertension.
Biochemical evidence of sympathetic hyperactivity in human hypertension.
Effect of stress on diagnosis of hypertension.
Stress management in the treatment of mild primary hypertension.
Management of hypertension by reduction in sympathetic activity.
Hemodynamic determinants of vascular changes in hypertension and atherosclerosis.
Sympathetic drive and vascular damage in hypertension and atherosclerosis.
Prevention of deep-vein thrombosis and pulmonary embolism after total hip replacement. Comparison of low-molecular-weight heparin and unfractionated heparin.
Low-molecular-weight heparinoid compared with warfarin for prophylaxis of deep-vein thrombosis in patients who are operated on for fracture of the hip. A prospective, randomized trial.
Effects of epidural anesthesia on the incidence of deep-vein thrombosis after total knee arthroplasty [published erratum appears in J Bone Joint Surg [Am] 1991 Jul;73(6):952]
Intermittent pneumatic compression to prevent proximal deep venous thrombosis during and after total hip replacement. A prospective, randomized study of compression alone, compression and aspirin, and compression and low-dose warfarin.
Plasma histamine in patients with chronic renal failure and nephrotic syndrome.
Long-term treatment of hereditary angioedema with attenuated androgens: a survey of a 13-year experience.
Fusiform dilatations of the carotid artery following radical surgery of childhood craniopharyngiomas.
Venous infarction following the interhemispheric approach in patients with acute subarachnoid hemorrhage.
Use of the metabolic tracer carbon-11-acetate for evaluation of regional myocardial perfusion.
Metabolic activity in the areas of new fill-in after thallium-201 reinjection: comparison with positron emission tomography using fluorine-18-deoxyglucose.
Regional wall thickening of left ventricle evaluated by gated positron emission tomography in relation to myocardial perfusion and glucose metabolism.
Concordance for dyslipidemic hypertension in male twins.
The epidemiologic necropsy for abdominal aortic aneurysm.
Elevation of ambulatory systolic blood pressure in hypertensive smokers. A case-control study.
Detecting arrhythmia by exercise electrocardiography in pediatric patients: assessment of sensitivity and influence on clinical management.
Right-to-left shunt across a patent foramen ovale caused by cardiac tamponade: diagnosis by transesophageal echocardiography.
Radiology in the intensive-care unit.
Angioscopic coronary macromorphology in patients with acute coronary disorders.
Early prevention of left ventricular dysfunction after myocardial infarction with angiotensin-converting-enzyme inhibition [published erratum appears in Lancet 1991 May 11;337(8750):1174]
Raised exercise diastolic blood pressure as indicator of ischaemic left ventricular dysfunction.
A randomized clinical study of a calcium-entry blocker (lidoflazine) in the treatment of comatose survivors of cardiac arrest. Brain Resuscitation Clinical Trial II Study Group
Ruling out acute myocardial infarction. A prospective multicenter validation of a 12-hour strategy for patients at low risk
Urinary calcium as an early marker for preeclampsia.
Hypocalciuria of preeclampsia is independent of parathyroid hormone level.
Isolated calf venous thrombosis: diagnosis with compression US.
Arterial stent placement with use of the Wallstent: midterm results of clinical experience.
The scimitar syndrome.
Combined use of nifedipine and diltiazem for the treatment of severe hypertension.
The study of serum apoprotein levels as indicators for the severity of angiographically assessed coronary artery disease.
The current status of maternal and fetal blood flow velocimetry.
Determinants of perinatal outcome in pregnancy-induced hypertension with absence of umbilical artery end-diastolic frequencies.
Randomized comparative trial of indomethacin and ritodrine for the long-term treatment of preterm labor.
Examination of cardiorespiratory changes during upper gastrointestinal endoscopy. Comparison of monitoring of arterial oxygen saturation, arterial pressure and the electrocardiogram.
Can esmolol manage surgically-induced tachycardia? Bolus esmolol treatment of intra-operative tachycardia due to surgical stimulation.
Validity of cerebrovascular mortality rates.
Importance of RAA system and the treatment of patients with ACE inhibition after myocardial infarction.
Higher recurrence rate after coronary angioplasty in unstable angina pectoris.
Serum-erythropoietin concentration during acute cardiogenic pulmonary edema.
Double-blind placebo-controlled trial of buflomedil in the treatment of Raynaud's phenomenon: six-month follow-up.
Diabetes mellitus and localizations of obliterating arterial disease of the lower limbs.
Assessment of coronary artery disease by thallium scan in type-1 diabetic uremic patients awaiting combined pancreas and renal transplantation.
Incidence of aneurysms in Takayasu's arteritis.
Severe hypertension with segmental renal infarction following surgical removal of a retroperitoneal malignant hemangiopericytoma: a case report.
Heterozygous protein C deficiency associated with multiple congenital hemangiomas--a case report.
Low-dose aspirin therapy for chronic stable angina. A randomized, placebo-controlled clinical trial.
Risk factors for infusion-related phlebitis with small peripheral venous catheters. A randomized controlled trial.
Coronary angiography after thrombolytic therapy for acute myocardial infarction.
Impact of dosage schedule on the efficacy of gentamicin, tobramycin, or amikacin in an experimental model of Serratia marcescens endocarditis: in vitro-in vivo correlation.
Failure of treatment with teicoplanin at 6 milligrams/kilogram/day in patients with Staphylococcus aureus intravascular infection. The Infectious Diseases Consortium of Oregon.
Acute effects of ethanol on cultured myocardial cells: an ultrastructural study.
Effect of early programmes of high and low intensity exercise on physical performance after transmural acute myocardial infarction.
Lack of correlation between P pulmonale and right atrial overload in chronic obstructive airways disease.
Influence of angiotensin converting enzyme inhibition on pump function and cardiac contractility in patients with chronic congestive heart failure.
Alcohol ablation of atrioventricular conduction
Estimation of Doppler gradients at rest and during exercise in patients with recoarctation of the aorta.
Aortic-ventricular tunnel in a neonate: diagnosis and management based on cross sectional and colour Doppler ultrasonography.
Impending paradoxical embolism: a rare but important diagnosis.
Electrocardiographic findings in a patient with pure septal infarction.
Continuous ambulatory ECG monitoring in the perioperative period: relationship of preoperative status and outcome.
Reoperations for late complications following abdominal aortic operation.
Light reflection rheography: an effective non-invasive technique for screening patients with suspected deep venous thrombosis.
Histological study of white blood cells and their association with lipodermatosclerosis and venous ulceration.
The role of exercise in the primary and secondary prevention of coronary artery disease.
The acute and chronic antihypertensive effects of ketanserin cannot be explained by blockade of vascular serotonin, type 2, receptors or alpha 1-adrenergic receptors.
The effect of food on pharmacokinetics and pharmacodynamics of fenoldopam in class III heart failure.
Management of valvular heart disease: an illustrative cases approach.
Headaches due to spontaneous internal carotid artery dissection magnetic resonance imaging evaluation and follow up.
Symptom-limited exercise testing causes sustained diastolic dysfunction in patients with coronary disease and low effort tolerance.
The threshold for myocardial ischemia varies in patients with coronary artery disease depending on the exercise protocol.
Orifice variability of the stenotic aortic valve: evaluation before and after balloon aortic valvuloplasty.
Reversibility of cardiac abnormalities in human immunodeficiency virus (HIV)-infected individuals: a serial echocardiographic study.
Regular ventricular rhythms in patients with symptomatic paroxysmal atrial fibrillation.
Thallium-201 scintigraphy after intravenous infusion of adenosine compared with exercise thallium testing in the diagnosis of coronary artery disease
Effect of infarct location on myocardial salvage assessed by technetium-99m isonitrile.
Comparison of the ramp versus standard exercise protocols.
Pathologic fibrosis and matrix connective tissue in the subaortic myocardium of patients with hypertrophic cardiomyopathy.
Atrial fibrillation in patients with an accessory pathway: importance of the conduction properties of the accessory pathway.
Perinatal outcome of fetal complete atrioventricular block: a multicenter experience.
Preoperative and postoperative "aneurysm" associated with coarctation of the aorta.
Long-term (2 year) beneficial effects of beta-adrenergic blockade with bucindolol in patients with idiopathic dilated cardiomyopathy.
Acute effects of parenteral beta-blockade on regional ventricular function of infarct and noninfarct zones after reperfusion therapy in humans.
Effect of beta-blockade on low heart rate-related ischemia during mental stress.
Role of combination drug therapy with a class IC antiarrhythmic agent and mexiletine for ventricular tachycardia.
Scintigraphic assessment of sympathetic innervation after transmural versus nontransmural myocardial infarction
Efficacy of multiple balloon aortic valvuloplasty procedures. The Mansfield Scientific Aortic Valvuloplasty Registry Investigators.
Acute catastrophic complications of balloon aortic valvuloplasty. The Mansfield Scientific Aortic Valvuloplasty Registry Investigators.
Role of thromboxane and serotonin as mediators in the development of spontaneous alterations in coronary blood flow and neointimal proliferation in canine models with chronic coronary artery stenoses and endothelial injury.
Pharmacologic roles of heparin and glucocorticoids to prevent restenosis after coronary angioplasty.
Colchicine and antineoplastic therapy for the prevention of restenosis after percutaneous coronary interventions.
Coronary restenosis: what have we learned from angiography?
Stenting of coronary arteries: has a modern Pandora's box been opened?
Clinical experience with the Palmaz-Schatz coronary stent.
Percutaneous coronary excimer laser-assisted angioplasty: initial multicenter experience in 141 patients.
Use of the perforated balloon catheter to infuse marker substances into diseased coronary artery walls after experimental postmortem angioplasty.
Laser balloon angioplasty: potential for reduction of the thrombogenicity of the injured arterial wall and for local application of bioprotective materials.
Gene transfer into vascular cells.
Restenosis after coronary angioplasty: an overview.
Quantitative coronary arteriographic methods in the interventional catheterization laboratory: an update and perspective.
Regional differences in elastic recoil after percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty: a quantitative angiographic study.
Intravascular ultrasound guidance for catheter-based coronary interventions.
Percutaneous coronary angioscopy in patients with restenosis after coronary angioplasty.
Total coronary occlusion: a different animal?
Restenosis 1 to 24 months after clinically successful coronary balloon angioplasty: a necropsy study of 20 patients.
Endothelial modulation of vascular tone: relevance to coronary angioplasty and restenosis.
The role of platelets, thrombin and hyperplasia in restenosis after coronary angioplasty.
Prospects for the use of antagonists to the platelet glycoprotein IIb/IIIa receptor to prevent post-angioplasty restenosis and thrombosis.
Massive hemorrhage from a ruptured enteric varices of an augmented bladder.
Doppler sonographic imaging of the vascular system. Report of the Ultrasonography Task Force. Council on Scientific Affairs, American Medical Association.
Exertional sudden death in soldiers.
Renal hemodynamics and the renin-angiotensin-aldosterone system in normotensive subjects with hypertensive and normotensive parents.
Optic neuropathy and central nervous system disease secondary to Sjogren's syndrome in a child.
Efficacy of intraarterial heparin in maintaining microvascular patency: an experimental model.
Intraosseous vascular malformations of the orbit.
Enterococcal endocarditis: a comparison of prosthetic and native valve disease.
Pericardial actinomycosis: case report and review.
Perivalvular extension of infection in patients with infectious endocarditis.
Mechanisms of disease in Hantavirus infection: pathophysiology of hemorrhagic fever with renal syndrome.
Antibiotic management of outpatients with endocarditis due to penicillin-susceptible streptococci.
1990 ARRS Executive Council Award. Intravascular sonography in the detection of arteriosclerosis and evaluation of vascular interventional procedures.
Percutaneous transluminal angioplasty of the subclavian arteries: long-term results in 52 patients.
Conventional screen/film vs reduced exposure photostimulable phosphor plate imaging in lower extremity venography: an ROC analysis.
Angiotensin converting enzyme inhibitors improve contractile function of stunned myocardium by different mechanisms of action.
Regional myocardial function after repetitive brief episodes of ischemia: effect of altering the duration of the reperfusion period.
Dipyridamole-induced decrement of functional recovery of postischemic reperfused myocardium in conscious dogs with well-developed coronary collateral circulation.
Attenuation of myocardial ischemia during coronary occlusion by ultrashort-acting beta adrenergic blockade.
Two-dimensional Doppler echocardiographic correlation of dipyridamole-thallium stress testing with isometric handgrip.
Prognostic significance of the Karnofsky Performance Status score in patients with acute myocardial infarction: comparison with the left ventricular ejection fraction and the exercise treadmill test performance. The MILIS Study Group.
The importance of adequate anticoagulation to prevent early thrombosis after stenting of stenosed venous bypass grafts.
Digitalis and beta-blocking agents: effects on depression following myocardial infarction.
Exercise-induced myocardial dysfunction in patients with coronary artery disease with and without angina.
Factors associated with atrial fibrillation in Q wave anterior myocardial infarction.
Suppressive effect of SUN1165 on supraventricular tachycardia.
Body surface isopotential mapping of the entire QRST complex in the Wolff-Parkinson-White syndrome. Correlation with the location of the accessory pathway.
Determination of pulse wave velocities with computerized algorithms.
Oral enoximone therapy in chronic heart failure: a placebo-controlled randomized trial. The Western Enoximone Study Group.
Ventriculoatrial shunts for hydrocephalus and cardiac valvulopathy: an echocardiographic evaluation.
Natural history of dilated cardiomyopathy in children.
Sinus parasystole.
Coronary artery stenting after angioplasty with self-expanding parallel wire metallic stents.
Early experience with the smart laser in the treatment of atherosclerotic occlusions.
Bedside diagnosis of preserved versus impaired left ventricular systolic function in heart failure.
Determination of severity of valvular aortic stenosis by Doppler echocardiography and relation of findings to clinical outcome and agreement with hemodynamic measurements determined at cardiac catheterization.
Reproducibility of Doppler echocardiographic quantification of aortic and mitral valve stenoses: comparison between two echocardiography centers.
Prediction of death and myocardial infarction by radionuclide angiocardiography in patients with suspected coronary artery disease.
Circadian variation of transient myocardial ischemia in the early out-of-hospital period after first acute myocardial infarction.
A prospective study of parental history of myocardial infarction and coronary artery disease in men.
Usefulness of weightlifting training in improving strength and maximal power output in coronary artery disease.
Transient myocardial ischemia during daily life in rest and exertional angina pectoris and comparison of effectiveness of metoprolol versus nifedipine.
Relation of stenosis resolution pressure to long-term clinical outcome after successful percutaneous transluminal coronary angioplasty.
Progression and regression of minor coronary arterial narrowings by quantitative angiography after fenofibrate therapy.
Transtelephonic electrocardiographic monitoring of cardiac rehabilitation exercise sessions in coronary artery disease.
Spectral turbulence analysis of the signal-averaged electrocardiogram and its predictive accuracy for inducible sustained monomorphic ventricular tachycardia.
A generalized description of Wenckebach behavior with analysis of determinants of ventricular cycle-length variation during ambulatory electrocardiography.
Dyslipidemic effects of cigarette smoking on beta-blocker-induced serum lipid changes in systemic hypertension.
Sympathetic responses of patients with congestive heart failure to cold pressor stimulus.
Use of the robust sib-pair method to screen for single-locus, multiple-locus, and pleiotropic effects: application to traits related to hypertension.
Epidemiology, pathophysiology, and management of isolated systolic hypertension in the elderly.
Practical considerations in treating the elderly hypertensive patient.
Epidemiology and evaluation: steps toward hypertension treatment in the 1990s.
Vascular injury: mechanisms and manifestations.
Effects of nitrous oxide on coronary pressure and regional contractile function in experimental myocardial ischemia.
EPA in the prevention of restenosis post PTCA.
Alterations in erythrocyte rheology in patients with severe peripheral vascular disease: 1. Cell volume dependence of erythrocyte rigidity.
Mortality in acute cerebral infarction in young adults--a ten-year experience.
Investigations on the biochemical characteristics of chronically underperfused muscle.
Mycotic (Aspergillus) arteritis resulting in fatal subarachnoid hemorrhage: a case report.
Intercostal-to-pulmonary arterial anastomosis, complicated by high-output heart failure: case report.
Comparative efficacy of daptomycin, vancomycin, and cloxacillin for the treatment of Staphylococcus aureus endocarditis in rats and role of test conditions in this determination.
Treatment of bone, joint, and vascular-access-associated gram-positive bacterial infections with teicoplanin.
Serum endothelin-1 concentrations and cold provocation in primary Raynaud's phenomenon
Changes in protein, RNA and DNA and rates of protein synthesis in muscle-containing tissues of the mature rat in response to ethanol feeding: a comparative study of heart, small intestine and gastrocnemius muscle.
Injury current and gradients of diastolic stimulation threshold, TQ potential, and extracellular potassium concentration during acute regional ischemia in the isolated perfused pig heart.
Endothelial dysfunction in response to psychosocial stress in monkeys.
A unified model of atrioventricular nodal conduction predicts dynamic changes in Wenckebach periodicity.
Carotid sinus baroreceptor reflex in dogs with experimental heart failure.
Distinction between metabolic and myogenic mechanisms of coronary hyperemic response to brief diastolic occlusion.
Beneficial effects of alpha 1-adrenoceptor activity on myocardial stunning in dogs.
Intracellular calcium transients in myocardium from spontaneously hypertensive rats during the transition to heart failure.
Vagal stimulation and prevention of sudden death in conscious dogs with a healed myocardial infarction.
Simulation of compartment syndrome by rupture of the deep femoral artery from blunt trauma.
Hemorrhage and intracranial hypertension in combination increase cerebral production of thromboxane A2.
Acute ethanol intoxication decreases the likelihood of resuscitation from cardiac arrest in rats.
Use of femoral venous catheters in critically ill adults: prospective study.
Echo/Doppler and hemodynamic correlates of vasodilator responsiveness in primary pulmonary hypertension.
Crackles in patients with fibrosing alveolitis, bronchiectasis, COPD, and heart failure.
Benign pleural effusions in long-standing diabetes mellitus.
Familial pulmonary hypertension in association with an abnormal hemoglobin. Insights into the pathogenesis of primary pulmonary hypertension.
Acute cardiogenic pulmonary edema treated with mechanical ventilation. Factors determining in-hospital mortality.
Angiographic evolution of coronary atherosclerosis in patients receiving propranolol. A two-year follow-up
Possible Behcet's disease revealed by pulmonary aneurysms.
Acute pulmonary hypertensive crisis in a patient with primary pulmonary hypertension treated by both epoprostenol (prostacyclin) and nitroprusside.
Bilateral coronary ostial stenosis associated with aortitis syndrome.
Spontaneous near disappearance of bilateral coronary artery-pulmonary artery fistulas.
Exercise-induced ventricular tachycardia in association with a myocardial bridge.
Metastatic melanoma to the heart presenting with ventricular tachycardia.
Pulmonary hypertension associated with long-standing thrombocytosis.
A world record marathon runner with silent ischemia without coronary atherosclerosis.
Self-administered hyperventilation cardiopulmonary resuscitation for 100 s of cardiac arrest during Holter monitoring.
Importance of ulceration of carotid plaque in determining symptoms of cerebral ischemia.
Long-term patency of the aortofemoral Dacron graft. A graft limb related study over a 25-years period.
Abdominal aortic aneurysms complicated by spontaneous iliocaval or duodenal fistulae.
Nd:YAG iliac and femoropopliteal laser angioplasty: results with large probes as "sole therapy".
Hepatic perfusion index (HPI) in mesenteric angina and following successful revascularization.
Abdominal aortic aneurysm in chronic thoracic dissection. Report of two cases.
Necrosis of the small intestine after resection of an abdominal aortic aneurysm.
Myocardial protection with Hamburg oxygenated crystalloid cardioplegic solution for multiple coronary bypass and multivalvular replacement.
Diastolic mechanical properties of the left ventricle after global ischemia.
Cavitary lesions close to heart valve rings. A necropsy study of 13 cases.
Rupture of the posterior wall of the left ventricle after mitral valve replacement.
Coronary-subclavian steal corrected with percutaneous transluminal angioplasty.
Congenital mitral regurgitation associated with total anomalous pulmonary venous drainage. Report of a rare combination.
Chronic diuretic therapy with moderate doses of triamterene is not associated with folate deficiency.
Effect of dietary NaCl on norepinephrine turnover in the Dahl rat.
Evaluation of the immune response in protection against experimental Streptococcus defectivus endocarditis.
Does hyperkinetic circulation constitute a pre-hypertensive stage? A 5-year follow-up of haemodynamics in young men with mild blood pressure elevation.
Habitual leisure-time physical activity is associated with differences in various risk factors for coronary artery disease.
Thromboembolism in patients with advanced mitral valve prolapse
Autonomic function in Friedreich's ataxia.
Spontaneous haematomyelia: a necropsy study.
Reflex bradycardia during TMJ arthroscopy: case report.
Effects of selected beta-adrenergic blocking agents on sleep stages in spontaneously hypertensive rats.
Role of endothelium on the effects of neuropeptide Y in mesenteric resistance arteries of spontaneously hypertensive and Wistar-Kyoto normotensive rats.
Endothelin binding in brain of normotensive and spontaneously hypertensive rats.

